XM-SIRIUS  MERGER  AND  THE  PUBLIC  INTEREST 

S.  HRG.  110–1201 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

APRIL  17,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

78–881 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 17, 2007  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Analyst, RBC Capital Markets 

Bank,  David,  Managing  Director,  Media  and  Broadcasting  Equity  Research 
...........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Karmazin, Melvin Alan ‘‘Mel’’, CEO, Sirius Satellite Radio  ................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kimmelman,  Gene,  Vice  President,  Federal  and  International  Affairs,  Con-
sumers  Union;  on  behalf  of  Common  Cause,  Consumers  Union,  Consumer 
Federation of America, Free Press, and Media Access Project 
........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
.............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Withers,  Jr.,  W.  Russell,  President,  Withers  Broadcasting  Companies;  on 
behalf of the National Association of Broadcasters  ...........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Sohn, Gigi B., President and Co-Founder, Public Knowledge 

Page 
1 
2 
1 
45 
3 
53 
3 
51 

37 
38 
4 
5 

20 
22 
29 
31 

10 
11 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

XM-SIRIUS  MERGER  AND  THE  PUBLIC 

INTEREST 

TUESDAY,  APRIL  17,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:05  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building.  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. This morning the Committee considers issues re-
lated to the proposed merger of the two satellite radio operators of 
the United States, XM and Sirius. While satellite radio is relatively 
new, it has grown rapidly. Today XM and Sirius provide audio en-
tertainment  services  to  more  than  13  million  Americans.  These 
subscribers listen to satellite radio primarily while driving in their 
cars but some also listen in their offices, homes and on portable de-
vices.  Despite  such  successes,  Sirius  and  XM  now  argue  they 
should be permitted to merge into a single satellite radio provider, 
a result that was explicitly prohibited when the FCC adopted serv-
ice rules in 1997. 

In  the  eyes  of  satellite  radio  operators,  such  a  restriction  is  out 
of  date  given  the  availability  of  programming  via  alternatives  like 
dish  over-the-air  radio,  MP3  players  and  other  means  of  receiving 
audio  entertainment.  But  to  merger  opponents,  that  argument 
rings hollow; in their view, satellite radio offers a unique collection 
of  nationwide  programming  that  as  a  whole  cannot  be  effectively 
replicated.  As  such,  these  alternatives  complement  rather  than 
compete  with  satellite  radio.  Thus  to  merger  opponents,  a  satellite 
radio  monopoly  puts  at  risk  the  benefits  of  low  priced  and  high 
quality  service  that  only  accrue  from  competing  service  providers. 
This  morning’s  hearing  presents  us  with  an  opportunity  to  test 
these  claims.  While  we  welcome  this  discussion,  I  believe  that  the 
merger  proponents  in  this  case  have  a  steep  hill  to  climb.  Indeed, 
given the public interest in promoting competition and maximizing 
a  diversity  of  media  outlets,  we  should  be  skeptical  of  claims  that 
new technologies necessarily change the equation and provide com-
petition sufficient to restrain monopoly power. 

With that, I look forward to hearing from today’s witnesses. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

2 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much.  Thank 
you for allowing me to briefly make a statement now. I hope I can 
get  back  in  time  to  ask  some  questions  today.  This  is,  I  think,  a 
particularly  good  panel.  This  is  a  very  important  topic.  And  Mr. 
Chairman,  I  believe  it  was  last  week  I  pointed  out  that  there,  in 
my judgment, has been precious little antitrust enforcement in this 
town for a long long time, not just this Administration but the pre-
vious  Administration  and  beyond.  Satellite  radio  is  an  appropriate 
hearing subject. It is a wonderful new service for consumers. I hap-
pen to be a subscriber so I listen to satellite radio, enjoy it, appre-
ciate the offering it provides to the American consumers. 

You  mentioned  in  your  opening  statement  that  the  licenses 
granted to two companies, Sirius and XM, nearly a decade ago, in-
cluded  a  caveat  that  they  not  merge.  They  are  now  coming  to  us 
saying  that  a  few  short  years  later  they  wish  to  merge.  I  do  not 
support the merger. I believe that merger by definition means less 
competition and where you had two competitors, you will have one 
company.  I  think  it  means  less  competition,  more  concentration. 
Mr.  Chairman,  you  and  the  ranking  members  and  others  on  this 
Committee know that I’ve spent a lot of time being very concerned 
about  the  concentration  in  broadcasting,  television,  radio,  the  gal-
loping  concentration  in  both  areas,  concentration  with  respect  to 
newspapers,  and  that  which  we  see,  hear  and  read  in  this  country 
is  unfortunately  these  days  controlled  by  a  very  few  people.  I’m 
very  concerned  about  concentration.  This  is  but  one  more  step  in 
those areas. 

If  I  am  back  in  time  I  will  ask  some  questions.  I  had  a  chance 
to  meet  with  Mr.  Karmazin  yesterday.  He  is  a  very  able  executive 
in  that  industry.  I  very  much  appreciated  the  opportunity  to  visit 
with him. But I do think there are a couple of important questions, 
one  is  the  impact  on  the  consumer  of  a  merger  in  which  competi-
tion  is  eliminated.  And  second,  I  will  put  up  a  chart  that  shows 
with  respect  to  both  XM  and  Sirius  the  content  that  they  are  pro-
viding.  And  because  they  are  providing  that  content,  I  suppose,  is 
one of the reasons that I and other subscribers are paying for that 
service  every  month.  But  one  of  the  questions  and  one  of  the  criti-
cisms has been, what are they paying for all of this content? 

I know that from published reports Oprah is getting $55 million, 
but  as  you  know  from  all  of  the  rest  of  these,  it’s  I  believe  Dale 
Earnhardt,  Willie  Nelson,  Richard  Simmons,  Quincy  Jones, 
Eminem,  Snoop  Dogg,  Ellen  Degeneres,  Barbara  Walters,  and  the 
list  goes  on  and  on.  I  think  it  would  be  important  to  understand, 
what are the contracts with respect to all of this content. Has that 
provided  some  tightening  and  pinching  with  respect  to  the  reve-
nues of two companies that then wish to become one? 

We have I think a good panel and I appreciate that this hearing 
is timely and I think it’s also very important. This is an important 
public  policy  question.  I  come  down  on  the  side  of  opposing  the 
merger. Mr. Chairman, thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, 
Senator DORGAN. The Vice Chairman, Senator Stevens. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

3 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  apologize  for 
being slightly late. I made the mistake of agreeing to make two ap-
pearances before this hearing. I’ll cut it down to one next time. But 
I  do  think  that  this  proposed  merger  between  XM  and  Sirius  pre-
sents  an  opportunity  for  us  to  learn  more  about  this  concept  of 
audio  entertainment.  And  we  spent  a  great  deal  of  time  estab-
lishing a digital transition to assist public safety, and to create new 
broadband opportunities and there is a transition now obviously in 
radio. 

I’m  sure  you’ve  had,  the  same  as  I  have  had,  some  complaints 
from  local  broadcasters  who  have  news,  sports,  weather  and  addi-
tional  programming  that  they  believe  could  be  subject  to  harmful 
competition, that they can’t survive with regard to this type of paid 
national  satellite  radio  services.  I  appreciate  the  proponents  of  the 
merger  visiting  with  me  and  my  staff  before  this  hearing.  I  still 
don’t know the answer to this question. I look forward to trying to 
understand  it  better  in  this  hearing,  and  I  do  know  that  we  all 
want to know what’s going to happen to the consumers in our own 
states,  so  I  look  forward  to  any  comments  that  might  be  made 
about this and the impact of this on rural America. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
This morning we have five witnesses. I’m sorry. 
Senator Lautenberg? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. The hearing is an 
important  one  and  we  are  going  to  determine  a  lot  about  listening 
habits and fairness and equity with our consumers, and I listen to 
satellite  radio  and  enjoy  it.  But  there  is  no  free  lunch,  obviously. 
It’s a business. And the rise of satellite radio has offered a new and 
very powerful way to increase consumer choice for audio entertain-
ment.  But  we  have  got  to  make  sure  that  as  satellite  radio’s  audi-
ence increases, that consumers are not forced to face fewer choices 
and  higher  prices.  We  always  talk  in  our  country  about  the  value 
of  competition  and  what  it  does  for  product  development  and  pric-
ing.  Now,  if  XM  and  Sirius  merge,  the  combined  company  would 
provide  service  for  nearly  14  million  customers  across  the  country. 
But  we  have  got  to  make  sure  that  service  after  the  proposed 
merger would be a consumer benefit, not just to the satellite radio 
companies themselves. Consumers must be able to have the service 
from  both  networks  without  having  to  invest  in  costly  new  equip-
ment, without paying monthly rates far higher than the current es-
tablished rate, $12.95. And it’s interesting to me how the two com-
panies of interest were able to strike a price that was so perfectly, 
as we say, in tune, to use the vernacular. 

We have also got to consider the merger’s potential effect on free 
radio  and  local  coverage.  And  as  a  former  businessman,  I  under-
stand  the  desire  of  the  two  satellite  radio  companies  to  grow  their 
businesses.  And  they  offer  a  product  of  great  interest.  But  we’ve 
got  to  make  sure  that  the  principal  interest  is  that  of  the  public, 
and  that  consumers  have  more  options  and  fairer  pricing  for  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

4 

products.  So,  Mr.  Chairman,  thanks  very  much  for  doing  this.  It’s 
a very important subject and I look forward to the testimony of our 
distinguished witnesses. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Senator.  And  as  I  was 
saying, this morning we have a panel of five great experts. Mr. Mel 
Karmazin, Chief Executive Officer of Sirius Satellite Radio; Mr. W. 
Russell  Withers,  Jr.,  President,  Withers  Broadcasting  Companies; 
Mr.  Gene  Kimmelman,  Vice  President  for  Federal  and  Inter-
national  Affairs,  Consumers  Union;  Ms.  Gigi  Sohn,  President  and 
Co-Founder,  Public  Knowledge;  Mr.  David  Bank,  Managing  Direc-
tor  and  Equity  Research  Analyst  for  RBC  Capital  Markets.  And 
may I first recognize Mr. Karmazin. 

STATEMENT OF MELVIN ALAN ‘‘MEL’’ KARMAZIN, CEO, 

SIRIUS SATELLITE RADIO 

Mr. KARMAZIN. Good morning, Chairman Inouye and Vice Chair-
man Stevens, and members of the Committee. I appreciate this op-
portunity to talk to you today about the Sirius-XM merger and the 
benefits  it  will  bring  to  consumers  and  the  competition  we  face  in 
the  audio  entertainment  market.  Prior  to  our  announcement  on 
February  19th,  our  board  met  many  times  with  our  advisors  and 
we  were  told  that  in  order  for  this  merger  to  be  approved,  we 
would have to demonstrate two things, and you know Senator Dor-
gan  and  Senator  Lautenberg  said  it.  We  need  to  demonstrate  that 
this is good for consumers, and number two, that we have to dem-
onstrate that it’s not anticompetitive. 

So  I’m  here  to  talk  to  you  today  about  why  these  benefits  of  our 
merger are good for consumers and not anticompetitive. This Com-
mittee has a distinguished history of examining how changes in the 
media landscape affect consumers. So let me begin by summarizing 
the  consumer  benefits  of  our  merger  that  we  recently  enumerated 
in our FCC filing. 

We  are  confident  that  a  combination  of  Sirius  and  XM  is  a  big 
win  for  consumers.  And  here  is  why.  Today  Sirius  and  XM  each 
provide consumers with one package for our service at $12.95. Con-
sumers  who  want  programming  from  both  services,  such  as  the 
NFL from Sirius or Major League Baseball from XM, must buy two 
radios,  and  also  must  have  two  subscriptions  totaling  $25.90  a 
month. 

After the merger, the company will offer a programming package 
that offers the best of both services at a modest premium just over 
$12.95,  which  is  what  the  consumers  today  pay  for  one  service.  In 
addition,  the  new  company  will  offer  new  lower  priced  packages 
with fewer channels combining music, entertainment, sports, infor-
mation and more, at a price below $12.95. 

So  in  the  area  of  pricing,  I  just  described  that  the  new  company 
will  offer  a  new  package  costing  less  than  $12.95  and  a  premium 
package that will cost modestly above $12.95, but below $25.90. No 
subscriber,  no  subscriber  will  pay  more  for  the  service  that  they 
now  have.  Today,  consumers  of  both  companies  can  block  certain 
adult programming. The new company will provide a credit so that 
nobody will subsidize or pay for adult content that they don’t want. 
Also  to  Senator  Lautenberg’s  point,  no  consumer  will  have  to  buy 
a  new  radio.  The  radios  that  they  currently  have  will  not  be  obso-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

5 

lete,  so  lower  prices,  more  choices  for  consumers  demonstrate  that 
the  merger  is  in  the  public  interest.  All  of  the  commitments  are 
more  than  just  words.  We  are  prepared  to  at  the  appropriate  time 
discuss  with  each  of  the  regulators  a  guarantee  as  to  how  these 
points that I’ve mentioned can be conditions of our merger. 

Now  I’d  like  to  turn  briefly  to  the  subject  of  competition.  That’s 
the second issue that the regulators are going to have to deal with. 
The  audio  entertainment  market  is  a  fiercely  competitive,  rapidly 
expanding  market,  and  we  are  a  very  small  piece  of  it.  Satellite 
radio,  XM  and  Sirius  only  have  3.4  percent  of  the  audio  market. 
Terrestrial radio remains the 800 pound gorilla in our market with 
nearly  14,000  radio  stations,  230  million  listeners—that  230  mil-
lion  listeners  compares  to  our  14  million  subscribers  combined— 
and receivers that are in virtually every car, clock radio and home 
stereo in America. 

Given  our  small  share  in  a  market  brimming  with  competition 
and  innovation,  much  of  it  free  and  universally  available,  our 
merged  company  will  have  to  provide  great  service  and  pricing  to 
continue  to  grow  our  business.  To  appreciate  the  intense  competi-
tion  in  audio  entertainment  today,  consider  the  extraordinary 
changes  that  have  taken  place  in  the  10  years  since  our  licenses 
were  granted.  In  1997,  there  was  no  HD  radio.  Today  there  are 
over  1,100  radio  stations  providing  coverage  and  Wal-Mart  is  sell-
ing  HD  radios.  There  was  no  Internet  radio,  and  Internet  radio  is 
fast becoming aggressive in an area of WiFi. No iPods. There were 
no  iPods  in  1997  or  MP3  players;  nor  were  there  any  entertain-
ment capable mobile phones. 

Today  all  of  these  technologies  not  only  compete  with  satellite 
radio, they also have backing from very resourceful companies with 
substantial positions. The rapid change in innovation, a very strong 
ubiquitous  and  free  competition,  and  the  small  market  share  that 
Sirius and XM have together argues forcefully that our merger will 
not constrain competition. To the contrary, competition will require 
Sirius  and  XM  to  maintain  both  quality  and  affordability  in  order 
to maintain our growth. 

In  closing,  we  believe  that  a  Sirius  and  XM  merger  will  be  good 
for  consumers,  offering  more  choices  and  better  pricing.  At  the 
same  time  we  believe  that  the  audio  entertainment  market  is  ro-
bust,  competitive,  and  teeming  with  innovation  and  will  remain  so 
after  our  merger.  I  look  forward  to  answering  your  questions. 
Thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Karmazin follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MELVIN ALAN ‘‘MEL’’ KARMAZIN, CEO, 

SIRIUS SATELLITE RADIO 

Mr. Chairman, 
Good  morning.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  mem-
bers  of  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation.  I  am 
grateful  for  the  opportunity  to  talk  with  you  today  about  how  the  merger  of  Sirius 
Satellite Radio and XM Satellite Radio will provide extensive consumer benefits and 
continue to promote competition in audio entertainment. 

I am Mel Karmazin, the Chief Executive Officer of Sirius. Before I came to Sirius 
in 2004, I was president of Viacom and, before that, president of CBS. I have spent 
almost 40 years in radio, and just about my entire working life in the broadcast in-
dustry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

6 

With  me  here  today  is  Gary  Parsons,  the  Chairman  of  XM.  Gary  is  a  veteran  of 
the  communications  business  and  a  leader  in  the  world  of  satellite  radio.  Gary  and 
I  are  both  looking  forward  to  working  together  to  create  an  exciting  new  company. 
Gary’s  leadership  and  talent  are  crucial  to  the  future  of  radio.  Gary,  together  with 
XM’s  CEO  Hugh  Panero,  built  XM  into  the  success  it  is  today.  I  should  point  out 
that  XM  has  the  largest  digital  radio  facility  of  its  kind  in  the  country,  and  is 
headquartered  right  here  in  Washington,  D.C.,  where  the  combined  company  will 
continue to have a significant presence. 

I  would  like  to  talk  today  about  some  of  the  important  benefits  consumers  will 
see as a result of the proposed merger. I also plan to discuss the extensive competi-
tion  that  satellite  radio  faces  from  a  range  of  players  in  the  audio  entertainment 
market.  As  I  will  explain,  this  intense  competition  will  remain  after  the  merger  is 
consummated. 
I. A Sirius and XM Merger Will Generate Concrete and Significant Benefits 

for Consumers 

The  Combined  Company  Will  Offer  Consumers  More  Choice  at  Lower  Prices: 
Today,  Sirius  and  XM  each  provide  consumers  one  service  offering  at  one  price— 
$12.95 per month. Consumers have only a limited ability to tailor their service, and 
those  seeking  programming  from  both  Sirius  and  XM  must  subscribe  to  both  serv-
ices for a combined payment of $25.90 per month. The merger of Sirius and XM will 
enable the combined company to enhance these offerings through: 

• Better  pricing.  The  merger  will  allow  us  to  lower  prices.  Consumers  who  want 
fewer  channels  than  currently  offered  will  be  able  to  select  one  or  more  pack-
ages  of  channels  for  less  than  $12.95  per  month.  These  packages  will  include 
an attractive mix of music, news, informational, sports, children’s, and religious 
programming. 
• More  choices.  Sirius  and  XM  customers  will  be  able  to  access  certain  popular, 
previously  exclusive  programming  of  the  other  provider  for  a  modest  premium 
over what they are paying now. 
• Still  more  choices.  When  interoperable  radios  are  commercially  available,  con-
sumers who want to have access to the complete offerings of both companies will 
be  able  to  do  so  on  a  single  device  for  significantly  less  than  the  current  price 
of $25.90. 
• Empowering  consumers.  While  customers  of  both  companies  currently  have  the 
option  of  blocking  adult  programming,  the  combined  company  will  provide  cus-
tomers a credit if they choose to do so. 

Despite  the  speculation  to  the  contrary,  the  combined  company  will  not  raise 
prices.  After  the  merger,  consumers  who  want  to  continue  to  receive  substantially 
the  same  channel  lineup  of  either  Sirius  or  XM  may  continue  to  do  so  at  the  same 
price—$12.95 per month. 

The  Combined  Company  Will  Be  Able  To  Provide  Consumers  More  Diverse  Pro-
gramming:  Sirius  and  XM  currently  provide  a  wide  range  of  commercial-free  music 
channels, exclusive and non-exclusive sports coverage, news, talk, traffic and weath-
er,  and  entertainment  programming.  However,  there  is  significant  overlap  and  re-
dundancy in the channel line-ups of Sirius and XM. For example, 12 identical chan-
nels are available on both Sirius and XM. A further 75 channels overlap by genre— 
providing substantially similar programming. 

In the long-term, the combined company will be able to consolidate certain redun-
dant  programming.  The  result  ultimately  will  free  capacity  for  more  diverse  offer-
ings  that  are  not  currently  available  on  either  company’s  system,  including  ex-
panded non-English language programming, children’s programming, and additional 
programming  aimed  at  minority  and  other  underserved  populations.  Notably,  this 
additional capacity also may allow the combined company to provide additional pro-
gramming related to public safety and homeland security. 

The  Merger  Will  Help  Accelerate  Deployment  of  Advanced  Technology:  The  com-
bined company will be able to offer consumers access to advanced technology sooner 
than would otherwise occur. In particular, the marriage of the companies’ two engi-
neering  organizations  will  ensure  better  results  from  each  dollar  invested  in  re-
search  and  development.  As  a  consequence,  the  combined  company  will  be  able  to 
improve  on  products  such  as  real-time  traffic  and  rear-seat  video.  In  addition,  the 
combined  company  will  be  able  to  introduce  new  services,  such  as  enhanced  traffic, 
weather, and infotainment offerings; more rapidly and with greater capabilities. 

The Merged Company Will Be Capable of Commercializing Interoperable Receivers, 
Providing  Greater  Customer  Choice  and  Convenience,  While  Also  Protecting  All  Re-
ceivers  on  the  Market  Today:  This  merger  will  neither  interrupt  nor  affect  cus-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

7 

tomers’  use  of  their  existing  radios.  After  the  merger,  current  subscribers  may 
choose  to  continue  to  receive  substantially  similar  service  at  the  same  price  over 
their  existing  satellite  radio.  While  no  radio  will  become  obsolete  as  a  result  of  the 
transaction,  we  fully  expect  the  merger  to  stimulate  the  development  of  new  inter-
operable, highly portable, low-cost, and user-friendly devices. 

The Merger Will Create Operational Efficiencies and Safeguard the Future of Sat-
ellite Radio: Satellite radio is a highly capital-intensive and expensive business. Sir-
ius and XM each have invested over $1 billion in their initial in-orbit satellites and 
over  $5  billion  each  in  their  businesses  overall,  and  both  continue  to  report  signifi-
cant operating losses. For the year ended December 31, 2006, Sirius reported a net 
loss  of  $1.1  billion  while  XM  reported  a  net  loss  of  $719  million.  Both  companies 
continue to report enormous operating losses. The proposed merger will allow Sirius 
and XM to achieve large-scale operational efficiencies that will help ensure that sat-
ellite  radio  can  remain  a  strong,  effective,  and  innovative  audio  entertainment  pro-
vider.  Importantly,  significant  portions  of  the  savings  achieved  through  the  merger 
will  be  shared  with  customers  immediately  and  in  the  long-term  through  lower 
prices and improved service offerings. 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

Each  of  these  important  benefits  is  directly  tied  to  the  proposed  merger  and  can-
not  be  realized  without  it.  I  also  would  like  to  make  clear  that  these  commitments 
are more than just words offered to appease regulators. We view each of these bene-
fits  as  a  ‘‘win-win’’  that  will  make  good  business  sense  for  Sirius-XM.  At  the  same 
time that we will be able to save our customers money and offer them more attrac-
tive  services,  we  will  be  strengthening  our  merged  business.  As  I  will  explain  in 
more  detail  below,  satellite  radio  competes  intensely  with  free  terrestrial  radio  and 
a  host  of  other  audio  entertainment  providers.  The  key  to  getting  more  subscribers 
will  not  be  to  widen  the  price  gap  between  free  and  what  satellite  radio  charges. 
Instead, it will be to offer consumers a better value. We are prepared at the appro-
priate time to discuss each of the issues with regulators and to guarantee these ben-
efits as a condition of our merger approval. 
II. A Sirius and XM Merger Will Enhance Not Harm Competition 
A.  Satellite  Radio  Is  a  Small  Part  of  a  Highly  Competitive  and  Ever-Expanding 

Market for Audio Entertainment 

The  market  for  audio  entertainment  in  the  United  States  is  robustly  competitive 
and  rapidly  evolving.  Sirius  and  XM  compete  directly  and  intensely  with  a  host  of 
other  audio  providers  for  consumer  attention.  As  a  result,  although  satellite  radio 
has proven to be an appealing and popular new product, its market penetration re-
mains  quite  limited.  A  recent  Arbitron  study  found  that  Sirius  and  XM  account  for 
just 3.4 percent of all radio listening, spread out among the approximately 300 chan-
nels that the two companies currently offer. To provide the Committee with a sense 
of the fiercely competitive state of today’s audio entertainment market, I would like 
to take a few moments to provide some details concerning some of our more salient 
competitors. 

Terrestrial Radio: By any measure, ‘‘over-the-air’’ AM/FM radio is the most domi-
nant  form  of  audio  entertainment.  This  is  not  surprising,  given  the  ubiquity  of  the 
service:  AM/FM  radio  is  offered  free  of  charge  to  all  consumers  and  comes  as  a 
standard feature in virtually every vehicle, home stereo, and clock radio sold to U.S. 
consumers.  Nearly  14,000  radio  stations  exist  nationwide.  Approximately  230  mil-
lion Americans choose to listen to terrestrial radio each week. And much of the con-
tent available over terrestrial radio mirrors that provided by satellite radio. 

HD Radio: The broadcast industry has made significant strides in rolling out dig-
ital  services,  and  HD  Radio  technology  is  now  spreading  rapidly.  Just  last  month, 
HD  Radio  received  a  substantial  boost  from  the  FCC.  The  agency  issued  an  imple-
menting  decision  that  not  only  enables  radio  stations  to  broadcast  higher  quality 
digital  entertainment,  but  also  permits  them  to  offer  multiple  streams  of  program-
ming and data services over their existing channels. Significantly, the Commission’s 
decision also allows radio broadcasters to provide digital subscription services on an 
experimental  basis.  This  flexibility  surely  will  intensify  the  competition  between 
AM/FM radio and satellite radio, not only for listeners but also for subscription dol-
lars. 

Through  the  HD  Digital  Radio  Alliance—a  consortium  of  broadcasters  that  in-
cludes  almost  all  major  players,  including  Clear  Channel  Communications,  CBS, 
and  ABC  Radio—the  terrestrial  radio  industry  has  committed  hundreds  of  millions 
of dollars to promoting this technology. That investment already has had proven ef-
fects. Approximately 1,200 HD Radio stations are already on the air, and hundreds 
more have licensed HD Radio technology. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

8 

In addition, the availability of HD Radio receivers is steadily and rapidly increas-
ing.  A  year  ago,  there  were  only  four  or  five  HD  Radio  models  available  and  the 
lowest  price  was  $599.  Now  there  are  30  manufacturers  of  radios  and  price  points 
under $200. HD Radio is now available on all new BMW vehicles and in RadioShack 
stores. Wal-Mart, the Nation’s largest retailer, recently announced plans to sell HD 
Radio receivers. Statements and materials from the HD Digital Radio Alliance clear-
ly position HD Radio as a counterpoint to satellite radio. 

Internet  Radio:  Internet  radio  is  another  formidable  and  fast-growing  player  in 
the  audio  entertainment  market.  A  2006  Arbitron  study  found  that  weekly 
listenership  to  Internet  radio  had  increased  50  percent  in  just  1  year,  and  now  ap-
proaches  one  in  five  Americans  among  key  demographic  segments.  In  one  survey, 
34.5  percent  of  Americans  aged  15–24  mentioned  online  streaming  as  a  primary 
source  of  music  consumption  in  2006  (up  from  9.7  percent  in  2004).  Internet  radio 
broadcasts have no geographic limitations and can provide listeners with radio pro-
gramming  from  around  the  country  and  the  world.  Several  Internet  radio  services, 
including  Yahoo!  LAUNCHcast  and  Pandora,  allow  users  to  create  their  own  radio 
stations based on their listening preferences. 

Internet  radio,  like  HD  Radio,  is  becoming  a  source  for  mobile  audio  entertain-
ment  as  well.  Slacker,  a  service  unveiled  just  weeks  ago,  allows  users  not  only  to 
customize  their  music  channels,  but  also  to  listen  to  them  on  portable  devices,  in-
cluding  in  their  cars;  the  service  includes  a  free,  advertising-based  version  as  well 
as  a  subscription  option.  Various  Internet  radio  offerings  are  already  available  on 
mobile  phones,  and  Internet  radio  is  expected  to  become  widely  available  on  port-
able devices, including car radios, by 2008. 

iPods and Other MP3 Players: MP3 players, such as iPods, also compete with sat-
ellite  radio  for  listeners.  More  than  116  million  MP3  players  have  been  sold.  Like 
other  audio  competitors,  MP3  players  are  highly  mobile.  There  are  now  a  variety 
of accessories available to play MP3 players in cars, through the vehicle’s FM radio 
or  tape  deck.  In  addition,  Apple  recently  announced  that  it  has  teamed  with  Ford, 
General Motors, and Mazda to provide iPod integration across the majority of their 
brands  and  models.  With  the  addition  of  these  models,  more  than  70  percent  of 
2007-model U.S. automobiles are expected to offer iPod integration. Many MP3 play-
ers  also  can  be  connected  to  online  music  subscription  services,  such  as  Real  Net-
work’s Rhapsody, Napster 2.0 and Yahoo! Unlimited. 

Mobile  Phones:  Mobile  phones  represent  yet  another  significant  and  expanding 
means  of  enjoying  audio  entertainment.  Approximately  75  percent  of  all  Americans 
currently  own  a  mobile  phone,  and  the  possibility  of  content  delivery  has  not  been 
lost  on  wireless  carriers.  Several  major  carriers  are  now  offering  audio  entertain-
ment options, and subscribers are taking advantage of them in dramatically growing 
numbers. For example, Sprint currently offers over 50 channels of radio and stream-
ing  video  that  subscribers  can  access  via  their  devices  for  a  monthly  fee  as  well  as 
music download capabilities for a one-time fee. AT&T and Verizon Wireless provide 
similar  services.  Approximately  23.5  million  wireless  subscribers  currently  own 
phones  with  integrated  music  players.  This  demonstrated  consumer  interest  in 
music-capable handsets likely will skyrocket in a matter of months when AT&T and 
Apple make the Apple iPhone available for sale. 

In addition, a number of other companies and consortiums have announced plans 
to deliver broadcast audio and video content through mobile phones and other wire-
less devices. Three companies—MediaFLO USA, HiWire, and Modeo—have acquired 
nationwide or near-nationwide spectrum to deliver audio and video content through 
existing  wireless  service  providers  and  are  in  the  process  of  implementing,  testing, 
and launching service. A joint venture of Sprint and several cable companies is im-
plementing a similar mobile entertainment platform. 

The  above  list  is  by  no  means  exhaustive.  To  be  a  competitor,  businesses  and 
technologies  need  not  be  exact  copies  of  one  another.  There  are  numerous  other 
audio  entertainment  options  available  today  as  well  as  a  constantly  growing  array 
of  choices  in  the  works.  Moreover,  it  is  clear  that  these  providers  view  themselves 
as being in direct competition with each other. In public filings and statements, var-
ious members of the radio broadcasting industry have emphatically stated that they 
compete directly with satellite radio and other forms of audio entertainment—a view 
that  is  underscored  by  the  fervent  opposition  they  expressed  toward  the  pending 
transaction  before  the  ink  on  the  merger  agreement  was  even  dry.  By  the  same 
token,  Sirius  and  XM  have  listed  a  wide  range  of  audio  entertainment  competitors 
in their SEC filings. 

Just by way of example, NAB recently explained in the context of the FCC’s ongo-
ing media ownership proceeding that ‘‘local radio stations compete for listeners with 
other  forms  of  audio  delivery  offering  an  almost  unlimited  array  of  content.  iPods 
and  other  MP3  players,  music  services,  podcasting  and  the  Internet  streaming  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

9 

U.S.  and  foreign  radio  stations  literally  provide  content  from  around  the  world  to 
listeners in each local radio market in America.’’ Such statements remove any doubt 
concerning the diversity and multiplicity of options available in the audio entertain-
ment market today. 
B.  Given  the  Widespread  Competition  in  the  Audio  Entertainment  Market,  the 
Merged  Company  Will  Not  Have  the  Ability  to  Harm  Existing  Competitors  or 
New Market Entrants 

In  an  attempt  to  cast  doubt  on  the  merits  of  a  Sirius-XM  merger,  some  broad-
casters  now  appear  to  be  reversing  course  and  questioning  whether  satellite  radio 
fully  competes  with  AM/FM  radio  and  other  audio  services.  Pointing  to  differences 
between various audio services, some even try to make the case that satellite radio 
is  a  market  onto  itself  and,  therefore,  that  the  proposed  merger  will  create  a  ‘‘mo-
nopoly’’  that  will  have  the  ability  and  incentives  to  harm  competition  and  con-
sumers. Of course, this artificially narrow characterization conflicts with the expan-
sive audio market that broadcasters publicly have described elsewhere. 

But  broadcasters  cannot  have  it  both  ways.  As  the  industry’s  own  prior  state-
ments  make  clear,  the  fact  is  that  the  market  for  audio  entertainment  is  highly 
competitive now, and it will continue to be so after a Sirius-XM merger. 

Given  the  realities  of  today’s  audio  entertainment  landscape,  there  is  no  legiti-
mate basis for concern that this merger will enable the new company to charge ‘‘mo-
nopoly’’  prices  or  otherwise  harm  consumers  or  competitors.  In  reality,  a  combined 
satellite radio provider will be unable to exercise market power, let alone dominate 
the market. 

As  explained  above,  although  satellite  radio  has  proven  to  be  an  appealing  and 
popular  new  product,  it  accounts  for  only  a  small  slice  of  the  audio  entertainment 
market.  The  combined  company  will  serve  only  a  minor  fraction  of  the  consumers 
who  purchase  or  use  audio  entertainment  services.  Given  that  Sirius  and  XM  to-
gether  account  for  only  about  3  percent  of  all  radio  listening,  we  will  have  every 
incentive to offer prices that will attract more subscribers, not drive them away. 

In addition, customers can and do easily substitute other audio entertainment op-
tions  for  satellite  radio,  and  this  will  continue  to  be  the  case  after  the  merger.  In-
deed,  many  of  the  existing  options  are  potentially  more  appealing  and  less  costly 
to  consumers.  For  example,  AM/FM  radio,  as  well  as  HD  Radio,  currently  offers 
much of the same content as satellite radio for free to all consumers. And the ubiq-
uitous nature of AM/FM radios provides consumers with broad exposure to the pro-
gramming  of  broadcasters.  The  merged  company’s  prices  will  continue  to  be  con-
strained  by  these  inescapable  facts.  Similarly,  online  music  subscription  services 
and podcasting enable consumers to replicate most of the content and the user expe-
rience available through satellite radio. Moreover, Internet radio is capable of offer-
ing more variety and choice than any other option, and allows listeners to have sub-
stantial control over content selection and information about artists. 

As a further illustration of the substitutable nature of various audio services, sev-
eral  audio  providers  actively  have  been  expanding  their  capabilities  so  that  their 
services more closely resemble satellite radio. For example, terrestrial radio has in-
creased  its  format  options  while  reducing  commercials.  HD  Radio  provides  higher- 
quality  sound  that  is  comparable  to  satellite  radio,  as  well  as  expanded  genres  and 
music  formats.  New  automobiles  increasingly  come  with  input  jacks  that  can  be 
used to connect MP3 players or factory-installed iPod integration kits, similar to sat-
ellite  radio.  Likewise,  vehicles  soon  will  support  Internet  radio  and  music  over  mo-
bile phones. 

Given  the  existing  and  emerging  capabilities  of  a  range  of  audio  entertainment 
services,  it  is  not  surprising  that  consumers  routinely  avail  themselves  of  multiple 
options.  In  addition,  many  users  of  newer  services,  such  as  MP3  players  and  sat-
ellite radio, continue to rely on terrestrial radio. These factors will continue to exist, 
and to impact the behavior of satellite radio and other market participants after the 
merger. 

Finally,  aside  from  this  existing,  vibrant  competition,  entry  by  new  competitors 
and  expansion  of  current  services  will  remain  viable  notwithstanding  the  pending 
merger.  New  wireless  networks  are  already  under  construction,  which  will  support 
mobile  audio  services  via  devices  such  as  mobile  phones  and  Internet  radio  over 
WiFi and WiMAX. In addition, there appears to be little limit to the growth of Inter-
net radio and podcasting. Other types of spectrum also are available that are capa-
ble  of  supporting  services  comparable  to  satellite  radio.  For  example,  audio  enter-
tainment services similar to satellite can be deployed using the frequencies allocated 
to the Wireless Communications Service. Indeed, this spectrum originally was iden-
tified for satellite radio, but was reallocated pursuant to congressional mandate. The 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

10 

FCC could authorize audio entertainment services using spectrum alternatives with-
out regard to a satellite radio merger. 
III. Conclusion 

Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  members  of  the  Committee,  the 
audio entertainment market today is vibrant, competitive, and innovative, and every 
indication is that it will be even more so in the future. We believe that the combina-
tion  of  Sirius  and  XM  will  be  good  for  consumers  as  it  will  intensify  this  competi-
tion, expand the choices for consumers, and reduce prices. We appreciate this oppor-
tunity  to  share  our  views  with  you,  and  I  look  forward  to  answering  any  questions 
you may have. 
Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Karmazin. May I now 

recognize Mr. Withers. 

STATEMENT OF W. RUSSELL WITHERS, JR., PRESIDENT, 

WITHERS BROADCASTING COMPANIES; ON BEHALF OF THE 

NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF BROADCASTERS 

Mr.  WITHERS.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman 
Stevens,  and  members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Russ  With-
ers. I’m the owner of Withers Broadcasting Companies, which oper-
ates  30  local  radio  stations  and  six  television  stations  in  seven 
states,  including  Missouri  and  West  Virginia.  I’m  testifying  today 
on behalf of the National Association of Broadcasters, where I serve 
as Vice Chairman of the Radio Board and a member of the Execu-
tive  Committee.  And  I’m  here  to  voice  opposition  to  the  proposed 
merger of this country’s only two nationwide satellite radio compa-
nies, XM and Sirius. 

Satellite radio is a national radio service that provides hundreds 
of program channels to listeners across the country. There are only 
two  such  services  and  they  compete  against  each  other  in  the  na-
tional  marketplace.  The  undeniable  fact  is  that  XM  and  Sirius 
want  government  permission  to  take  two  competitive  companies 
and turn them into a monopoly. When the FCC allocated spectrum 
to Sirius and XM in 1997, it specifically ruled against a single mo-
nopoly provider. 

The Commission foresaw the dangers of a monopoly. It explicitly 
licensed more than one provider to ensure intramarket competition 
and to prohibit one satellite radio provider from ever acquiring con-
trol  of  the  other,  and  there  is  no  reason  to  change  that  position 
now.  Currently,  Sirius  and  XM  occupy  the  entire  25  megahertz  of 
spectrum  allocated  by  the  FCC  for  nationwide  satellite  radio  serv-
ice. With the new monopoly and a merged entity, they will continue 
to  control  this  entire  block  of  spectrum,  preventing  any  new  en-
trant  from  offering  national  satellite  radio  service  and  competing 
against their new monopoly. 

These  companies  have  claimed  that  no  one  should  worry  about 
this monopoly because local radio competes against XM and Sirius. 
Let’s be very clear on this point. Radio broadcasters do not compete 
in  the  national  market  of  the  satellite  radio  companies,  but  XM 
and  Sirius  do  compete  in  the  local  radio  markets,  markets  that  I 
operate  in  every  day,  markets  like  Cape  Girardeau  and  Sikeston, 
Missouri. Local radio stations can only broadcast within their FCC 
defined  coverage  area.  Local  broadcaster  signals  are  not  nation-
wide, and they are not subscription-based. The national availability 
of satellite radio sets it apart from local broadcasters. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

11 

I  operate  in  small  and  medium  markets  like  Bridgeport  and 
Clarksburg,  West  Virginia,  where  we  are  the  voice  of  the  commu-
nity  in  times  of  emergency.  In  West  Virginia  this  week  it  was  the 
flood  warnings;  in  Illinois  and  Missouri  for  the  last  2  weeks  it’s 
been  the  tornado  alerts.  We  are  the  voice  of  unique  connection  to 
our  listeners  that  no  other  medium  provides.  XM  and  Sirius,  by 
contrast,  offer  a  prepackaged  bundle  of  national,  mobile,  digital 
audio  channels.  KGMO  in  Cape  Girardeau  delivers  outstanding 
local  news,  sports,  and  entertainment.  Consumers,  however,  would 
never  consider  my  station’s  local  programming  a  comparable  prod-
uct to Sirius’ 133 channels or XM’s 170. 

A local radio station’s programming is clearly not a substitute for 
the  array  of  services  offered  by  XM  and  Sirius.  Services  like  XM 
and Sirius compete with each other and no one else in the national 
satellite radio market. In fact, a recent FCC report and analysis on 
satellite  market  conditions  shows  a  very  healthy  and  competitive 
national  satellite  radio  market.  Following  U.S.  Department  of  Jus-
tice merger guidelines, the FCC defines the market participants as 
two providers: XM and Sirius. The report also finds the geographic 
aspect  of  this  market  to  be  national,  subscription,  and  offering  na-
tionwide licensed choices. These are inherently different character-
istics and services than that of local radio broadcasters. 

I  can  understand  why  XM  and  Sirius  would  want  a  monopoly. 
But  that  does  not  mean  that  it  is  in  the  public  interest.  XM  and 
Sirius by their own admission are not failing companies. Their cur-
rent highly leveraged position is due to extraordinary fees paid for 
marketing  and  on-air  talent,  including  the  $500  million  contract 
that  Sirius  awarded  to  Howard  Stern  and  the  $83  million  bonus 
paid to him just last year. 

But  even  with  these  costs,  XM  and  Sirius  have  made  clear  that 
they  can  succeed  without  a  merger.  For  these  reasons  and  others, 
local broadcasters strongly oppose a government sanctioned monop-
oly for satellite radio. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Withers follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF W.  RUSSELL WITHERS,  JR.,  PRESIDENT,  WITHERS 
BROADCASTING COMPANIES;  ON BEHALF OF THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF 
BROADCASTERS 
Good  morning  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  Committee  Mem-
bers, my name is W. Russell Withers, Jr. The Withers Broadcasting Companies own 
and  operate  30  local  radio  stations  and  six  television  stations  in  seven  states.  I  am 
a  member  of  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  National  Association  of  Broadcasters 
(NAB), on whose behalf I am testifying today. NAB is a trade association that advo-
cates on behalf of more than 8,300 free, local radio and television stations and also 
broadcast  networks  before  Congress,  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  and 
other Federal agencies, and the courts. 

My message this morning could not be simpler. The proposed merger to monopoly 
of  XM  Radio  and  Sirius  Satellite  Radio  must  be  rejected.  A  monopoly  in  satellite 
radio would clearly harm consumers by inviting subscription price increases, stifling 
innovation and reducing program diversity. This monopoly would also jeopardize the 
valuable free over-the-air, advertiser-supported services provided by local radio sta-
tions. Free, over-the-air broadcasters are currently investing in new technologies, in-
cluding  digital  audio  broadcasting,  which  will  enhance  their  stations’  competitive-
ness  and  ability  to  serve  local  communities  and  audiences.  All  local  stations  ask  is 
for  a  fair  opportunity  to  compete  in  today’s  digital  marketplace  on  a  level  playing 
field. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

To  Preserve  a  Fair  and  Level  Competitive  Playing  Field,  a  Government- 

Sanctioned Satellite Radio Monopoly Must Be Rejected 

12 

Local  radio  stations  are  embracing  the  future  by  investing  significant  financial 
and  human  resources  in  new  technologies,  including  high  definition  (HD)  digital 
radio  and  Internet  streaming,  so  that  we  can  continue  to  compete  in  a  digital  mar-
ketplace and improve our service to local communities and listeners in myriad ways. 
For  example,  HD  radio  offers  crystal-clear  audio;  the  ability  to  air  multiple  free 
over-the-air programming streams; and the capability to offer additional services, in-
cluding  wireless  data  enabling  text  information  such  as  song  titles  and  artists  or 
weather  and  traffic  alerts.  All  local  broadcasters  ask  is  for  the  opportunity  to  com-
pete  in  today’s  digital  marketplace  on  a  fair  and  level  playing  field.  The  proposed 
merger to monopoly of XM Radio and Sirius Satellite Radio must accordingly be re-
jected. 

Plainly  stated,  XM  and  Sirius  are  asking  the  government  to  grant  them  the  sole 
license  to  the  entire  25  MHz  of  spectrum  allocated  to  satellite  radio  service.  That 
is  a  state-sanctioned  monopoly  with  an  absolute  barrier  to  entry  by  any  other  com-
petitor.  Currently,  XM  carries  over  170  channels  of  audio  programming,  and  Sirius 
offers  over  130  channels.  A  combined  satellite  radio  entity  would  thus  control  ap-
proximately three hundred channels of radio programming in every local market in 
the United States, without any realistic check on its ability to assert market power. 
Even  the  largest  cities,  such  as  New  York  and  Los  Angeles,  do  not  have  anywhere 
close to 300 terrestrial radio stations, and smaller communities have a mere fraction 
of this number of stations, which, of course, are not all controlled by the same enti-
ty. 

The  drawbacks  of  a  monopoly  in  any  industry  are  clear.  Monopolists  have  the 
ability to raise consumer prices with little constraint, to discriminate, and to other-
wise  engage  in  anti-competitive  practices.  They  need  not  compete  with  other  pro-
viders  to  offer  top-quality  services.  Monopoly  providers  do  not  respond  quickly  to 
consumer wants and needs; as a result, innovation suffers. In short, there is no rea-
son  to  grant  the  proposed  merger  to  monopoly  in  the  market  for  national,  multi-
channel mobile audio programming services. 
The XM-Sirius Merger Will Create a Monopoly in the Marketplace 

XM  and  Sirius  claim  that  they  would  not  be  a  monopoly  if  they  combined,  but 
just  one  more  competitor  providing  audio  services.  The  companies  would  have  Con-
gress,  regulatory  agencies  and  consumers  ignore  the  fact  that  a  merged  XM-Sirius 
would  be  the  only  licensee  of  all  satellite  radio  spectrum;  ignore  the  fact  that  no 
other  entity  can  enter  the  satellite  radio  market;  and  ignore  the  fact  that  they 
would  be  able  to  use  their  monopoly  power  to  the  detriment  of  local  free  over-the- 
air  radio  stations,  which  must  sell  advertising  based  on  the  numbers  of  listeners 
they attract. There is no doubt that the effect of the proposed combination ‘‘may be 
substantially to lessen competition, or to tend to create a monopoly’’ in the provision 
of satellite radio services, contrary to antitrust law.1 

Local stations do not compete in the national market for the multichannel mobile 
audio  services  offered  only  by  XM  and  Sirius.  Broadcasters’  signals  are  not  nation-
wide,  do  not  move  from  one  geographic  area  to  another,  and  are  not  available  only 
by subscription. Free over-the-air programming, unlike satellite radio programming, 
must primarily depend on commercial advertising. Even utilizing digital technology, 
local  stations  can  offer  only  a  few  multicast  programming  streams,  in  comparison 
to the hundreds controlled by XM and Sirius. 

As a subscription service with hundreds of channels, satellite radio can also offer 
highly specialized channels that broadcasters who must ‘‘sell’’ their audiences to ad-
vertisers would be economically unable to offer. Sirius, for instance, offers an ‘‘Elvis 
Radio’’ channel airing all Elvis Presley all the time, while XM has a channel devoted 
solely to movie soundtracks. In addition, broadcasters do not—and cannot under ex-
isting law and regulation—air certain content offered by subscription satellite radio, 
particularly  content  that  would  invite  indecency  complaints  and  enforcement  ac-
tions.  XM,  for  example,  offers  a  number  of  channels  labeled  ‘‘XL’’  that  frequently 
feature explicit language; these channels include hard rock, heavy metal, punk and 
hip-hop music and uncensored comedy. Sirius also has a number of ‘‘uncut’’ and ‘‘un-
censored’’  channels,  including  hip-hop,  comedy,  talk  (such  as  Howard  Stern),  and 
Maxim,  Cosmo  and  Playboy  radio.  For  all  these  reasons,  local  terrestrial  radio 
broadcasting  is  not  a  substitute  for  national  multichannel  satellite  radio,  and  con-
sumers regard these services as distinct. 

1 Section 7 of Clayton Act, 15 U.S.C. § 18. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

13 

Indeed,  when  initially  authorizing  satellite  digital  audio  radio  service  (DARS)  in 
1997,  the  FCC  itself  recognized  that  satellite  radio,  with  its  national  reach,  offers 
‘‘services that local radio inherently cannot provide.’’ 2 For example, unlike local ter-
restrial radio stations, satellite radio can provide continuous service to the long-dis-
tance  motoring  public  and  to  persons  living  in  remote  areas.  XM  has  stated  that 
its  nationwide  service  can  reach  nearly  100  million  listeners  age  twelve  and  older 
who  are  outside  the  50  largest  Arbitron  radio  markets  (with  the  largest  number  of 
radio stations). XM also estimates that, of these 100 million listeners, 36 million live 
outside the largest 276 Arbitron markets and that 22 million people age twelve and 
older receive five or fewer terrestrial radio stations.3 Unlike even the most powerful 
terrestrial  radio  stations,  which  can  still  only  reach  a  mere  fraction  of  American 
consumers  over-the-air,  satellite  radio  can  reach  all  listeners  across  the  country 
with  vastly  more  channels  than  any  single  terrestrial  broadcaster.  Other  media  in-
dustry  observers  have  agreed  that  ‘‘[s]atellite  radio  is  a  national  platform,’’  thereby 
clearly  differing  from  locally-licensed  and  locally-oriented  terrestrial  broadcast  sta-
tions.4 Simply  put,  only  XM  and  Sirius  compete  in  this  national,  multichannel  mo-
bile radio market, and they are proposing to create a monopoly in that market. 

From the point of view of a local broadcaster, I think it’s clear that only XM and 
Sirius compete in this market for national multichannel radio services. Assume, for 
instance,  that  the  merged  XM-Sirius  were  to  raise  its  subscription  rate  a  small 
amount, such as 5 percent. After this price increase, would XM-Sirius lose so many 
customers to other providers such as my local stations that the price increase would 
be  unprofitable  for  the  combined  company?  If  not,  then  free  over-the-air  radio  and 
other audio services are not substitutes for satellite radio and do not compete in the 
same market as providers of satellite radio services. 

Given  the  substantial  differences  between  a  nationwide,  multichannel  subscrip-
tion  audio  service  and  local,  advertiser-supported  over-the-air  radio  service,  it  is 
highly  unlikely  that  a  consumer  currently  subscribing  to  satellite  radio  would  drop 
their subscriptions and substitute other audio services for satellite DARS if the price 
of satellite radio were to increase by a small but significant amount, such as 5 per-
cent  or  even  five  to  ten  percent.  After  XM  in  2005  raised  its  monthly  price  from 
$9.99 to $12.95 (a nearly 30 percent increase), the company continued to experience 
significant and rapid subscriber growth.5 

The parties to the proposed merger have certainly not shown that terrestrial radio 
or  other  audio  technologies  such  as  iPods  would  have  a  constraining  effect  on  the 
ability  of  a  combined  XM-Sirius  to  raise  prices.  In  fact,  Sirius  CEO  Mel  Karmazin 
stated  in  January  that  Sirius  was  ‘‘open’’  to  higher  pricing;  that  Sirius  believed 
there was ‘‘elasticity in our price point;’’ and that price increases are ‘‘a good option 
for  us.’’ 6 If  Sirius  believed  that  it  could  successfully  raise  its  subscription  prices, 
even  in  the  face  of  competition  from  XM,  then  clearly  a  combined  XM-Sirius  would 
feel  little  if  any  competitive  restraints  in  increasing  subscriber  fees.  Indeed,  Mr. 
Karmazin  has  pointed  out  that  in  Canada  where  Sirius  has  a  ‘‘significant  lead  in 
satellite radio,’’ their service is ‘‘priced at a higher price point.’’ 7 This confidence in 
the  ability  of  satellite  radio  providers  to  increase  their  prices  without  losing  sub-
scribers  shows  that  satellite  radio  is  the  relevant  product  market  for  any  antitrust 
analysis. 

Other evidence suggests that demand for satellite radio services is highly inelastic 
and would not be significantly lessened by increases in subscriber fees. For instance, 
there is an extremely low ‘‘churn’’ rate among satellite radio subscribers.8 This indi-
cates  that  other  audio  services  are  not  regarded  by  consumers  as  effective  sub-
stitutes for satellite radio. 

It is also instructive to note that when analyzing the comparable proposed merger 
of  EchoStar  and  DIRECTV,  the  only  two  providers  of  satellite  television  services, 
the  FCC  tentatively  defined  the  relevant  market  as  ‘‘no  broader  than  the  entire 
MVPD  [multichannel  video  programming  distribution]  market.’’  However,  the  FCC 

2 Establishment  of  Rules  and  Policies  for  the  Digital  Audio  Radio  Satellite  Service,  12  FCC 

Rcd 5754, 5760–61 (1997) (Satellite DARS Report & Order). 

3 XM Satellite Radio, Inc., Annual Report (SEC Form 10–K) at 2 (March 15, 2001). 
4 Katy Bachman, Buyers: Size Not Enough for Sirius-XM Merger, Media Week (Feb. 26, 2007) 

(quoting Matt Feinberg, Senior Vice President of Zenith Media). 

5 See  Testimony  of  David  A.  Balto  before  the  U.S.  Senate  Committee  on  the  Judiciary,  The 

XM-Sirius Merger: Monopoly or Competition from New Technologies at 4 (March 20, 2007). 

6 Citigroup  17th  Annual  Entertainment  Media  &  Telecommunications  Conference  (Jan.  10, 

2007), webcast available at http://investor.sirius.com/medialist.cfm. 

7 Id. 
8 See, e.g., Howard’s Way; Satellite Radio, The Economist (Jan. 14, 2006) (churn rate of dissat-
isfied  customers  who  drop  the  service  is  barely  1.5  percent  a  month  for  Sirius,  which  is  among 
the lowest for any subscription business). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

14 

found  that  the  product  market  in  question  ‘‘may  well  be  narrower  than  that,’’  and 
might  include  only  the  two  national  satellite  television  providers,  excluding  multi-
channel  cable  operators  as  well  as  local  terrestrial  broadcast  television  stations.9 
Similarly, local terrestrial radio stations should not be regarded as competing in the 
marketplace for nationwide multichannel satellite radio services. 

Perhaps  most  significantly,  just  last  month  the  FCC  treated  satellite  DARS  as  a 
separate market in a report to Congress on satellite competition.10 The FCC defined 
this market as a ‘‘national’’ one, consisting of ‘‘satellite audio programming provided 
to  persons  within  the  United  States  for  a  fee.’’  FCC  Satellite  Report  at  ¶¶ 55–56. 
Clearly,  local  radio  stations  are  not  participants  in  this  market  for  national  audio 
programming  provided  for  subscription  fees.  Consistent  with  the  FCC’s  analysis,  a 
number of analysts have recently concluded that XM and Sirius are the only partici-
pants in the national multichannel mobile radio market.11 

In sum, it is clear that the proposed merger of XM and Sirius would substantially 
‘‘lessen  competition’’  or  ‘‘tend  to  create  a  monopoly’’  in  the  market  for  nationwide, 
multichannel  mobile  audio  programming  services,  contrary  to  the  Clayton  Act.  As 
explained in detail below, a XM-Sirius merger would further violate FCC rules and 
precedent,  congressional  policy  and  established  antitrust  case  law;  would  result  in 
significant  competitive  harms  without  any  corresponding  public  interest  benefits; 
and  would  reward  companies  with  a  history  of  rule  violations  by  granting  them  a 
monopoly in the provision of nationwide multichannel audio services. 
The  Proposed  Merger  Violates  FCC  Rules  And  Precedent,  Congressional  Policy  and 

Judicial Decisions 

The FCC expressly declined to allow a monopoly when it originally allocated spec-
trum  for  satellite  radio  service  in  1997.  It  chose  not  to  permit  a  monopoly  satellite 
radio  service  because  ‘‘licensing  at  least  two  service  providers  will  help  ensure  that 
subscription rates are competitive as well as provide for a diversity of programming 
voices.’’ Satellite DARS Report & Order, 12 FCC Rcd at 5786. And, I note, the agen-
cy  was  assuming  at  that  time  that  each  provider  would  control  about  50  channels, 
not the 300 channels that a united XM-Sirius would have today. 

Ironically,  the  FCC  in  part  based  its  decision  to  require  multiple  satellite  radio 
providers on arguments presented by Sirius. During the FCC’s consideration of how 
many  different  satellite  radio  providers  it  should  authorize,  Sirius  (then  called  CD 
Radio)  argued  strenuously  that  multiple  providers  were  necessary  to  ‘‘assure  intra- 
service  competition,’’  including  price  competition,  and  to  guarantee  a  diversity  of 
program  offerings.12 Given  these  competitive  concerns,  Sirius  explicitly  stated  that 
no  satellite  radio  provider  should  ever  be  permitted  to  combine  with  another  pro-
vider. See CD Radio Comments at 18. Now, only a few years later, Sirius apparently 
sees  no  problem  with  allowing  the  satellite  radio  service  to  become  monopolized  by 
a single provider with control over the entire national market. 

But  in  fact  it  would  be  entirely  inconsistent  with  the  pro-competitive  satellite 
radio  licensing  scheme  created  by  the  Commission  to  now  allow  XM  and  Sirius  to 
combine  into  a  monopoly  enterprise.  At  the  urging  of  the  parties,  including  Sirius, 
the  Commission  in  1997  explicitly  prohibited  any  such  future  merger  by  deter-
mining  that,  ‘‘after  DARS  licenses  are  granted,  one  licensee  will  not  be  permitted 
to acquire control of the other remaining satellite DARS license.’’ Satellite DARS Re-
port  &  Order,  12  FCC  Rcd  at  5823.  There  is  no  basis  for  reversing  that  decision 
now. 

In a parallel case in 2002, the Commission refused to permit a merger of the only 
two nationwide Direct Broadcast Satellite (DBS) licensees, EchoStar and DIRECTV. 
In  rejecting  this  proposed  merger,  the  Commission  found  in  a  unanimous  vote  that 
the combination would undermine its goals of increased and fair competition in the 
provision of satellite television service. The agency also found that the claimed bene-
fits of efficient spectrum use were outweighed by substantial potential public inter-
est harms that might result from the transaction, including reduced innovation, im-
paired  service  quality  and  higher  subscription  prices.  The  Commission  further 
stressed  that  the  merger  would  eliminate  a  current  viable  competitor  from  every 

9 EchoStar Communications Corp., 17 FCC Rcd 20559, 20609 (2002). 
10 See First Report in IB Docket No. 06–67, FCC 07–34 at ¶¶ 55–57 (rel. March 26, 2007) (FCC 

Satellite Report). 

11 See, e.g., Criterion Economics, LLC, Expert Declaration of J. Gregory Sidak Concerning the 
Competitive  Consequences  of  the  Proposed  Merger  of  Sirius  Satellite  Radio,  Inc.  and  XM  Sat-
ellite  Radio,  Inc.  at  8–33  (March  16,  2007)  (Criterion  Economics  Report);  The  Carmel  Group, 
White  Paper,  Higher  Prices,  Less  Content  and  A  Monopoly:  Good  for  the  Consumer?  The  Pro-
posed  Sirius-XM  Merger,  Its  Harmful  Impact  on  Consumers,  Content  Providers  and  Performing 
Artists at 3–6 (April 2007) (Carmel White Paper). 

12 CD Radio Comments in IB Docket No. 95–91, at 17. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

15 

market  in  the  country  and  would  result  in  one  entity  holding  the  entire  available 
spectrum allocated to the DBS service.13 

For  precisely  the  same  reasons,  XM  and  Sirius  should  not  be  permitted  to  create 
a  monopoly  that  would  eliminate  a  viable  competitor  from  every  market  across  the 
country  and  that  would  control  all  the  spectrum  allocated  to  a  nationwide  satellite 
service.  Such  a  merger  would  likely  ‘‘increase  the  incentive  and  ability’’  of  the  par-
ties  ‘‘to  engage  in  anticompetitive  conduct.’’  EchoStar/DIRECTV  Merger  Order,  17 
FCC Rcd at 20662. 

Beyond violating FCC rules and precedent, such a government-sanctioned monop-
oly would clearly also be inconsistent with congressional policy favoring competition 
over  monopoly,  as  expressed  in  the  1996  Telecommunications  Act,  and  with  long- 
standing  enforcement  of  the  antitrust  laws.  Indeed,  the  courts  have  held  that  even 
mergers  to  duopoly  are,  on  their  face,  anticompetitive  and  contrary  to  the  Federal 
antitrust laws.14 Without question, a merger to monopoly would be anticompetitive, 
inconsistent  with  antitrust  principles  and  contrary  to  judicial  decisions.15 Or,  to 
quote  Sirius  CEO  Mel  Karmazin,  ‘‘it  would  be  great  if  there  was  a  monopoly,  but 
the second best thing is a duopoly.’’ 16 
XM  and  Sirius  Will  Be  Able  To  Exercise  Virtually  Unlimited  Market  Power  in  the 
Closed  National  Radio  Market,  to  the  Detriment  of  Consumers,  Programming 
Suppliers and Other Audio Service Providers 

The  harms  that  would  result  from  this  proposed  merger  would  be  numerous  and 
obvious,  affecting  content  suppliers,  consumers  and  other  providers  of  audio  serv-
ices. Monopoly status would clearly enable the merged company to exert greater le-
verage over programming suppliers, who would be unable to play Sirius and XM off 
each  other  to  obtain  access  to  a  satellite  radio  provider  on  favorable  terms.  If  this 
merger  is  approved,  the  united  XM  and  Sirius  will  be  able  to  dictate  price  to  pro-
gramming suppliers on a ‘‘take it or leave it’’ basis. 

Eliminating  competition  in  the  national  mobile  radio  market  would  also  greatly 
reduce  incentives  for  the  combined  XM  and  Sirius  to  innovate,  to  the  clear  det-
riment  of  consumers.  A  monopolistic  market  structure  is  inevitably  less  innovative 
than a competitive one, and the consumers of satellite radio service will accordingly 
fail to benefit from innovations such as new programming services and technical im-
provements.  An  examination  of  the  past  programming  and  marketing  initiatives  of 
XM  and  Sirius  demonstrates  how  consumers  have  benefited  from  competition  be-
tween them.17 Given the evident incentives for competitors to innovate, it is hardly 
surprising that, when declining to approve the EchoStar/DIRECTV merger, the FCC 
found that the satellite television merger ‘‘would likely reduce innovation and serv-
ice quality.’’ EchoStar/DIRECTV Merger Order, 17 FCC Rcd at 20626. 

Perhaps  most  obviously,  monopoly  status  would  permit  a  merged  XM-Sirius  to 
raise  subscription  fees.  Without  the  presence  of  a  similarly-situated,  direct  compet-
itor,  a  satellite  radio  monopolist  could  raise  rates  without  any  realistic  competitive 
check  on  its  actions.  The  FCC  previously  rejected  the  EchoStar/DIRECTV  merger 
due to concerns that consumers were ‘‘likely to suffer’’ harms from the ‘‘higher prices 
likely  to  result’’  from  the  proposed  satellite  television  combination.  EchoStar/ 
DIRECTV  Merger  Order,  17  FCC  Rcd  at  20626.  The  courts  have  similarly  stopped 
mergers  to  monopoly  on  the  grounds  that  such  mergers  would  allow  the  combined 

13 See  EchoStar  Communications  Corp.,  17  FCC  Rcd  20559,  20562,  20626,  20661–62  (2002) 

(EchoStar/DIRECTV Merger Order). 

Inc., 12 F. Supp. 2d 34, 66 (D.D.C. 1998). 

14 See,  e.g.,  FTC  v.  H.J.  Heinz  Co.,  246  F.3d  708  (D.C.  Cir.  2001);  FTC  v.  Cardinal  Health, 

15 See,  e.g.,  FTC  v.  Staples,  Inc.,  970  F.  Supp.  1066,  1081  (D.D.C.  1997)  (enjoining  merger  of 
two  competing  office  supply  superstores  where  the  merger  would  have  left  only  one  superstore 
competitor in 15 metropolitan areas and only two competing superstores in 27 other areas). 

16 See  http://blog.fastcompany.com/archives/2007/03/14/mellkarmazinslgreatestlhits.ht 

ml?partner=rss, quoting Mel Karmazin from Advertising Age (April 11, 2005). 

17 For  example,  in  2004  after  Sirius  and  the  National  Football  League  executed  a  seven-year 
agreement for carriage of NFL games, XM partnered with Major League Baseball in an 11-year 
agreement  for  carriage  of  baseball  games.  Similarly,  in  2004  Sirius  announced  its  deal  with 
Howard  Stern  shortly  after  XM  announced  the  return  of  ‘‘shock  jocks’’  Opie  &  Anthony.  Just 
a  few  days  apart  in  2005,  XM  announced  a  new  women’s  talk  channel,  and  Sirius  announced 
the  launch  of  the  Cosmopolitan-branded  women’s  channel.  In  early  2006,  XM  announced  cov-
erage  of  Big  East  college  basketball  and  football,  while  Sirius  announced  the  coverage  of  every 
game  of  the  NCAA  basketball  tournament.  Numerous  other  examples  of  competing  program-
ming  initiatives  can  be  cited.  Similar  competitive  actions  and  reactions  can  be  seen  in  the  two 
companies’ introduction of their first portable devices; in the launching of their ‘‘family discount’’ 
and  ‘‘preferred  plan’’  for  additional  subscriptions  at  discounted  rates;  in  reaching  agreements 
with  various  automobile  manufacturers  and  rental  car  companies  for  the  installation  of  their 
satellite radios; and in other promotional efforts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

16 

company  ‘‘to  increase  prices  or  otherwise  maintain  prices  at  an  anti-competitive 
level.’’ FTC v. Staples, 970 F. Supp. at 1082. 

Beyond  resulting  in  rate  increases  for  consumers,  the  XM-Sirius  monopoly  would 
also likely reduce program diversity. As explained by the Commission when author-
izing XM and Sirius, competing satellite radio providers would each have incentives 
to diversify their own program formats, thus providing valuable niche programming. 
See Satellite DARS Report & Order, 12 FCC Rcd at 5762. Without such competition, 
program  diversity  would  likely  be  adversely  affected,  with  consumers  losing  music 
and talk formats, especially niche ones. 

There  is  also  the  very  real  risk  that  a  combined  XM-Sirius  will  use  its  market 
power  to  force  content  providers  (including  providers  of  highly  valued  sports  pro-
gramming)  to  deal  only  with  them,  to  the  detriment  of  consumers  and  other  dis-
tributors  of  audio  programming,  including  local  radio  stations.  If  the  merger  is  ap-
proved,  it  may  only  be  a  matter  of  time  before  the  American  public  can  listen  to 
their  favorite  baseball  or  college  football  team  by  paying  whatever  monopoly  rents 
a combined XM-Sirius chooses to charge. We’ve seen it happen with cable television, 
and  given  the  obvious  incentives,  there  is  every  reason  to  expect  the  same  thing  to 
happen  here.  In  sum,  in  a  monopoly  environment,  satellite  radio  subscribers  would 
pay higher prices for less diverse and less innovative programming. 

Beyond  harming  programming  suppliers  and  consumers,  a  satellite  radio  monop-
oly  would  also  have  the  incentive  and  the  opportunity  to  engage  in  anticompetitive 
practices  against  other  audio  service  providers,  especially  local  radio  broadcasters. 
For  example,  after  a  satellite  monopoly  restructures  (unbundles)  its  program  offer-
ings, as promised, we can expect, based on press reports, that the monopoly will at-
tempt to accelerate the acquisition of new subscribers by offering them a lower-cost 
point  of  entry—likely  a  basic  advertiser-supported  tier  with  fewer  channels  offered 
for less than the current $12.95 per month. On its face, such a plan may not sound 
bad, but of course no introductory price would be locked in and a monopoly provider 
could easily raise this price at a later time to increase profits at the expense of con-
sumers.18 

Furthermore,  the  merger  parties’  announced  intention  to  pursue  advertising  rev-
enue  is  plainly  problematic  when  one  considers  the  monopoly  status  of  the  merged 
satellite radio operator. With monopoly rents from subscription service, the satellite 
radio  monopoly  would  have  the  incentive  and  ability  to  cross  subsidize  its  adver-
tiser-supported  channel  offerings  using  the  monopoly  rents  from  subscription  serv-
ice, likely resulting in unfair competition in the form of predatory, cut-throat pricing 
in national advertising markets. In addition, the satellite radio monopoly would not 
stop  at  national  advertising.  The  extensive  terrestrial  repeater  networks  of  Sirius 
and  XM,  when  combined  under  common  control,  would  offer  substantial  opportuni-
ties for entry into local advertising markets by a satellite radio monopoly. The rates 
for  local  advertising  could  be  set  artificially  low  with  cross-subsidization  from  mo-
nopoly  subscription  fees.  The  valuable  free,  over-the-air  service  provided  by  local 
radio  stations—which  is  entirely  advertiser-supported—would  be  jeopardized  by 
these  developments.  Ultimately,  listeners  and  local  communities  would  be  the  los-
ers,  as  important  services,  including  local  news  and  emergency  information,  are 
eroded by a lack of advertising revenues to support them. 

A merged XM-Sirius could moreover maintain any supra-competitive subscription 
prices  or  predatory  behavior  toward  other  audio  service  providers  because  satellite 
radio is a closed market. No other entity can enter the national multichannel audio 
service market. The FCC has not authorized any other licensees to provide satellite 
DARS. Even in the highly unlikely event that the FCC would in the future allocate 
additional  spectrum  to  this  service  to  permit  entry  by  new  satellite  providers,  this 
entry would clearly be insufficient to mitigate the anticompetitive effects of the pro-
posed  merger.  For  example,  the  Department  of  Justice  requires  that,  for  potential 
entry  to  be  considered,  it  must  generally  be  achieved  within  2  years.19 This  is  ex-
tremely  unlikely  in  the  case  of  satellite  radio,  as  it  took  XM  and  Sirius  nearly  4 
years  from  the  grant  of  spectrum  by  the  FCC  to  commercial  availability,  including 
the technically challenging step of launching satellites. Other entry barriers are also 
very  high,  including  the  capital  costs  (such  as  the  costs  of  multi-million  dollar  sat-
ellites),  programming  acquisition  costs,  and  subscriber  acquisition  costs.  Therefore, 
the  threat  of  entry  by  other  entities  will  be  completely  ineffective  in  constraining 

18 The  combined  XM-Sirius  could  also  easily  raise  rates  on  other  packages  of  programming, 

including ones most similar to the programming being offered today. 

19 See U.S. Department of Justice & Federal Trade Commission, Horizontal Merger Guidelines 

at 25–26 (April 8, 1997) (DOJ Merger Guidelines). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

17 

short-term  (or  even  long-term)  price  increases  or  other  anticompetitive  behavior  by 
the combined XM-Sirius. 

The  anticompetitive  effects  of  the  proposed  merger  are  thus  enhanced  by  not 
merely high, but practically insurmountable, barriers to entry. The courts have con-
sistently  rejected  mergers  where  the  merging  parties  were  unable  to  show  that  re-
duced  competition  caused  by  the  merger  would  be  ameliorated  by  competition  from 
new entrants that could come into the market.20 
No Marketplace or Business Conditions Justify the Risk of Monopoly 

There is no need to risk all these harms to consumers, content suppliers and other 
audio  service  providers  by  creating  a  national  monopoly.  Satellite  radio  is  still  in 
its  early  stages  of  development.  And  neither  XM  nor  Sirius  is  a  failing  company. 
From an economic perspective, the classic ‘‘shut down’’ analysis demonstrates that 
a firm will exit an industry when its average variable cost exceeds price, which im-
plies  that  the  last  unit  sold  makes  a  negative  contribution  to  the  firm’s  margins. 
When  applied  to  XM  and  Sirius,  there  is  no  basis  to  conclude  that  either  company 
is  ready  to  exit  the  industry.  A  review  of  reports  by  equity  analysts  demonstrates 
that Sirius and XM are currently earning positive margins on their last subscribers. 
Moreover,  as  satellite  radio  penetration  rates  increase,  average  variable  costs  will 
decrease  and  thereby  generate  even  larger  margins.  Thus,  there  is  no  basis  in  eco-
nomic  fact  for  a  failing-firm  argument.  See  Criterion  Economics  Report  at  3–4;  43. 
A  very  recent  analysis  by  the  Carmel  Group  concluded  that  ‘‘there  is  no  liquidity 
crisis on the horizon for satellite radio’’ and that ‘‘both Sirius and XM have enough 
cash to support their current business models.’’ Carmel White Paper at 4–5. 

In  fact,  Sirius  and  XM  do  not  believe  they  will  go  out  of  business  if  the  merger 
does not occur. Sirius CEO Mel Karmazin has publicly stated that he is ‘‘optimistic’’ 
about  the  company’s  future  whether  or  not  the  merger  takes  place.21 In  a  recent 
filing  with  the  Securities  and  Exchange  Commission,  XM  disclosed  a  set  of  ques-
tions-andanswers  regarding  the  merger  prepared  for  and  distributed  to  its  employ-
ees.  I  quote:  ‘‘Can  Sirius  and  XM  succeed  as  stand-alone  companies  if  the  merger 
is  not  approved  by  regulators?—YES.  That  said,  we  believe  a  merger  is  the  pre-
ferred  option  for  Sirius  and  XM,  our  shareholders  and  customers  . . . .’’  Of  course 
Sirius  and  XM  would  prefer  not  to  compete  with  one  another,  and  would  prefer  to 
reap the benefits afforded by monopoly status. What company wouldn’t? That’s why 
the United States has and enforces antitrust laws. 

Claims  that  XM  and  Sirius  are  weak  or  failing  businesses  based  on  their  levels 
of debt and expenses must be viewed skeptically. It is true that XM and Sirius have 
had  some  extraordinary  expenses—like  the  nearly  $83  million  in  stock  that  Sirius 
awarded to Howard Stern in January, on his first anniversary on satellite radio. In-
deed,  the  high  costs  of  locking-up  national  and  regional  programming,  especially 
sports programming, on an exclusive basis accounts for a great deal of the cost over-
head.  But  should  companies  expect  a  government  bailout  for  questionable  business 
decisions?  And  the  fact  that  XM  and  Sirius  experienced  losses  in  the  past  as  they 
first launched their businesses has little bearing on either company’s ability to make 
positive  earnings  going  forward.22 Just  last  month,  the  FCC  reported  that  the  two 
satellite  radio  providers  had  high  growth  rates  for  both  subscribers  and  revenues 
and that revenues per user have begun to rise. FCC Satellite Report at ¶ 180. 

Changes  in  the  audio  marketplace  do  not  justify  this  merger  either.  These 
changes  have  encouraged  local  radio  stations  to  enhance  their  competitiveness  by 
converting  to  digital  audio  broadcasting  and  by  utilizing  the  Internet  for  streaming 
and  podcasting.  But  the  introduction  of  new  audio  products  has  not  prompted  ter-
restrial  radio  broadcasters  to  ask  for  an  unjustified  government  licensed  and  sanc-
tioned monopoly. For all the reasons described above, monopolies are inherently bad 
and should not be permitted. 
XM and Sirius Have a Long History of Violating FCC Rules 

The  government  cannot  and  should  not  rely  on  any  promises  that  a  united  XM 
and Sirius, as a government-sanctioned monopoly, will not cause harm to consumers 
or other audio service providers. Their past behavior in a number of instances shows 
otherwise. 

First,  when  initially  authorizing  satellite  radio,  the  FCC  adopted  a  rule  on  re-
ceiver  interoperability  that  was  designed  to  promote  competition  by  enhancing  con-

20 See,  e.g.,  FTV  v.  Heinz,  246  F.3d  at  717;  FTC  v.  Staples,  970  F.  Supp.  at  1086–87;  FTC 

v. Swedish Match, 131 F. Supp. 2d 151, 170–71 (D.D.C. 2000). 

21 Maxwell Murphy, Karmazin Talks Sirius-XM Pact on Stern Show, Dow Jones News Service 

(Feb. 26, 2007). 

ize positive earnings in 2007’’). 

22 Criterion Economics Report at 46–47 (finding that ‘‘both Sirius and XM are expected to real-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

18 

sumers’  ability  to  switch  between  satellite  providers.  Satellite  DARS  Report  & 
Order, 12 FCC Rcd at 5796. Despite a clear FCC directive that their satellite radio 
systems  must  include  ‘‘a  receiver  that  will  permit  end  users  to  access  all  licensed 
satellite  DARS  systems  that  are  operational  or  under  construction,’’ 23 no  such  de-
vice is available to consumers today. While both companies certified nearly 10 years 
ago  that  they  would  comply  with  this  pro-competition,  pro-consumer  requirement, 
neither XM nor Sirius markets a consumer-friendly interoperable device. 

Second,  both  XM  and  Sirius  have  violated  FCC  rules  governing  the  production 
and  distribution  of  their  receiver  equipment,24 which  are  designed  to  ensure  that 
these types of devices do not interfere with broadcast radio stations or other licensed 
spectrum  users.  As  a  result  of  XM  and  Sirius  producing  and  distributing  receiver 
equipment  that  violates—and  in  a  number  of  cases  very  greatly  exceeds—FCC  lim-
its  on  the  power  levels  for  such  equipment,  many  listeners  to  terrestrial  radio  sta-
tions  experience  ‘‘bleedthrough’’  and  receive  the  XM  or  Sirius  signal  without  warn-
ing  through  their  radios.  As  has  been  widely  reported,  the  FCC  has  received  many 
complaints  from  both  commercial  and  noncommercial  listeners  who  suddenly  hear 
uncensored and unwelcome satellite radio programming on their car radios.25 Local 
radio stations concerned about this interference to their services have forwarded nu-
merous listener complaints to the FCC. 

Third,  both  XM  and  Sirius  have  routinely  and  regularly  violated  FCC  technical 
rules in connection with their special temporary authority to use terrestrial repeat-
ers. For years XM operated more than 142 repeaters (or 18 percent of all its repeat-
ers) at unauthorized locations and at least 19 of its repeaters without any FCC au-
thorization at all. Even after confessing and seeking the agency’s forgiveness for its 
violations,  XM  to  our  knowledge  currently  continues  to  operate  at  least  four  of  its 
repeaters without any FCC authorization. Also troubling is XM’s confession that for 
years  it  has  operated  more  than  221  terrestrial  repeaters  (or  28  percent  of  all  its 
repeaters)  at  unlawful  power  levels.  In  mid-February,  the  FCC  issued  a  Letter  of 
Inquiry  to  XM  about  its  unlawful  repeater  network.  Sirius  has  engaged  in  com-
parable  and  other  technical  violations  in  connection  with  its  terrestrial  repeaters, 
constructing  at  least  11  of  its  repeaters  at  locations  different  from  what  they  re-
ported  to  the  FCC,  including  one  in  Michigan  that  is  67  miles  away  from  its  re-
ported and authorized location. 

Against  this  backdrop  of  rule  violations,  allowing  XM  and  Sirius  to  merge,  con-
trary to previous FCC decisions and decades of communications policy and antitrust 
law, would be, at the least, unjustified and unwise. Granting these companies a mo-
nopoly  would  likely  further  embolden  them  to  pay  even  less  attention  to  the  rules 
of the road and to consumer welfare in the future. 
The  Proposed  XM-Sirius  Merger  Will  Generate  No  Public  Interest  Benefits  and 

Should Be Summarily Rejected 

Without  question,  XM  and  Sirius  will  be  unable  to  meet  their  burden  of  proof 
demonstrating  the  high  level  of  public  interest  benefits  to  even  consider  granting 
a government-sanctioned monopoly. As an initial matter, ‘‘[e]fficiencies almost never 
justify  a  merger  to  monopoly  or  near  monopoly,’’  such  as  the  proposed  XM-Sirius 
merger.26 

In  declining  to  approve  the  comparable  EchoStar/DIRECTV  merger,  the  FCC  ex-
plained  that  where  ‘‘a  merger  is  likely  to  result  in  a  significant  reduction  in  the 
number  of  competitors  and  a  substantial  increase  in  concentration,  antitrust  au-
thorities  generally  require  the  parties  to  demonstrate  that  there  exist  counter-
vailing,  extraordinarily  large,  cognizable,  and  non-speculative  efficiencies  that  are 
likely  to  result  from  the  merger.’’  EchoStar/DIRECTV  Merger  Order,  17  FCC  Rcd 
at 20604 (emphasis added). The courts have similarly stressed that proof of extraor-
dinary  efficiencies  is  required  to  rebut  the  presumption  that  a  merger  in  a  con-
centrated  market  (such  as  the  current  duopoly  market  for  satellite  radio  service) 
will be anticompetitive. See, e.g., FTC v. Heinz, 246 F.3d at 720–21. Claims of great-
er efficiencies must be verifiable through evidentiary showings that are ‘‘more than 
mere speculation and promises about post-merger behavior.’’ Id. At 721. 

And not only must the parties proposing such a merger show that very significant 
efficiencies would result, they must show that these efficiencies ‘‘would lead to bene-
fits  for  consumers.’’ 27 The  courts  have  rejected  insufficiently  documented  claims 

23 47 CFR § 25.144(a)(3)(ii). 
24 47 CFR Part 15. 
25 See, e.g., ‘‘A Mystery Heard on Radio: It’s Stern’s Show, No Charge,’’ New York Times, Janu-

26 FTC v. Heinz, 246 F.3d at 720, quoting Department of Justice Merger Guidelines, § 4. 
27 United States v. Franklin Electronic Co., Inc., 130 F. Supp. 2d 1025, 1035 (W.D. Wis. 2000). 

ary 26, 2007 at A17. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

19 

from  merger  parties  that  cost  savings  resulting  from  efficiencies  would  actually  be 
passed  on  to  consumers  in  the  form  of  lower  prices.28 Common  sense  further  sug-
gests that a monopolist such as the merged XM-Sirius would have little or no incen-
tive  to  pass  on  cost  savings  to  consumers.  Thus,  unsubstantiated  claims  about  any 
consumer benefits flowing from the large cost savings that would supposedly result 
from  the  XM-Sirius  merger  are  woefully  inadequate  to  justify  a  combination  reduc-
ing competition in a concentrated market. In fact, analysts have expressed consider-
able  doubt  that  XM  and  Sirius  would  even  be  able  to  cut  the  claimed  billions  in 
costs by merging, let alone pass these cost savings onto consumers. An examination 
of  the  companies’  cost  structure  (especially  their  long-term  programming  commit-
ments)  shows  that  achieving  these  cost  savings  will  be  ‘‘very  difficult  and  will  take 
a long time, if it can be done at all.’’ 29 

Moreover,  to  be  considered  in  justifying  a  merger,  claimed  efficiencies  must  be 
‘‘merger-specific’’—that  is,  they  must  be  ones  that  neither  firm  could  achieve  inde-
pendently. If the claimed efficiencies are not merger-specific, then ‘‘the merger’s as-
serted  benefits  can  be  achieved  without  the  concomitant  loss  of  a  competitor.’’  FTC 
v.  Heinz,  246  F.3d  at  721–22.  Claims  that  the  merger  will  allow  XM  and  Sirius  to 
market  equipment  allowing  customers  to  receive  signals  from  both  companies  are 
not  merger-specific; 30 there  is  nothing  preventing  them  from  undertaking  such  a 
project  today  except  for  the  fact  that  they  prefer  to  retain  customers  on  the  basis 
of sunk costs in equipment. Similarly, claims that the combined XM-Sirius will pro-
vide  customers  a  credit  if  they  choose  to  block  adult  programming  are  not  merger- 
specific because XM and Sirius could provide these credits to their customers today 
if they wished. 

Clearly, XM and Sirius will fail to meet their heavy burden of demonstrating the 
efficiencies  and  consumer  benefits  of  their  proposed  merger  to  monopoly.  Rather 
than  producing  ‘‘extraordinarily  large,’’  beneficial  efficiencies,  the  merger,  if  ap-
proved,  would  seriously  impair  marketplace  competition  and  cause  real  harms  to 
consumers.  There  is  no  reason  to  approve  a  merger  that  would  violate  FCC  rules 
and  precedent,  as  well  as  congressional  policy,  and  would  grant  a  state-sanctioned 
monopoly  to  non-failing  companies  with  a  long  track  record  of  breaking  the  rules. 
Even  if  the  parties  agreed  to  price  regulation  to  ensure  that  satellite  radio  cus-
tomers  do  not  pay  more  (for  some  period  of  time)  after  the  merger  than  they  did 
before,  such  a  condition  does  not  justify  approval  of  the  proposed  merger.  Courts 
have  rejected  mergers  despite  the  merging  parties’  promises  not  to  raise  prices,  ob-
serving  that  ‘‘the  mere  fact  that  such  representations  had  to  be  made  strongly 
support[ed] the fears of impermissible monopolization.’’ FTC v. Cardinal Health, 12 
F. Supp. 2d at 67. If XM and Sirius feel obliged to make promises not to raise their 
subscription rates, this clearly shows that they expect to have the market power to 
do so following a merger. 

Permitting  a  merger  based  on  pricing  conditions  moreover  disregards  the  very 
reason  the  antitrust  laws  apply  to  mergers—to  ensure  that  markets  are  structured 
in  a  way  to  promote  competition.  The  notion  that  a  competitive  market  structure, 
which has produced healthy competition between XM and Sirius, should be replaced 
by a monopoly provider subject to price regulation is antithetical to the purpose and 
foundation  of  the  antitrust  laws  and  to  congressional  policy  favoring  competition 
over regulation, as expressed in the 1996 Telecommunications Act. The antitrust en-
forcement  agencies  have  in  the  past  refused  to  condition  merger  approval  on  price 
regulation  because  they  are  not  ‘‘price-regulatory’’  agencies,  ‘‘compliance  is  difficult 
to monitor,’’ and ‘‘competition is the proper driving force for pricing decisions.’’ 31 

In  fact,  the  FCC  did  not  believe  that  a  national  pricing  plan  was  an  appropriate 
solution  to  the  competitive  harms  likely  to  be  caused  by  the  proposed  EchoStar/ 
DIRECTV merger. Even assuming such a plan could be an effective remedy for com-
petitive harms (which the FCC found unlikely), the FCC concluded that the pricing 
plan  was  inconsistent  with  the  Communications  Act  and  with  regulatory  policy  fa-
voring  the  replacement  of  regulation  with  competition,  especially  facilities-based 
competition. EchoStar/DIRECTV Merger Order, 17 FCC Rcd at 20663. Because the 

1090. 

28 See,  e.g.,  FTC  v.  Swedish  Match,  131  F.  Supp.  2d  at  172;  FTC  v.  Staples,  970  F.  Supp.  at 

29 Michael  Rapoport,  ‘‘Cost-Cutting  Claims  Raise  Static  for  Satellite  Radio  Deal,’’  Chicago 
Tribune (March 4, 2007) (citing analysts from Wachovia Securities and Oppenheimer & Co., who 
were highly skeptical about the ‘‘synergies’’ claimed by XM and Sirius). 

30 See  Frank  Ahrens,  ‘‘In  the  Same  Orbit,  but  on  Different  Planets,’’  Washington  Post,  Feb. 
21,  2007  at  D01  (‘‘Karmazin  said  a  merger  would  lead  to  savings  by  eliminating  duplications 
in  programming  and  operations,’’  and  that  the  ‘‘companies  plan  to  design  equipment  to  let  cus-
tomers receive signals from both companies, which use different satellite technologies’’). 

31 Mary Lou Steptoe & David Balto, Finding the Right Prescription: The FTC’s Use of Innova-

tive Merger Remedies, 10 Antitrust 16 (Fall 1995). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

20 

XM-Sirius  merger  would  ‘‘totally  eliminate  what  appears  to  be  a  very  healthy  level 
of  intramodal  competition  among  the  two-facilities  based’’  satellite  radio  providers, 
it  should  be  rejected,  just  as  the  FCC  declined  to  approve  the  EchoStar/DIRECTV 
merger even with pricing conditions. Id. Regulation is just not a substitute for com-
petition.32 
Conclusion 

Local  broadcasters  fully  support  vigorous  competition  on  a  fair  and  level  playing 
field.  Free,  over-the-air  radio  stations  are  embracing  the  future  by  transitioning  to 
digital  broadcasting  so  as  to  remain  competitively  and  financially  viable  and  better 
able  to  serve  their  listeners  and  local  communities.  Congress  should  assure  the 
maintenance  of  a  competitively  level  playing  field  by  clearly  and  expeditiously  ex-
pressing  its  opposition  to  the  proposed  satellite  radio  merger  to  both  the  Depart-
ment of Justice and the FCC. 

For all the reasons I discussed in detail above, the proposed merger of Sirius and 
XM is simply anticompetitive. The creation of a monopoly in the closed national sat-
ellite radio market would injure consumers and programming suppliers, and impair 
the  ability  of  other  audio  service  providers  to  compete  and  to  serve  listeners.  Be-
cause  it  would  create  a  monopoly  in  violation  of  the  antitrust  laws,  this  proposed 
merger should be summarily rejected. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Kimmelman? 

STATEMENT OF GENE KIMMELMAN, VICE PRESIDENT, 
FEDERAL AND INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS, CONSUMERS 

UNION; ON BEHALF OF COMMON CAUSE, CONSUMERS UNION, 

CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA, FREE PRESS, 

AND MEDIA ACCESS PROJECT 

Mr. KIMMELMAN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Vice Chairman Ste-
vens,  Senator  Dorgan,  Senator  Lautenberg.  On  behalf  of  Con-
sumers Union, the print and online publisher of Consumer Reports, 
I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  this  morning  in  opposition 
to  this  proposed  merger.  Consumers  Union’s  major  goal  for  the 
policies related to media and mergers in the media sector is to have 
Congress  continue  to  provide  clear  direction  and  promote  regu-
latory action that will prevent efforts to consolidate media in ways 
that  puts  too  much  power  in  the  hands  of  too  few  owners  in  this 
important sector of our economy. 

The XM-Sirius proposed merger is just one small example of our 
concerns  in  these  sectors,  as  Senator  Dorgan  outlined  earlier.  It 
may not be that important in the overall market sense, but is enor-
mously important from the perspective of the logic that’s being pro-
vided by XM and Sirius to propose this merger, and to urge accept-
ance  of  this  merger.  Our  concern  is  that  that  logic  could  open  a 
floodgate of very dangerous consolidation across much more impor-
tant media properties. 

Mr. Karmazin’s pricing premises and logic reminds me of almost 
the  same  siren  song  that  we  heard  in  1984,  you  may  recall,  when 
the  cable  industry  came  to  you  and  said  deregulate  us  because  we 
compete  with  broadcast.  We  are  small,  we  are  very  little  in  that 
market,  and  we  have  no  incentive  to  raise  our  rates  because  we 
have  to  take  on  these  big  broadcasters,  so  please  let  us  go.  And 
they  controlled  themselves  for  2  years  and  then,  you  may  recall, 
from  1986  until  you  stepped  in  again  in  1992,  rates  skyrocketed 

32 See, e.g., Nat’l Society of Professional Engineers v. U.S., 435 U.S. 679, 695 (1978) (antitrust 
laws  reflect  Congress’  judgment  that  ‘‘competition  will  produce  not  only  lower  prices,  but  also 
better  goods  and  services’’);  Standard  Oil  v.  FTC,  340  U.S.  231,  248  (1951)  (‘‘The  heart  of  our 
national economic policy long has been faith in the value of competition.’’). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

21 

and anticompetitive behavior was flagrant. This is not a time to re-
peat that mistake. 

Let  me  explain  why  I  think  there  are  some  special  attributes  of 
this  proposed  merger  that  remind  me  of  that  behavior.  Is  there  a 
broadcast  audio  market  that  includes  satellite  radio?  Well,  think 
about  why  people  might  buy  XM  or  Sirius.  People  who  are  mobile. 
People who travel a lot, not just in the local community. They lose 
their  local  broadcast  signals  as  they  travel  outside  of  their  home 
territory  or  town.  People  who  want  a  lot  of  baseball,  a  lot  of  NFL 
football, basketball, but not just their home team. They want a na-
tional package. Their local broadcaster can’t offer that. IPods don’t 
offer  that.  MP3  players  don’t  offer  that.  They  want  unique  niche 
programming  that  in  any  one  market  can’t  be  supported  by  local 
broadcasts with advertiser support. 

There  is  not  a  big  enough  market,  but  if  you  take  small  pieces, 
small  communities  around  the  country,  there  can  be  a  national 
market for it. There is a unique need for probably 14 to 20 million 
consumer households here being served only by two companies that 
now seek to merge into one. 

Now,  is  there  complementarity?  Is  there  overlap?  Sure.  People 
listen  to  their  AM/FM  radio,  CDs  in  their  cars.  They  listen  to 
prerecorded  music  in  conjunction  with  local  broadcast  radio,  but  it 
cannot serve these other needs. It does not and cannot. So they are 
similar  in  a  few  ways  but  not  in  the  fundamental  way  that  anti-
trust  policy  or  competition  policy  has  to  address  to  protect  con-
sumers. And certainly this merger cannot and shouldn’t be allowed 
to  satisfy  the  FCC’s  original  mandate  that  there  are  two  satellite 
radio licensees competing against each other. We shouldn’t go back 
on  that  original  promise.  So  there  is  a  large  segment  of  the  con-
suming public that could be horribly harmed by this. 

But really most importantly, I urge you to consider how the logic 
of  comparing  iPods,  MP3  players  and  satellite  radio  would  impli-
cate other media transactions. Does that logic lead to more consoli-
dation  of  television  broadcasters?  Of  cable  companies?  Of  news-
papers and broadcast outlets? That’s what we fear. It’s hard to dis-
tinguish,  from  our  perspective,  the  logic  being  applied  to  this  pro-
posed  merger  and  those  transactions  that  we  know  are  waiting  in 
the wings. 

So  in  conclusion,  we  urge  you  to  continue  to  promote  more  com-
petition  and  diversity  in  media  ownership,  ensure  that  Federal 
agencies,  competition  and  public  interest  agencies,  reassert  these 
strong principles and establish market guidelines that will prevent 
consolidation  of  media  into  the  hands  of  a  few  dominant  players. 
Unfortunately, this merger is just that type of consolidation. Thank 
you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Kimmelman follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

22 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GENE KIMMELMAN,  VICE PRESIDENT,  FEDERAL AND 
INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS,  CONSUMERS UNION;  ON BEHALF OF COMMON CAUSE, 
CONSUMERS UNION, CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA, FREE PRESS, AND MEDIA 
ACCESS PROJECT 
Common  Cause,1 Consumers  Union  (CU),2 Consumer  Federation  of  America 
(CFA),3 Free  Press  (FP),4 and  the  Media  Access  Project 5 urge  the  Congress,  the 
Federal  Communications  Commission  and  antitrust  authorities  to  hold  the  line 
against the growing threat to an increasingly homogenized and concentrated media 
sector:  mergers  that  concentrate  ownership  in  too  few  hands.  The  XM-Sirius  Radio 
merger  exacerbates  longstanding  concerns  regarding  excessive  concentration  in  the 
media market and the effects of concentration on programmer access and consumer 
choice.  But  concerns  regarding  this  merger  extend  beyond  general  media  consolida-
tion:  based  on  the  evidence  available  today,  the  proposed  transaction  is  a  merger 
to monopoly in a distinct product market that threatens to increase consumer costs, 
reduce  consumer  choice  and  impede  competition.  Simply  put,  this  merger  is  not  in 
the public interest. 

The proposed merger of the only two satellite subscription radio companies should 
raise a red flag for both antitrust officials and communications regulators whose job 
is  to  promote  competition  and  consumer  choice  in  the  marketplace.  Not  only  were 
XM  and  Sirius  prohibited  from  merging  as  a  condition  of  getting  their  licenses  to 
use  the  public  airwaves  to  deliver  their  services,  but  also,  as  demonstrated  by  the 
enormous  growth  of  satellite  subscription  radio  service  over  just  a  few  years,  this 
service  is,  in  fact,  a  distinct  product  and  could  develop  into  a  vibrant  competitive 
market  absent  the  merger.  We  believe  the  companies  who  seek  to  merge  so  soon 
after they began competing and offering consumers innovative new services; so soon 
after they demonstrated that subscription radio is attractive to consumers and could 
be more so with consumer-friendly pricing and improved equipment interoperability; 
and in total disregard of the licensing conditions they accepted in order to use public 
resources,  carry  an  enormous  burden  to  demonstrate  why  public  officials  should 
abandon all normal rules associated with competitive markets and spectrum licens-
ing to allow this merger. 

XM  and  Sirius  have  not  met  that  burden.  Therefore,  the  Department  of  Justice 
(DOJ)  and  Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC)  should  reject  this  merger 
unless  and  until  XM  and  Sirius  present  clear-cut  facts  demonstrating  how  any  of 
its  purported  benefits  to  consumers  offset  its  anti-consumer  and  anti-competitive 
harms. 
The Danger of an Overbroad Market Definition 

This merger raises the most fundamental issues in antitrust law and poses a sub-
stantial  threat  to  consumers  and  competition  policy  generally.  In  order  to  exercise 
their  responsibility  under  the  competition  laws,  the  Federal  agencies  must  start 
from the assumption that the XM-Sirius merger is a merger to monopoly—a merger 
between  the  only  two  firms  in  the  market  for  national  subscription  radio  service. 
A  proper  definition  of  the  relevant  product  market  proves  that  assumption  to  be 

1 Common  Cause  is  a  nonpartisan  nonprofit  advocacy  organization  founded  in  1970  by  John 
Gardner as a vehicle for citizens to make their voices heard in the political process and to hold 
their  elected  leaders  accountable  to  the  public  interest.  Now  with  nearly  300,000  members  and 
supporters  and  36  state  organizations,  Common  Cause  remains  committed  to  honest,  open  and 
accountable government, as well as encouraging citizen participation in democracy. 

2 Consumers Union is a nonprofit membership organization chartered in 1936 under the laws 
of  the  state  of  New  York  to  provide  consumers  with  information,  education  and  counsel  about 
goods,  services,  health  and  personal  finance,  and  to  initiate  and  cooperate  with  individual  and 
group efforts to maintain and enhance the quality of life for consumers. Consumers Union’s in-
come  is  solely  derived  from  the  sale  of  Consumer  Reports,  its  other  publications  and  from  non-
commercial  contributions,  grants  and  fees.  In  addition  to  reports  on  Consumers  Union’s  own 
product  testing,  Consumer  Reports  with  more  than  5  million  paid  circulation,  regularly,  carries 
articles on health, product safety, marketplace economics and legislative, judicial and regulatory 
actions which affect consumer welfare. Consumers Union’s publications carry no advertising and 
receive no commercial support. 

3 The Consumer Federation of America is the Nation’s largest consumer advocacy group, com-
posed  of  over  280  state  and  local  affiliates  representing  consumer,  senior  citizen,  low-income, 
labor,  farm,  public  power  an  cooperative  organizations,  with  more  than  50  million  individual 
members. 

4 Free  Press  is  a  national,  nonpartisan  organization  with  over  350,000  members  working  to 

increase informed public participation in crucial media and communications policy debates. 

5 Media Access Project (MAP) is a 35-year-old non-profit tax exempt public interest media and 
telecommunications  law  firm  which  promotes  the  public’s  First  Amendment  right  to  hear  and 
be heard on the electronic media of today and tomorrow. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

23 

true. But an overbroad definition in this instance would create a devastating prece-
dent for all media competition policy going forward. 

The merging parties claim that the merger does not create a monopoly: the exist-
ence of cross-platform and intermodal competition means that all forms of distribu-
tion  of  audio  content  are  interchangeable,  even  those  that  function  merely  as  stor-
age  devices,  and  must  be  included  in  the  market  definition.6 They  assert  that  na-
tional  subscription  radio  service  competes,  directly  and  indirectly,  with  a  variety  of 
partial  substitutes.  Through  this  overbroad  market  definition,  the  merging  parties 
claim that they represent two small fish in a large ocean, rather than the only two 
fish  in  a  small  pond.  Such  an  overbroad  definition  would  have  disastrous  con-
sequence  for  consumers  of  satellite  radio  as  well  as  both  for  antitrust  and  public 
interest  oversight  in  all  media  markets  generally.  By  allowing  the  only  two  compa-
nies  selling  a  specific  type  of  media  product  to  merge  on  the  basis  of  erroneous 
claims of cross-platform or intermodal competition, the fundamental basis on which 
all public interest regulation of broadcast media rests is destroyed. 

Concern  about  the  danger  of  too  broadly  defining  the  product  market  is  shared 
across  the  ideological  spectrum.  Gregory  Sidak,  former  Deputy  General  Counsel  of 
the FCC and Economist to the Council of Economic Advisers in the Executive Office 
of the President under the Bush Administration, argues: 

‘‘Broadcasting  is  more  heavily  regulated  than  other  media.  The  FCC  has  justi-
fied  that  heavier  regulation  (and  lower  First  Amendment  protection)  on  the 
basis  of  four  factors:  the  pervasiveness  of  broadcast  speech,  the  scarcity  of 
broadcast spectrum, the governmental interest in preserving viewpoint diversity 
over the airwaves; and the traditional goal of fostering localism in broadcasting. 
If,  however,  all  aurally  delivered  media  are  totally  indistinguishable  from  each 
other—as  XM  and  Sirius  claim—and  this  merger  is  permitted  to  proceed  on 
that basis, then it will have been approved on a rationale that would make the 
inferior  First  Amendment  state  of  broadcasting  untenable.  All  content  and 
structural  regulation  of  the  broadcast  industry  would  be  constitutionally  inde-
fensible.’’ 

Scott Cleland, who describes himself as ‘‘a fervent and principled advocate of free 
markets and competition’’ reaches the same conclusion with respect to the antitrust 
laws: 

‘‘If  the  DOJ  and  the  FCC  endorse  and  enable  an  obvious  government-created 
duopoly  to  become  a  monopoly,  they  would  move  the  goal  posts  so  far  from  ex-
isting  precedent  that  they  could  not  legally  justify  blocking  any  merger  in  the 
future . . . 

. . .  If  the  DOJ  or  the  FCC  approved  this  obvious  attempt  of  monopolization,  it 

would be open season on Federal antitrust competition policy.’’ 7 

The  importance  of  understanding  the  broad  implications  of  the  theory  that  has 
been  offered  to  justify  this  merger  becomes  even  more  apparent  when  we  consider 
the position of the National Association of Broadcasters (NAB) on the merger. While 
the NAB argues in this case that the market should not be defined to include cross- 
platform and intermodal competition, in the media ownership proceeding ongoing at 
the  FCC,  the  NAB  argues  exactly  the  opposite—a  position  we  have  flatly  rejected 
and which is not supported by the evidence.8 If antitrust authorities accept XM-Sir-
ius’ overbroad definition of the mobile listening market, little foundation remains for 
rejecting NAB’s overbroad definition of the media market generally. 
Merger to Monopoly 

Careful market structure analysis, rigorously applied in all circumstances—media 
ownership,  merger  review,  and  public  interest  oversight—shows  that  the  overbroad 
definition of the market offered by XM-Sirius is simply wrong. Thus, as both Sidak 
and  Cleland  note,  the  broad  definition  of  the  product  and  geographic  market  that 

6 ‘‘Testimony  of  Mr.  Mel  Karmazin,  Chief  Executive  Officer,  Sirius  Satellite  Radio  Regarding 
Competition and the Future of Digital Music, before the Antitrust Task Force of the House Judi-
ciary Committee, February 28, 2007, SEC filing XX, FCC filing XX. 

7 Scott  Cleland,  ‘‘XM-Sirius  merger  is  anti-competitive:  The  Emperor  Has  NO  Clothes,’’  Pre-

cursor Watch, at 1. 

8 See  Comments  of  Consumer  Federation  of  America,  Consumers  Union,  and  Free  Press,  In 
the Matter of 2006 Quadrennial Regulatory Review—Review of the Commission’s Broadcast Own-
ership  Rules  and  Other  Rules  Adopted  Pursuant  to  Section  202  of  the  Telecommunications  Act 
of 1996, MB Docket No. 06–121, October 23, 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

24 

XM-Sirius  and  their  supporters 9 use  is  so  obviously  flawed  that  an  unbiased  anal-
ysis  will  easily  conclude  that  the  merger  violates  both  the  Sherman  Act  and  the 
1934  Communications  Act  as  a  merger  to  monopoly.  The  product  and  geographic 
market  characteristics  of  satellite  radio  are  easily  identifiable  and  quite  distinct 
from other mobile and stationary audio products. It is national, mobile, programmed 
radio entertainment. There are two, and only two, entities providing such a service. 
The  alternatives  the  companies  contend  are  substitutes  do  not  possess  this  set  of 
characteristics  and  therefore  cannot  be  said  to  compete  directly  with  the  service. 
The  two  services  deliver,  and  require  consumers  to  purchase,  huge  bundles  of  well 
over  100  channels  of  programmed  music,  news  and  entertainment—programming 
that is nationally available. 

We call to the Committee’s attention the testimony of David Balto before the Sen-
ate  Judiciary  Committee.10 Mr.  Balto,  a  former  and  long-time  attorney  at  the  De-
partment of Justice and the Federal Trade Commission who counts among his cred-
its  litigation  in  opposition  to  mergers  such  as  Staples/Office  Depot,  Time  Warner/ 
Turner,  and  Time  Warner/AOL,  examined  the  economic  characteristics  of  the  prod-
uct  that  satellite  radio  companies  sell.  He  cautioned  that  ‘‘[s]imply  because  certain 
products seem similar to the products being offered by the merging parties does not 
mean they are in the same relevant product market.’’ 11 

Mr.  Balto  compared  the  XM-Sirius  merger  to  the  proposed  Staples/Office  Depot 
merger,  which  was  blocked  by  the  courts,  noting  that  the  court  concluded  that  the 
relevant product market was the ‘‘superstore market’’ not the market for office sup-
plies  generally.  The  relevant  product  market  was  properly  defined  not  just  by  the 
products  being  offered,  but  by  the  overall  shopping  experience.  The  same  appro-
priate analysis applied to the XM-Sirius merger will produce a similar result. Using 
a similar analysis, Balto concluded that satellite radio is a distinct product: 

‘‘Although  certain  parts  of  the  satellite  radio  package  can  be  acquired  through 
other  audio  outlets,  including  web-based  radio,  digital  media  services,  and  ter-
restrial radio, no other service ofers the complete variety of audio entertainment 
options offered by satellite radio.’’ 

The relevant market characteristics Mr. Balto identifies are: 
• Aggregating demand: Satellite radio has the breadth and depth of programming 

because it can aggregate demand unlike other forms of audio entertainment; 

• Ubiquitous service: Satellite radio follows you everywhere. Satellite radio travels 
with  the  person,  assuring  the  same  level  of  sound  quality  or  content  wherever 
you are; 

• Product variety: Satellite radio offers a far greater number of stations than ter-

restrial radio or even HD radio; 

• Diverse  formulated  programming:  Satellite  radio  formats  program  content  to 
provide diversity, introduce listeners to new music and new forms of entertain-
ment; 

• Unregulated  content:  The  content  of  satellite  radio  is  not  regulated.  This  per-
mits  a  wide  variety  of  product  offerings  to  satisfy  consumer  demand;  satellite 
radio is not regulated or constricted by the rules of the FCC.12 

Evaluating  the  market  alternatives  according  to  Mr.  Balto’s  criteria,  it  becomes 
clear why he came to the conclusion he did. The touted competitors are not competi-
tors  in  any  meaningful  sense.  There  are  distinct  differences  in  product  offerings, 
quality,  listener  experiences,  mode  of  delivery,  and  regulation.  None  of  the  com-
peting services and platforms shares the core characteristics of satellite radio. Each 
lacks one or more of the core defining characteristics of satellite radio: national serv-
ice; programmed service; and mobile service. 

9 In  congressional  testimony,  the  only  public  interest  group  to  support  the  merger  has  been 
Public Knowledge, see ‘‘Testimony of Gigi B. Sohn, President, Public Knowledge, Satellite Radio 
Regarding  Competition  and  the  Future  of  Digital  Music,  before  the  Antitrust  Task  Force  of  the 
House  Judiciary  Committee,  February  28,  2007;  ‘‘Testimony  of  Gigi  B.  Sohn,  President,  Public 
Knowledge Regarding The XM-Sirius Merger: Monopoly or Competition from New Technologies,’’ 
Senate  Committee  on  the  Judiciary,  Subcommittee  on  Antitrust,  Competition  and  Consumer 
Rights, March 20, 2007. 

10 Testimony  of  David  A.  Balto  regarding  The  XM-Sirius  Merger:  Monopoly  of  Competition 
from New Technologies, Senate Committee on the Judiciary Subcommittee on Antitrust, Competi-
tion and Consumer Rights, March 20, 2007, at 1. 

11 Id. 
12 Balto, at 5. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

Terrestrial Radio 

25 

Product  and  market  differences  created  by  the  varying  licensing  regimes  for  sat-
ellite and terrestrial radio must be considered when evaluating whether these enti-
ties  are  competitors.  Entry  into  the  satellite  Digital  Audio  Radio  Services  (SDARS) 
market  is  restricted  by  the  need  to  have  a  license  to  broadcast  at  frequencies  that 
enable the service to be provided nationwide. During questioning at the Senate Ju-
diciary  Committee  hearing  last  month,  Sirius  CEO  Mel  Karmazin  conceded  that  it 
was  unlikely  that  another  satellite-based  competitor  would  enter  the  market  be-
cause of the high barriers to entry. Perhaps because of those barriers and the need 
to ensure competition existed, the original SDARS licenses were issued by the Fed-
eral  Communications  Commission  under  strict  conditions  that  the  two  entities  are 
not allowed to merge. 

Differences  in  Federal  licensing  requirements  also  demonstrate  the  clear  distinc-
tion between satellite radio and terrestrial radio. First, the different restrictions on 
the  licenses  demonstrate  the  market  differences.  Broadcast  licenses  require  the 
service to be offered free of charge, requiring advertiser support. Local radio stations 
adjust  their  content  to  the  audiences  that  the  advertisers  want  to  reach.  Satellite 
radio licenses allow the licensee to support the service through subscription fees, of-
fering  largely  commercial-free  radio—a  distinction  that  Sirius,  in  particular,  widely 
promotes.13 Second,  satellite  radio  travels  with  the  listeners  no  matter  where  they 
are, operating in a national market. But terrestrial radio is a local product; stations 
vanish as the listener crosses market boundaries. Third, broadcast licenses are sub-
ject  to  public  interest  obligations,  while  satellite  services  are  not.  As  Greg  Sidak 
noted, the licensing differences allow for different market segmentation between the 
two  services.14 Terrestrial  radio  will  never  be  able  to  provide  some  of  the  program-
ming  currently  offered  on  satellite  not  only  because  of  content  restrictions,15 but 
also  because  its  licensing  requirements  limit  it  to  a  small  geographic  market,  pre-
venting  it  from  aggregating  demand  for  the  types  of  specialized  programming  of-
fered  on  satellite  radio.  Thus  programming  on  satellite  radio  tends  to  be  more  spe-
cialized and more diverse than that of terrestrial radio. 

Thus,  while  it  may  be  true  that  satellite  competes  with  terrestrial  radio  in  local 
terrestrial  radio  markets,  terrestrial  radio  does  not  and  cannot  compete  with  sat-
ellite  radio  in  its  relevant  market—the  national  market.  Indeed,  XM’s  tag  line  is 
‘‘Beyond  AM.  Beyond  FM.  XM.’’ 16 The  emergence  of  HD  radio  does  not  change  the 
analysis.  In  several  important  ways  HD  radio  is  an  extension  of  terrestrial  radio. 
It  may  solve  the  quality  problem  of  terrestrial  radio,  but  it  carries  the  other  weak-
nesses  (as  a  competitor  to  satellite)  forward.  HD  radio  is  still  broadcast  to  a  small 
local  market.  It  is  still  subject  to  content  regulation.  It  also  has  substantial  con-
sumer  equipment  costs,  which  traditional  terrestrial  radio  does  not.  It  may  expand 
the capacity of an individual broadcaster a little, but the capacity of local radio still 
is minuscule compared to that of satellite radio providers. 
MP3 Players 

iPods  and  other  content  storage  devices  require  consumers  to  access,  choose,  and 
download  individual  selections;  they  do  not  provide  programmed  services.  Though 
they have substantial capacity, the capacity pales by comparison to that of satellite 
radio. As Mr. Balto demonstrated, the cost of that limited capacity is expensive: ‘‘an 
iPod with 1,000 songs would have approximately $1,000 worth of content or approxi-

13 Sirius  states  ‘‘The  biggest  difference  is  that  Sirius  has  100  percent  commercial-free  music 
free  channels.  What  this  means  for  you  is  that  we  offer  you  music  the  way  it  should  be  and 
the  way  the  artist  intended  it:  without  a  single  commercial  interruption.  Our  music  program-
ming  also  has  a  breadth  and  depth  of  programming  basically  unavailable  on  regular  radio.  We 
play songs that you know and love, and many songs that we know you will love when you hear 
them  for  the  first  time.  We  also  have  hundreds  of  exclusive  live  interviews  and  performances 
you  won’t  hear  anywhere  else  and  produce  many  interesting  and  engaging  live  talk  shows  in 
our  national  broadcast  studios.’’  XM  promotes  on  its  website  the  availability  of  69  commercial- 
free music channels. 

14 Expert  Declaration  of  J.  Gregory  Sidak  Concerning  the  Competitive  Consequences  of  the 
Proposed  Merger  of  Sirius  Satellite  Radio,  Inc.  and  XM  Satellite  Radio,  Inc.,  March  16,  2007, 
p. 6. 

15 For  example,  XM  currently  offers  Laugh  Attack,  promoted  as  ‘‘Uncensored  Comedy;’’  and 
Opie  and  Anthony,  two  radio  personalities  whose  former  on-air  performances  resulted  in  FCC 
fines. Both XM and Sirius offer Playboy Radio, and adult entertainment premium channel. Sir-
ius  offers  Raw  Dog  Comedy,  which  provides  uncensored  comedy;  Maxim  Radio,  promoted  as 
‘‘Girls,  comedy,  sports,  music:  Maxim  Radio  is  the  best  thing  to  happen  to  men  . . .  since 
women!;’’  and  Howard  Stern,  the  shock  jock  whose  performances  have  resulted  in  FCC  fines. 
Moreover, both services offer out of market sporting events unavailable on terrestrial radio: Sir-
ius offers the NFL channel and XM offers the MLB Channel. 

16 www.xmradio.com. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

26 

mately six and a half years of the cost of an XM monthly service.’’ 17 Moreover, the 
iPod requires affirmative consumer action to access music; it lacks the programmed 
characteristics  of  satellite  radio  where  music  and  information  is  pushed  out  to  the 
listeners, exposing them to new content at the flip of a switch. Moreover, the diver-
sity  of  programming  and  the  capacity  of  the  system  which  has  enabled  satellite 
radio  to  develop  narrowly  targeted  niche  programming  lowers  the  cost  of  learning 
about  new  music.  Listeners  can  go  to  the  genre  they’re  interested  in,  programmed 
by a DJ who reflects their tastes, and hear an array of old and new content without 
commercial  interruption.  Thus,  satellite  radio  becomes  a  complement  for  the  iPod 
(assuming  the  iPod  service  provider  has  the  desired  song  in  its  library).  For  exam-
ple,  having  heard  a  new  song  on  Sirius’s  eclectic  channel  ‘‘Sirius  Disorder,’’  the  lis-
tener  can  download  it  to  an  MP3  player.  Moreover,  today,  most  MP3  players  are 
used  for  listening  to  music.  They  do  not  generally  deliver  today  programmed  non- 
musical  live  content:  news,  sports,  talk  and  other  entertainment,  which  constitutes 
a  substantial  part  of  the  programming  content  on  satellite,  40  percent  in  the  case 
of  Sirius.  In  addition,  content  from  satellite  radio  is  delivered  in  real  time;  the  lis-
tener  does  not  download  then  listen  to  it  later  whenever  they  want  as  with  iPods 
and  other  MP3  players  and  satellite  radio.  Finally,  the  mere  fact  that  both  MP3 
players are mobile is not sufficient for these products to be substitutes. The merging 
parties  could  not  with  a  straight  face  suggest  that  built-in  CD  players  function  as 
a  substitute:  the  iPod  is  a  similar  device,  only  with  greater  storage  capacity:  it  al-
lows  consumers  to  take  music  and  other  content  they  have  already  purchased  and 
play it in their cars. 

The growth in subscribership and revenues for Sirius and XM, based on their SEC 
10–5  filings,  reinforce  the  uniqueness  of  satellite  radio’s  product  offerings.  Between 
2005 and 2006, satellite radio subscribership rose from 9.3 million to 13.7 million— 
a  nearly  50  percent  increase.  And  combined  revenue  grew  by  nearly  100  percent. 
These  data  are  not  consistent  with  a  market  that  competes  with  the  burgeoning 
market for mobile digital listening devices. 
Internet Radio 

Internet radio suffers from many of the same problems as terrestrial radio. Much 
Internet  radio  is  just  a  redistribution  platform  for  terrestrial  radio,  which  does  not 
break the fundamental constraints of terrestrial radio. The business model still rests 
on advertising targeted, and content tailored, to the local market for which the ter-
restrial  station  holds  a  license.  To  the  extent  that  some  content  is  geographically 
specific  (i.e.,  a  home  town  baseball  team)  Internet  distribution  may  make  it  acces-
sible to out-of-market listeners, but it is difficult for the distributor to monetize that 
broader  audience.  As  a  locally  based  advertising  model,  aggregation  of  demand  is 
not possible. Thus, programming that requires a large national audience will be be-
yond the scope of terrestrial radio rebroadcast over the Internet. 

Internet  radio  that  is  not  based  on  the  output  of  terrestrial  broadcast  radio  (e.g., 
music  services  offered  by  cellular  carriers)  suffers  several  problems.  Its  quality  is 
questionable  and  its  price  is  high.  And  both  types  of  Internet  radio  also  have  yet 
to  solve  the  problem  of  getting  into  automobiles,  which  is  the  primary  market  for 
satellite  radio.  Even  as  a  stationary  alternative,  the  product  is  limited  by  the  need 
for  access  to  broadband,  wireless  or  wireline.  Thus,  it  suffers  from  bandwidth  con-
straints and substantially higher equipment and service costs. Satellite radio, on the 
other  hand,  is  ubiquitously  available  to  every  consumer  at  significantly  lower 
monthly costs. 

As  demonstrated  above,  the  relevant  product  market  for  this  merger  is  satellite 
radio  itself.  Thus,  despite  their  contentions,  the  only  alternative  for  XM  is  Sirius 
Radio; the only alternative for Sirius is XM. The merger is a merger to monopoly— 
a type of merger that is antithetical to the competition laws and perhaps the worst 
offense  against  the  basic  principle  that  competition  is  the  consumer’s  best  friend. 
There  is  no  circumstance  more  disturbing  from  the  point  of  view  of  the  antitrust 
laws  and  the  Communications  Act  than  a  merger  within  a  distinct  product  market 
that takes the number of competitors from two to one. That will be the result if reg-
ulatory and antitrust authorities accept the erroneous, overbroad market definition. 
The False Promise of Bank Shot Competition in Disciplining Prices 

If  this  merger  is  approved  on  the  basis  that  different  audio  platforms  are  avail-
able,  consumers  will  lose:  the  track  record  of  intermodal  competition  disciplining 
anticompetitive abuse is poor at best. ‘‘Bank shot competition’’—the claim that par-
tial  or  poor  substitutes  that  are  fundamentally  different  than  the  target  product 
serve  as  competitors—has  failed  to  protect  consumers  in  similar  situations.  The  re-

17 Balto, at 6. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

27 

sult of relying on such competition in both merger and regulatory reviews has been 
rising prices and stagnation. 

Cable  television  provides  an  appropriate  example.  In  the  1980s,  Federal  policy-
makers  claimed  that  cable  TV  competed  with  over-the-air  broadcasting.  Based  on 
that  understanding,  the  FCC  deregulated  cable  systems  in  communities  with  three 
or more broadcast signals. Cable rates subsequently skyrocketed. By the late 1980s, 
the  failure  of  this  intermodal  competition  to  discipline  cable  pricing  was  so  obvious 
that  the  FCC  proposed  to  increase  the  number  of  over-the-air  stations  necessary  to 
represent  effective  competition  to  six.  Seeing  the  results  of  this  failed  policy,  Con-
gress  re-regulated  cable  in  the  early  1990s,  and  intervened  in  the  market  to  help 
DBS satellite compete against cable (another form of intermodal competition). 

In  the  decade  after  the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996,  which  largely  deregu-
lated  cable  rates,  intermodal  competition  between  cable  and  satellite  failed  to  dis-
cipline cable rate increases. Average monthly cable bills have doubled since the 1996 
Act.  In  short,  intermodal  competition  from  neither  over-the-air  TV  nor  from  digital 
satellite distribution has disciplined cable rates. The former had more limited chan-
nel capacity; the later had greater channel capacity. It did not matter. The empirical 
evidence  from  the  cable  market  is  clear.  Only  head-to-head  competition  of  products 
within the relevant market delivers clear relief from anti-consumer, anti-competitive 
pricing. 

In  the  satellite  radio  service  product  space,  we  face  a  similar  configuration  of 
products. Congress, regulatory agencies and antitrust authorities should not be mis-
led  into  believing  that  traditional  broadcast  radio,  digital  Internet  distribution  and 
mobile  handheld  devices,  like  iPods,  that  allow  consumers  to  store  and  play  music 
from their own collections or from online music sites, will discipline prices any more 
than  broadcast  television,  downloadable  videos,  DVD  players,  Digital  Video  Record-
ers  and  direct  broadcast  satellite  have  disciplined  cable  prices.  The  contention  that 
the  purported  substitutes  will  discipline  prices  is  even  more  suspect  when  one  con-
siders  that  the  cost  of  satellite  radio  service  has  increased  since  the  products  were 
launched  several  years  ago  despite  the  presence  of  other  mobile  radio  distribution 
systems.  Free  terrestrial  radio  and  iPods  have  been  around  for  a  while,  but  their 
existence  has  not  prevented  increases  in  satellite  radio  pricing  practices.  There  is 
no  reason  to  believe  that  it  will  do  a  better  job  if  a  satellite  radio  monopoly  is  al-
lowed to come into existence. 

The  merging  parties  argue  that  consumers  will  be  better  off  with  a  benevolent 
monopolist than they would be with two competitors. In this ultra-short term view, 
competition is defined as wasteful, since redundant facilities lie unutilized. The mo-
nopolist  can  serve  everyone  while  using  fewer  resources  and  the  monopolist  prom-
ises  not  to  abuse  the  market  power  that  would  result.  But  without  the  stick  of 
meaningful  competition,  the  cost  savings  simply  will  not  be  passed  through  to  the 
consumer.  Indeed,  the  increase  in  market  power  will  allow  the  post-merger  monop-
oly to raise rather than lower prices. 

The merging parties promise, in the short-term, not to raise prices for the services 
that  consumers  now  receive.  It  is  a  hollow  promise  that  fails  to  address  the  real 
harms  of  the  merger.  Time-limited  price  freezes  today  for  yesterday’s  services  fail 
to  address  the  added  costs  to  consumers  over  time  that  result  when  competition  is 
absent.  In  addition,  a  short  term  price  freeze  does  not  compensate  for  the  price  de-
clines that might otherwise occur if the two competitors continue to compete. In the 
absence  of  a  merger,  it  is  not  clear  why  prices  should  not  eventually  fall  below 
$12.95/month  for  existing  services  as  increasing  subscribership  drives  down  costs. 
In  addition,  with  the  loss  of  two  head-to-head  competitors,  consumers  will  suffer 
from the gradual price creep that will likely occur over time, as in the monopolistic 
cable  industry.  Gradual  increases,  though  less  noticeable,  have  a  dramatic  adverse 
impact  on  consumers  over  time.  A  five  to  10  percent  annual  increase  over  a  period 
of years takes a significant bite out of the consumer’s wallet, as any long-time cable 
subscriber will attest. 
Consumer Choice Denied 

XM and Sirius assert that a significant benefit of the merger is greater consumer 
choice.  A  careful  analysis  demonstrates  that  such  choice  is  badly  circumscribed, 
comes  at  a  cost,  and  is  insufficient  to  compensate  for  the  loss  in  choice  consumers 
have now: the ability to choose services from two competitors. 

First,  XM  and  Sirius  contend  that  eventually  consumers  will  be  able  to  receive 
content  offered  on  both  systems  and  in  the  short  term,  consumers  will  be  offered 
some  of  the  content  offered  on  the  other  competitors  system  but  unavailable  from 
their  current  service.  For  example,  subscribers  currently  able  to  get  only  the  NFL 
or  NLB  channels  will  be  able  to  purchase  both.  Note,  however,  that  the  purported 
increased choice will come at a cost. The merging parties do not claim to offer those 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

28 

additional channels at the same cost of existing services. The parties offered conces-
sion  to  hold  prices  near  current  levels  not  only  does  little  more  than  freeze  pricing 
for  yesterday’s  services,  that  promise  does  not  apply  to  new  packages  that  include 
the combined services of the two companies. In fact, it is very likely that the ‘‘merg-
er  benefits’’  of  combining  these  offerings  will  require  consumers  to  pay  much  more 
than $12.95/month to receive premium channels. It is also reasonable to expect that 
to  get  those  premium  channels,  consumers  would  likely  be  required  to  ‘‘buy- 
through:’’ to receive the premium channels at additional cost, consumers may be re-
quired to first buy the large basic package. 

Second, despite XM and Sirius claims that channel capacity is not a limiting fac-
tor,  significant  concerns  exist  that  to  make  those  additional  programming  options 
available, the services will have to drop existing channels, including non-duplicative 
offerings,  reducing  consumers’  choice,  or  alternatively  degrade  audio  quality.18 
Channels  with  specific  DJs  consumers  once  enjoyed  may  be  unavailable.  In  that 
case,  there  is  little  consumer  benefit  to  the  merger  and  substantial  costs  in  terms 
of  lost  channel  choice.  And  when  dual  platform  receivers  ultimately  become  avail-
able,  enabling  consumers  to  receive  all  channels  from  both  providers,  it  is  unclear 
what  they’ll  cost  and  whether  the  parties  will  offer  them  to  consumers  at  reduced 
or no cost. 

Third,  the  merging  parties  assert  that  they’ll  offer  consumers  greater  choice  by 
offering  specialty  tiers  or  give  them  the  ability  to  opt-out  of  channels  and  deduct 
the  cost  of  those  channels  from  their  bill.  This  choice,  however,  could  be  available 
today.  But  instead,  consumers  in  the  satellite  radio  space  are  afflicted  by  the  very 
same  pricing  practices  that  afflict  cable  consumers.  Not  only  are  prices  high,  but 
also  the  consumer  is  offered  only  large  bundles  of  channels  over  which  they  have 
no choice. Consumer choice and consumer sovereignty are denied. In a product mar-
ket  where  the  marginal  production  cost  of  adding  subscribers  is  almost  zero,  the 
bundling strategy is largely anti-consumer.19 

This merger promises to make matters worse, with large capacity systems joining 
to  create  larger  consumer  bundles  at  higher  prices.  The  offer  to  give  consumers 
greater  pricing  flexibility  is  not  accompanied  by  promises  that  consumers  won’t  be 
forced to buy-through to get specialty bundles, nor by assurances that the ‘‘cost’’ de-
ducted  from  consumers  for  ‘‘opt-out’’  channels  will  actually  reflect  the  cost  of  the 
programming for that channel. The cost to Sirius of Howard Stern’s channel, which 
some  listeners  may  find  objectionable,  is  arguably  higher  than  the  cost  of  a  music 
channel,  where  production  costs  are  substantially  lower.  The  merging  parties’  con-
cession  not  only  fails  to  provide  the  real  channel-by-channel  choice  consumers  de-
mand, it is unlikely to provide any meaningful cost benefits. 

The  purported  choice  benefits  simply  do  not  compensate  for  the  real  choices  con-
sumers  will  lose:  the  choice  between  two  head-to-head  competitors.  Today,  con-
sumers who want different options have the ability to switch providers, albeit at sig-
nificant switching costs. But that possibility forces the two providers to continue in-
novating,  improving  their  services,  developing  differentiating  features  like  package 
flexibility,  and  competing  on  price.  Because  this  is  a  unique  product  market,  once 
the competition is eliminated, the primary driver of innovation and progress in both 
programming and technology—competition in the market—will be eliminated. Inno-
vation will slow to the pace preferred by the monopolist. 

In  addition,  the  merger  harms  independent  content  producers,  DJs,  artists  and 
personalities  who  now  have  two  competitors  to  play  off  one  another  when  negoti-
ating for carriage or ‘‘air-time.’’ As we have seen in cable, concentration in distribu-
tion reduces access for content producers. Proposals made by some that, as a condi-
tion  of  the  merger,  some  capacity  should  be  reserved  for  independent  non-commer-
cial  channels 20 may  promote  limited  content  diversity,  but  it  does  not  compensate 
for the loss of bargaining power that independent commercial content producers will 
suffer  when  faced  with  the  market  power  of  a  single  distributor.  At  the  end  of  the 
day,  the  loss  of  choice  for  content  producer  translates  into  fewer  choices  and  less 
program diversity for consumers. 

While  the  merging  parties  assert  the  benefit  of  the  merger  is  greater  consumer 
choice  in  channel  programming  offered  by  both  parties,  there  has  been  little  focus 
on  the  fact  that  it  is  the  parties’  own  practices  that  have  denied  consumers  this 

18 Charles  Babington,  ‘‘Radio  Deal  Could  Face  Technical  Difficulties,’’  Washington  Post, 

Mar. 19, 2007, at D1. 

19 The marginal production costs are certainly every low, if not zero, but we are told that the 
marginal  transaction  costs  (i.e.,  customer  acquisition  costs)  are  high.  However,  it  appears  that 
this problem is a function of the bundling strategy. Having set such a high threshold price, the 
companies are forced to market aggressively to a much narrower market segment. 

20 See e.g., Sohn, supra note 9. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

29 

choice  in  the  past.  Despite  requirements  by  the  FCC  and  the  terms  of  their  own 
patent  dispute  settlement  to  develop  and  provide  interoperable  radios  that  would 
have allowed consumers to switch providers without switching equipment, the com-
panies  have  failed  to  meet  that  commitment.  Claims  by  XM  and  Sirius  that  they 
were  required  only  to  ‘‘develop’’  the  radio,  but  not  to  take  steps  to  ensure  it  was 
commercially available provides little comfort to consumers denied greater switching 
choice nor should it ease criticism that these parties sought to comply with only the 
narrowest interpretation of the commitment. Instead of promoting consumer choice, 
the  merging  parties  have  forced  consumers  to  invest  in  equipment  that  works  with 
just  one  service,  and  once  so  invested,  their  choice  is  reduced.  Today,  we  are  asked 
to  recognize  choice  benefits  of  a  merger  between  two  parties  who  have  made  con-
certed decisions to deny consumers choice that would otherwise have been available. 
For policymakers inclined to accept the notion that consumers are better off with 
one  rather  than  two  satellite  radio  providers,  we  recommend  that  the  spectrum  oc-
cupied  by  one  of  the  current  licenses  be  divested  and  made  available  for  other  con-
sumer services. If all the Nation needs is one satellite radio company, why not auc-
tion half of the XM-Sirius spectrum for other commercial uses? Surely a free-market 
auction would enrich the Federal Treasury with plenty of money to compensate sat-
ellite  radio  subscribers  for  any  sunk  equipment  costs,  offer  consumers  new 
broadband  or  other  wireless  services,  and  still  enable  Sirius  and  XM  to  combine 
their best offerings with substantial channel capacity. 
Conclusion 

A satellite radio merger to monopoly is about an avalanche of mergers. There was 
a  key  moment  a  decade  ago  when  the  Department  of  Justice  decided  that  a  large 
monopolist is no worse then two smaller monopolists and allowed the Bell Atlantic/ 
NYNEX  merger  to  go  forward.  That  decision  opened  the  door  to  a  wave  of  mergers 
that doomed head-to-head competition in telecommunications. The old telephone mo-
nopoly  was  recreated  as  two  huge  geographically  distinct  monopolies  that  rarely,  if 
ever, compete. 

A  satellite  radio  merger  to  monopoly  will  perform  a  similar  bellwether  function. 
If the agencies with oversight adopt a loose definition of products and markets and 
allow a merger to monopoly on the basis of intermodal competition, then a tsunami 
of mergers could ripple through the digital space at the worst possible moment. The 
firms  that  have  declared  their  undying  hostility  to  the  open  flow  of  products  in  the 
digital  economy  (broadcasters,  telephone/cellular  companies,  cable  companies),  will 
now  be  empowered  to  capture  and  stifle  the  alternatives,  under  the  premise  that 
every media and telecommunications product competes with all others and that new 
technologies and services will come along to protect the consumer in any case. That 
relief, however, will be slow and insufficient because the competitive core of the dig-
ital economy will have been damaged and the critical terrain of the digital economy 
will be controlled by entities that have the same anti-competitive, anti-consumer ob-
jectives as the merging parties in this case. 

We urge the Congress to tell the FCC and antitrust authorities to put the brakes 
on the proposed XM-Sirius merger unless and until significant questions on competi-
tion  and  consumer  impacts  are  fully  addressed  and  satisfactorily  answered.  It  is 
time to hold the line against the greatest threat to a competitive and diverse media: 
mergers that concentrate ownership in too few hands. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Kimmelman.  And 

now may I recognize Ms. Sohn. 
STATEMENT OF GIGI B. SOHN, PRESIDENT AND CO-FOUNDER, 

PUBLIC KNOWLEDGE 

Ms.  SOHN.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Ste-
vens,  and  other  members  of  the  Committee  for  inviting  me  here 
today.  The  proposed  merger  invites  a  dilemma  for  public  interest 
advocates.  On  one  hand,  the  only  two  providers  of  satellite  radio 
services  which  have  vigorously  competed  over  the  past  5  years  are 
seeking to consolidate, raising questions about the impact on prices 
and choice for consumers. On the other hand, this competition has 
left both companies weakened in a world where other multichannel 
music entertainment and information options are increasingly pop-
ular. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

30 

The  salient  question  is  this:  How  will  consumers  be  better  off? 
I  believe  that  if  the  merger  passes  antitrust  scrutiny,  one  strong 
company that is subject to conditions that protect consumer choice, 
promotes  diverse  programming  and  keep  prices  in  check  will  best 
serve consumers. The antitrust questions raised here are very com-
plex and ultimately depend on information to which Public Knowl-
edge  does  not  have  access.  Despite  the  availability  of  an  increas-
ingly  wide  variety  of  radio,  wireless,  mobile  and  multichannel 
music services, it is unclear how consumers would react if satellite 
radio  prices  were  raised.  Data  on  how  and  why  consumers  choose 
to spend their money on satellite radio would be helpful in making 
that determination. 

And  I  must  say,  I  don’t  agree  with  my  friend  and  colleague’s 
comparison  of  this  merger  to  the  cable  industry  looking  at  broad-
casting  in  1984,  because  a  lot  of  people  get  cable  and  DBS  to  get 
their  over-the-air  stations.  They  see  it  as  a  necessary  complement. 
It  is  not  the  case  here.  The  markets  are  very  different,  so  I  just 
caution  the  Committee  that  that  1984  comparison  has  some  holes 
in it. 

Even if the merger survives initial antitrust scrutiny, significant 
competitive  concerns  remain.  Therefore,  the  merger  should  be  ap-
proved  only  if  it  is  subject  to  the  following  three  conditions.  First, 
the  new  company  should  make  available  tiered  program  choices. 
For  example,  the  company  can  make  available  a  music  or  sports 
tier,  which  would  cost  less  than  subscribing  to  the  entire  service. 
Second, the new company should ensure programming diversity by 
making  available  5  percent  of  its  capacity  for  noncommercial  pro-
gramming over which it has no editorial control. This would resem-
ble  a  requirement  for  DBS  providers.  Third,  the  new  company 
should be prohibited from raising the price for its new consolidated 
programming package for 3 years. 

In  addition,  policymakers  should  determine  whether  the  new 
company should divest all or some of its extra spectrum it will have 
after  the  merger.  There  are  several  reasons  why  we  believe  that  a 
properly  conditioned  merger  would  be  in  the  public  interest.  First, 
consistent  reports  and  slowing  subscribership  at  both  companies 
make it less likely that they will take a chance on alternative pro-
gramming  and  programming  that  meets  the  needs  of  the  under-
served.  A  combined  subscriber  base  would  allow  the  new  company 
to  distribute  the  fixed  cost  of  the  satellite  system  across  a  larger 
consumer base, reducing cost per subscriber and enabling new pro-
gramming  and  lower  prices.  Second,  consumers  would  gain  access 
to  channels  they  could  not  receive  unless  they  subscribe  to  both 
services. Third, eliminating new and diverse programming. 

I’ll  conclude  by  raising  two  other  concerns.  First,  Public  Knowl-
edge  opposes  any  merger  condition  involving  limits  on  the  ability 
of  consumers  to  record  satellite  radio  services.  This  would  amount 
to  repealing  the  Home  Audio  Programming  Act  which  specifically 
protects a consumer’s ability to record digital music. Two, local pro-
gramming.  Broadcasters  opposition  to  this  merger  is  hypocritical 
given  their  own  regulatory  efforts  to  consolidate.  And  I  must  say, 
it’s  interesting  how  the  broadcasters  always  bring  all  of  the  folks 
who have 30 stations and 20 stations. I just can’t believe that large 
group  owners  like  Clear  Channel  with  1,200  stations  do  not  com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

31 

pete nationally. You have to look at syndicated programming to see 
whether  there  is  an  integration  of  demands.  You  don’t  look  at  the 
guy  that  owns  30  stations,  you  look  at  the  people  that  own  1,200 
and  1,300  and  1,400  stations,  and  with  content  and  other  regu-
latory restrictions, is itself anticompetitive. There is no reason why 
today any media service should have a government granted monop-
oly over local programming. 

Senator Lautenberg, you asked about what the public interest is. 
The  public  interest  is  in  more  local  programming,  not  less.  And  if 
you  allow  satellite  radio  to  provide  local  programming  you’ll  have 
that.  Regardless  of  the  current  satellite  radio  company’s  intent  to 
provide  local  service,  others  should  not  be  barred  from  doing  so. 
While  broadcasters  talk  about  a  ‘‘level  playing  field’’  their  sup-
ported  programming  limits  an  opposition  to  paying  the  same  per-
formance fees to artists that all other radio services pay, and reveal 
the industry’s desire for government sanctioned competitive advan-
tage. I look forward to your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Sohn follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GIGI B. SOHN, PRESIDENT AND CO-FOUNDER, 

PUBLIC KNOWLEDGE 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and other members of the Committee, 
my name is Gigi B. Sohn. I am the President of Public Knowledge, a nonprofit pub-
lic interest organization that addresses the public’s stake in the convergence of com-
munications policy and intellectual property law. I want to thank the Committee for 
inviting me to testify on the proposed merger of XM Satellite Radio and Sirius Sat-
ellite Radio. 
Introduction and Summary 

The  merger  of  XM  Satellite  Radio  and  Sirius  Satellite  Radio  presents  a  dilemma 
for public interest advocates. On the one hand, the only two providers of radio serv-
ices via satellite, who have vigorously competed over the past five and a half years, 
are seeking to consolidate, immediately raising questions about the impact on prices 
and  choice  for  consumers.  On  the  other  hand,  this  vigorous  competition  has  led  to 
a  spending  war  for  new  and  better  programming,  leaving  both  competitors  weak-
ened in a world where Internet radio, HD radio, cable radio and other multichannel 
music, entertainment and information services have become increasingly popular. 

Some  will  say  that  XM  and  Sirius’  current  financial  state  is  a  problem  of  their 
own devising—that a service that was intended largely to provide an alternative for 
the strict playlists and over-commercialization of broadcast radio spent lavishly and 
foolishly  on  radio  personalities  and  major  league  sports.  They  will  also  say  that  al-
lowing  a  merger  is  a  government  ‘‘bail-out.’’  I  agree  with  both  of  these  statements. 
But I do not believe that that is where the focus should be. 

Instead, the salient question for policymakers is this: if this merger is simply de-
nied,  will  consumers  be  better  off?  Given  the  financial  state  of  both  companies,  the 
slowing growth of their customer base and the increasing competition in the market-
place,  it  appears  likely  that  in  the  absence  of  a  merger,  both  services  will  continue 
to  limp  along  instead  of  investing  in  new  and  diverse  programming.  Might  it  not 
be  better  for  consumers  to  permit  the  merger  under  conditions  that  provide  ex-
panded  programming  and  pricing  choice,  along  with  temporary  measures  to  keep 
prices in check? After a great deal of discussion with my public interest colleagues, 
former  regulators  and  antitrust  experts,  I  believe  that  the  latter  is  the  best  course. 
Thus,  the  XM  and  Sirius  Satellite  radio  merger  should  be  approved  only  if  it  is 

subject to the following three conditions: 

• the  new  company  makes  available  pricing  choices  such  as  tiered  programming. 
• the  new  company  makes  5  percent  of  its  capacity  available  to  non-commercial 
educational  and  informational  programming  over  which  it  has  no  editorial  con-
trol. 
• the new company agrees not to raise prices for its combined programming pack-
age (as opposed to each individual company’s current programming package) for 
3 years after the merger is approved. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

32 

Two  other  points  warrant  mention  here.  The  first  is  our  strong  opposition  to  any 
merger  condition  involving  limitations  on  the  ability  of  consumers  to  record  these 
satellite  radio  services.  Such  a  condition  would  be  tantamount  to  repealing  the 
Audio Home Recording Act, which specifically protects a consumer’s ability to record 
digital music. 

The second is to urge Congress and the FCC to permit satellite radio broadcasters 
to do more, and not less, local programming. Broadcasters’ opposition to this merger 
and to satellite radio’s provision of local traffic, weather and emergency information 
is  not  only  incredibly  hypocritical  given  their  own  current  regulatory  efforts  to  con-
solidate,  but  it  is  also  anticompetitive  in  its  own  right.  Even  assuming  that  broad-
casters take seriously their statutory duty to serve local communities with program-
ming  that  serves  local  needs  (and  not  just  traffic  and  weather),  there  is  no  reason 
why,  in  2007,  any  media  service  should  have  a  government-granted  monopoly  over 
local programming. 
Whether the Proposed Merger Would Survive Antitrust Scrutiny is a Close 

Call and Warrants Thorough Analysis 

Let me say at the outset that I am not an antitrust expert. Luckily, I have several 
colleagues  who  are.  After  conferring  with  them,  I  can  only  conclude  that  the  anti-
trust  questions  raised  here  are  very  complex  and  ultimately  depend  on  information 
to which Public Knowledge does not have access.1 

Take,  for  instance,  the  critical  question  of  what  would  be  the  relevant  market.  If 
one views the relevant product market solely as satellite delivered radio service, the 
proposed transaction could be characterized as a ‘‘merger to monopoly,’’ which would 
strongly  suggest  outright  rejection.  Some  of  my  public  interest  and  academic  col-
leagues,  whom  I  respect  enormously,  do  just  that.  For  instance,  the  satellite  radio 
broadcasters are the only services that provide listeners with certain programming, 
available  at  both  high  quality  and  from  a  mobile  device.  The  satellite  services  also 
provide  the  only  continuous  national  market  for  certain  types  of  broadcasting.  For 
example,  only  on  satellite  radio  can  a  New  York  Mets  baseball  fan  listen  to  the 
team’s  baseball  games  anywhere  in  the  Nation,  or  even  as  one  drives  from  state  to 
state. 

On the other hand, if the market is defined more broadly to include a wide variety 
of  radio,  mobile,  and  multi-channel  music  services,  a  regulator  might  reach  a  very 
different  result.  Indeed,  XM  and  Sirius’  services  overlap  with  and  have  effects  on 
several different services (including video, if you include their feeds of cable shows). 
Competitors  in  this  broader  market  would  include  over-the-air  broadcast  and  HD 
radio, Internet radio services, cable (and DBS) radio, and wireless phone music and 
services  like  Sprint  Radio,  MobiTV,  and  V-Cast,  as  well  as  podcasts  that  can  be 
downloaded onto MP3 players.2 

A  more  broadly-defined  market  would  include  all  of  the  services  to  which  con-
sumers  would  readily  turn  if  satellite  radio  prices  were  raised.  Anecdotal  evidence 
suggests  that  there  is  no  shortage  of  substitutes.3 Still,  we  cannot  ignore  the  fact 
that there are real differences between satellite radio and its competitors. 

For  instance,  an  audiophile  colleague  of  mine  is  puzzled  over  my  love  of  satellite 
radio because he receives all the new music he wants (for free) from Internet radio. 
In addition to providing highly diverse and specialized programming, Internet radio 
is becoming more mobile, and as a result is becoming a viable competitor to satellite 
radio.4 However, wireless services still may lack the higher-quality sound of satellite 

1 A  former  official  of  the  Department  of  Justice’s  Antitrust  Division  apparently  agrees  with 
this  assessment.  See  Statement  of  Charles  E.  Biggio,  Wilson,  Sonsini,  Goodrich  &  Rosati,  PC; 
Before  the  Antitrust  Task  Force,  Committee  on  the  Judiciary,  U.S.  House  of  Representatives 
Concerning  Competition  and  the  Future  of  Digital  Music,  February  28,  2007.  (‘‘Right  now,  we 
do not have all the facts necessary to determine the legality of the merger’’). 

2 Moreover, it appears that Sirius and XM may soon no longer be the only satellite radio pro-
viders.  Slacker,  a  new  service,  is  slated  to  begin  delivering  music  to  consumers  via  satellite  in 
the  near  future.  See,  e.g.,  Associated  Press,  Start-Up  Launches  ‘Personal  Radio’  Service,  Mar. 
14, 2007, available at http://online.wsj.com/article/SB117388069334336810.html. 

3 See,  e.g.,  David  Bank  &  Ryan  Vineyard,  Wedding  Bells  Are  Ringing  For  XMSR  And  SIRI, 

RBC Capital Markets Industry Comment: Broadcasting and Cable TV, Feb. 20, 2007, 1, 4. 

4 A number of mobile carriers are currently providing streaming audio, video, and data to the 
mobile phone handsets they sell, generally on an exclusive basis between the wireless and con-
tent providers. This content is provided to the subscriber for a fee, typically in addition to wire-
less  data  fees,  as  these  services  are  usually  IP-based.  Verizon’s  V-Cast  provides  entertainment, 
sports,  news,  and  weather  video  clips,  music  downloads,  and  mobile  data;  Verizon  is  also  em-
ploying  new  MediaFLO  technology  to  directly  distribute  content  to  handsets,  apart  from  their 
data-based network. Clear Channel and MobiTV are exclusive providers of streaming audio and 
video  content  to  Cingular  subscribers.  Sprint  Mobile  currently  provides  a  number  of  streaming 
radio channels, from Music Choice, Rhapsody, Sprint Radio, and Sirius; it is also aiming to pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

33 

radio, and recent, drastic increases in the already-high webcasting royalty rates may 
drive a lot of Internet radio services out of business.5 Podcasts, which many satellite 
consumers may consider an easy substitute for satellite programming, are provided 
via a ‘‘pull’’ technology, where the consumer picks and chooses content. In contrast, 
satellite  radio  is  a  ‘‘push’’  technology  in  which  the  consumer  may  receive  new  con-
tent  without  specifically  selecting  it.  And  while  broadcast  radio  is  becoming  a  clear 
satellite competitor with multi-channel and some commercial-free HD services, it is 
a local service that still hews to strict music playlists and is largely advertiser sup-
ported.6 Of  course,  a  product  needn’t  be  identical  to  be  substitutable.7 While  intu-
itively  it  would  seem  that  at  least  some  of  these  competitors  could  act  as  sub-
stitutes,  the  important  part  of  this  question  is  not  whether  consumers  can  conceiv-
ably  switch,  but  if  they  will,  given  the  switching  costs.  Evidence  of  past  pricing  be-
havior 8 and  data  on  how  and  why  consumers  choose  to  spend  their  money  on  sat-
ellite radio would be most helpful to answer this question. 

In the end, whether or not the merger is approved should depend upon its effects 
for  consumers  and  for  the  market.  If,  for  instance,  the  merger  increases  net  effi-
ciencies  through  the  sharing  of  expensive  infrastructure,  or  if  the  merger  prevents 
one  company’s  assets  from  being  lost  altogether,  then  these  factors  would  favor  ap-
proval. We look forward to the antitrust authorities’ thorough analysis of the merg-
er’s impact on consumers. 
The  Failed  2002  Merger  of  DIRECTV  and  Echostar  Does  Not  Provide  a 

Basis for Denying the Merger of XM and Sirius 

Some  argue  that  this  proposed  merger  should  be  denied  based  on  its  similarity 
to  the  failed  2002  merger  of  the  Direct  Broadcast  Satellite  providers  Echostar  and 
DIRECTV.  But  there  are  significant  differences  between  the  two  mergers,  as  well 
as lessons from the 2002 merger that caution a different result here. 

The  foremost  difference  between  the  two  mergers  is  that  consumers’  options  for 
both  audio  programming  and  multichannel  video  programming  have  changed  dras-
tically  over  the  past  5  years.  Just  5  years  ago,  nobody  had  an  iPod  jack  in  their 
car;  cellular  phone  companies  did  not  provide  mobile  music  services;  and  WiMax 
and other mobile Internet services were no more than gleams in technologists’ eyes. 
Similarly,  in  2002  neither  telephone  companies  nor  webcasters  were  providing  any 
significant  multichannel  video  services.  Given  the  changes  in  the  multi-channel 
video market, I am not certain that the Echostar/DIRECTV merger would be denied 
today. 

Second,  there  are  important  differences  between  multichannel  video  and  audio 
services. Most important among these is that many, if not most, subscribers to cable 
and  DBS  buy  these  services  to  get  better  (or  any)  local  TV  reception.9 Thus,  ‘‘free’’ 
over-the-air TV has had little effect on the price of multichannel video services, be-
cause  consumers  do  not  see  one  as  a  replacement  for  the  other,  but  rather  see  the 
multichannel  services  as  a  means  to  receive  the  free  services.  This  is  not  the  case 
with multichannel audio services. With a handful of exceptions, local radio stations 
are  not  carried  on  XM  and  Sirius,  and  consumers  only  subscribe  to  those  services 
because they are willing to pay for content they believe that over-the-air radio does 
not  carry.  However,  should  satellite  radio  prices  rise  or  competitors  such  as  over- 
the-air  radio  provide  cheaper  and  comparable  content,  there  would  be  much  less  of 
a reason for consumers to continue to subscribe to XM or Sirius. 

Finally, it could be fairly argued that denying the Echostar/DIRECTV merger did 
not  benefit  consumers.  Supporters  of  that  merger  argued  that  one  strong  satellite 
TV  company  would  provide  better  competition  to  incumbent  cable  than  two  weak 

vide  more  competition  for  high-speed  data  and  competitive  video  streaming  with  WiMax  tech-
nology. 

5 See,  e.g.,  Eliot  Van  Buskirk,  Royalty  Hike  Panics  Webcasters,  Wired  News,  Mar.  6,  2007, 

http://www.wired.com/news/culture/music/0,72879-0.html. 

6 As  evidenced  by  its  appearance  here  today  and  its  strong  opposition  to  the  merger,  there 

is little doubt that the broadcast industry views satellite radio as a substitute. 

7 United  States  v.  E.I.  du  Pont  de  Nemours  &  Co.,  351  U.S.  377,  394  (1956).  Although  each 
of these products differs in the technical and legal details of how a user receives audio content, 
the  various  products  are  still  competitors  to  the  extent  that  consumers  could  migrate  from  one 
to another due to a change in price. 

8 One  analyst  argues  that  if  XM  and  Sirius  did  constitute  an  entire  market,  there  should  be 
evidence that they are engaging in oligopoly-like behavior, and reaping similar profits. The fact 
that  they  are  both  losing  money  suggests  otherwise.  Blair  Levin,  Rebecca  Arbogast,  &  David 
Kaut,  XM-Sirius  Review:  Government  Approval  Close  Call  But  More  Likely  Than  Not,  Stifel 
Nicolaus Telecom, Media & Tech Regulatory, Feb. 20, 2007. 

9 Before  DBS  providers  were  required  to  carry  all  local  stations  if  they  carried  one  such  sta-
tion, many rural residents would subscribe to get access to television of any kind, whether local 
or not. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

34 

companies.  However,  at  the  behest  of  News  Corporation,  which  sought  to  purchase 
DIRECTV,  the  merger  was  denied.  As  a  result,  cable  prices  have  continued  to  go 
up, and two separate, weak DBS companies lack the capacity to provide a competi-
tive  broadband  service,  which  is  essential  to  compete  with  cable.  Nor  did  the  DBS 
companies  have  the  resources  to  bid  successfully  for  new  Advanced  Wireless  Serv-
ices spectrum, which might have given them adequate broadband capacity. 

I  see  parallels  to  the  DBS  merger  here—one  strong  satellite  radio  company  will 
be able to push radio broadcasters to provide better, more diverse programming and 
fewer commercials, particularly as broadcasters provide multiple HD radio streams. 
This competition could be even stronger if satellite radio providers are permitted to 
do more local programming, which they are currently prohibited from providing ex-
cept in narrow circumstances. But two weak companies are unlikely to provide any 
competitive or political pressure on broadcasters, which goes a long way to explain-
ing that industry’s opposition to the merger. 
The  Proposed  Merger  Would  be  in  the  Public  Interest  if  it  is  Subject  to 
Conditions  Which  Promote  Diversity,  Preserve  Consumer  Choice  and 
Keep Prices in Check 

Even if the merger survives initial antitrust scrutiny, significant competitive con-
cerns remain. Therefore, the public interest would be served only by permitting the 
merger  subject  to  conditions  that  promote  diversity,  preserve  consumer  choice  and 
keep prices in check. 

I reach this conclusion for several reasons. First, over the past several years, both 
companies have consistently lost money, and subscriber growth has slowed,10 which 
makes it less likely that they will take a chance on alternative programming or pro-
gramming provided to under-served communities. For example, in 2005 XM dropped 
almost all of its world music channels, including one channel devoted entirely to Af-
rican  music.  Around  the  same  time  it  dropped  its  alternative  Spanish  music  pro-
gramming,  opting  for  more  popular  Spanish  fare.  The  desire  to  attract  the  largest 
number  of  listeners  and  the  high  fixed  costs  of  operating  a  satellite  service  will 
make  it  difficult  for  each  service,  with  its  relatively  small  subscriber  base,  to  take 
chances  on  alternative  programming  and/or  lower  prices.  Combining  the  subscriber 
base  of  the  two  companies  would  allow  the  new  entity  to  expand  the  diversity  of 
its programming to better serve niche preferences of the larger base. Increased pro-
gram  diversity  would  not  only  benefit  satellite  radio  customers,  it  would  likely  en-
courage competitors such as broadcast radio to provide more diverse programming.11 
Second, consumers would be served by gaining access to channels that they could 
not  receive  unless  they  subscribed  to  both  services.  No  longer  would  a  consumer 
have  to  choose  between  Major  League  Baseball  and  the  National  Football  League, 
Martha  Stewart  and  Oprah  or  National  Public  Radio  and  XM  Public  Radio  (which 
features  the  still-popular  former  NPR  personality  Bob  Edwards).  Moreover,  to  the 
extent that the new company will eliminate duplicative channels, there will be more 
capacity for new and diverse programming (which could even include video program-
ming).  In  addition,  as  discussed  below,  we  would  urge  the  FCC  to  permit  the  new 
company to provide increased local programming, including news and public affairs, 
which would directly compete with over-the-air broadcast radio. 

However, the magnitude of this merger indicates that it will increase market con-
centration  to  some  extent.  Existing  satellite  subscribers  may  have  significant 
switching  costs  to  other  services,  and  will  certainly  have  no  perfect  substitutes.  In 
order  to  ensure  that  the  efficiencies  from  the  merger  will  in  fact  result  in  greater 
program diversity, increased consumer choice, and better pricing, the merger should 
only be approved subject to the following three conditions: 

• Consumer  Choice.  The  new  company  should  make  available  to  its  customers 
tiered  program  choices.  For  example,  the  company  could  make  a  music  tier  or 
a  sports  tier  available  to  consumers,  which  would  cost  less  than  subscribing  to 
the entire service. 
• Non-commercial  Set-Aside.  The  new  company  should  make  available  5  percent 
of  its  capacity  for  noncommercial  educational  and  informational  programming 

10 See, e.g., Craig Moffett, XMSR and SIRI: Where to from here? Bernstein Research, Feb. 20, 
2007,  8–13  (showing  projected  losses  and  declining  net  subscriber  growth  for  both  companies). 
See  also  Richard  Siklos  and  Andrew  Ross  Sorkin,  Merger  Would  End  Satellite  Radio’s  Rivalry, 
N.Y.  TIMES,  available  at  http://www.nytimes.com/2007/02/20/business/media/20radio.html 
(noting  combined  $6  billion  in  losses  and  slower-than-expected  growth).  One  commentator  has 
surmised  that  many  consumers  have  hesitated  to  subscribe  to  satellite  radio  services  ‘‘because 
they  didn’t  know  which  company  would  survive.’’  James  Surowiecki,  Satellite  Sisters,  THE NEW 
YORKER, March 19, 2007 

11 See, Suroweicki, supra note 10. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

35 

over  which  it  will  have  no  editorial  control.  There  is  precedent  for  this  kind  of 
non-commercial set-aside. Section 335 of the Communications Act requires a Di-
rect  Broadcast  Satellite  provider  to  ‘‘reserve  a  portion  of  its  channel  capacity, 
equal  to  not  less  than  4  percent  nor  more  than  7  percent,  exclusively  for  non- 
commercial  programming  of  an  educational  or  informational  nature.’’ 12 This 
would  ensure  a  diversity  of  programming  choices  and  would  grant  access  to  a 
national service to programmers who normally would not have any. As with the 
DBS  set-aside,  the  new  company  could  not  fill  it  with  programmers  already  on 
its  system,  and  no  non-commercial  programmer  would  be  able  to  control  more 
than one of these channels. 
• Three-Year  Freeze  on  Price  Increases.  Because  of  the  expected  gains  from  the 
merger  and  because  competing  services  are  still  nascent,  the  new  company 
should  be  prohibited  from  raising  prices  for  3  years  after  the  merger  is  ap-
proved.  This  price  freeze  should  apply  to  the  combined  programming  package 
of the new entity, and not just to the current service of each individual satellite 
radio provider.13 

In  addition,  the  FCC  should  determine  whether  the  new  company  should  divest 
all  or  some  of  the  extra  12.5  MHz  of  spectrum  that  it  will  have  as  a  result  of  the 
merger.  If,  as  Sirius  CEO  (and  presumptive  CEO  of  the  new  company)  Mel 
Karmazin  has  testified,  the  new  company  will  not  be  providing  local  programming 
even  if  it  is  given  the  authority  to  do  so,  there  may  be  no  reason  for  the  new  com-
pany to control double the spectrum that the individual companies have today. 

There  is  a  belief  among  some  of  that  if  this  merger  is  approved,  then  no  other 
merger  involving  digital  media  will  ever  be  denied.  But  that  need  not  be  the  case 
if the antitrust authorities and the FCC are clear that the merger is being approved 
based  upon  very  specific  facts  and  circumstances.  This  merger  involves  a  national 
service that has become a luxury item for less than 5 percent of Americans. As such, 
approval should have no impact on any questions about any proposed consolidation 
of local broadcasters. 
This  Merger  Should  Not  Be  Conditioned  on  any  Limits  on  Consumers’ 

Right to Record Satellite Radio 

For the past 18 months, the recording industry and XM Satellite Radio have been 
engaged  in  a  battle  over  whether  XM  should  pay  an  extra  licensing  fee  for  selling 
a receiver that allows consumers to record blocks of programming and disaggregate 
it  into  individual  songs.  In  the  alternative,  the  recording  industry  has  sought  to 
have XM embed technological protection measures that would prohibit this activity. 
This dispute is the subject of an ongoing lawsuit in the Second Circuit 14 and pend-
ing legislation in the Senate.15 

Public Knowledge is concerned that the recording industry will attempt to use the 
merger to limit consumers’ ability to record satellite radio transmissions. Consumers 
have  been  permitted  to  record  radio  transmissions  since  the  invention  of  the  tape 
player,  and  that  ability  is  specifically  protected  under  the  Audio  Home  Recording 
Act, 17 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq., which prohibits any copyright infringement action: 

. . .  based  on  the  manufacture,  importation,  or  distribution  of  a  digital  audio 
recording device, a digital audio recording medium, an analog recording device, 
or  an  analog  recording  medium,  or  based  on  the  noncommercial  use  by  a  con-
sumer of such a device or medium for making digital musical recordings or ana-
log musical recordings. 

(Emphasis added.) 
The record companies have questioned whether the Audio Home Recording Act is 
in  need  of  revision  and  repeal  in  light  of  changing  technologies.  While  this  might 
be  a  legitimate  question,  the  place  to  ask  that  question  is  before  Congress,  not  in 
the  context  of  a  merger.  Moreover,  to  the  extent  that  such  a  condition  might  be 
sought at the FCC, the Federal courts have already ruled that the Commission has 

12 47 U.S.C. § 335(b)(1). 
13 Ever  since  Mr.  Karmazin  promised  that  the  combined  company  would  not  raise  prices  for 
its service at a February 28 hearing before the House Antitrust Task Force, questions have been 
raised  by  FCC  Chairman  Martin  and  others  about  exactly  what  service  would  be  encompassed 
in the proposed price freeze. Stephen Labaton, FCC Chief Questioning Radio Deal, N.Y. TIMES, 
Mar.  7,  2007,  available  at  http://select.nytimes.com/search/restricted/article?res=F10816FB3E 
550C748CDDAA0894DF404 482. 

14 See  Atlantic  Recording  Corp.  v.  XM  Satellite  Radio,  Inc.,  No.  06  Civ.  3733  (S.D.N.Y. 

15 Platform  Equality  and  Remedies  for  Rights  Holders  in  Music  (PERFORM)  Act  of  2007,  S. 

Jan. 19, 2007). 

256, 110th Cong. (2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

36 

no  power  to  require  particular  technological  design  mandates  in  the  absence  of  ex-
press  Congressional  authority.16 Nor  does  the  FCC  have  the  power  to  require  XM 
to pay a licensing fee in exchange for the ability to sell such receivers. 
The  Broadcast  Industry’s  Opposition  to  the  Merger  is  Hypocritical  and 

Anticompetitive 

Claiming that it ‘‘fully supports competition on a level playing field,’’ the National 
Association  of  Broadcasters  opposes  this  merger  for  a  variety  of  reasons,  including 
that it would result in ‘‘state-sanctioned, monopoly control over the 25 MHz of spec-
trum allocated to satellite radio service,’’ that it ‘‘will not provide sufficient . . . pub-
lic interest benefits,’’ and that it is ‘‘a government bailout for questionable business 
decisions.’’ 17 

There  are  many  delicious  ironies  in  the  NAB’s  opposition  to  this  merger,18 but 
perhaps the most salient to this discussion is that as we speak, the broadcast indus-
try is seeking FCC relief in order to consolidate. And perhaps the primary rationale 
for  requesting  that  relief  is  the  supposedly  uncertain  and  deteriorating  financial 
state of the broadcast industry.19 

The  Committee  should  take  the  NAB’s  opposition  for  what  it  is  worth—the  last 
in  a  very  long  history  of  broadcaster  efforts  to  place  regulatory  roadblocks  in  the 
path  of  the  satellite  broadcast  industry.  This  history  started  about  15  years  ago 
when broadcasters tried to convince the FCC to impose content and other public in-
terest  obligations  on  satellite  radio.  It  has  continued  with  refusals  by  at  least  two 
broadcast groups to carry satellite radio advertising and by another broadcast group 
to insist that satellite radio carry advertisements when it programs channels on sat-
ellite  radio.20 Over  the  past  several  years,  the  broadcast  industry  has  concentrated 
its efforts to constrain satellite radio at the FCC and in Congress through attempts 
to  limit  satellite  radio  from  providing  local  programming,  including  weather,  traffic 
and emergency information.21 

It  is  no  secret  that  one  of  the  broadcast  industry’s  main  goals  in  opposing  this 
merger is to obtain conditions that would, if not entirely prohibit satellite radio from 
providing  local  programming,  prevent  any  increase  in  that  programming.  In  other 
words, in order to save local radio, the NAB seeks to have the government prohibit 
more local radio. 

Any conditions on the merger that would limit satellite radio from providing local 
programming  would  be  profoundly  anticompetitive  and  should  be  rejected.  Setting 
aside the question of whether ‘‘local’’ broadcasters take seriously their responsibility 
of  serving  their  local  communities  with  news  and  public  affairs  programming  (not 
just  traffic  and  weather),  there  is  no  rationale  for  shielding  broadcasters  from  com-
peting for local viewers and listeners. Indeed, rather than limiting such competition, 
Congress  and/or  the  FCC  should  permit  satellite  radio  and  other  national  services 
to provide more, not less, local programming.22 

16 Am. Library Assoc. v. FCC, 406 F.3d 689 (D.C. Cir. 2005). 
17 Statement  of  David  K.  Rehr,  President  and  CEO,  National  Association  of  Broadcasters, 
Hearing  on  Competition  and  the  Future  of  Digital  Music,  U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  Com-
mittee on the Judiciary, Antitrust Task Force, February 28, 2007. 

18 See  Gigi  Sohn,  From  the  Unmitigated  Gall  Department,  Public  Knowledge  Policy  Blog, 
http://www.publicknowledge.org/node/836.  For  example,  despite  its  alleged  desire  for  a  ‘‘level 
playing field,’’ the NAB is actively opposing any and all efforts to require their members to pay 
the  same  ‘‘performance’’  fees  to  artists  that  webcasters  and  satellite  radio  pays,  going  so  far  as 
to call that fee a ‘‘performance tax.’’ See http://www.publicknowledge.org/node/850. 

19 See,  e.g.,  Shira  Ovide,  Clear  Channel’s  Profit  Declines  54%,  WALL STREET JOURNAL,  1FEB. 
24,  2007 AT A6;  ASSOCIATED PRESS,  Earnings  Preview:  CBS  Corp,  available  at  http:// 
www.chron.com/disp/story.mpl/ap/fn/4583381.html,  Feb.  26,  2007  (noting  losses  in  the  ‘‘trou-
bled  radio  unit,’’  apparently  caused  by  ‘‘stagnation  in  the  overall  radio  market’’);  Comments  of 
the National Association of Broadcasters, FCC Quadrennial Ownership Review, MB Docket No. 
06–121  (Filed  Oct.  23,  2006)  29–35  available  at  http://www.nab.org/Content/ContentGroups/ 
Legal/Filings/2006/QuadrennialOwnership2006Final.pdf (‘‘In sum, the combination of competi-
tion  from  cable,  satellite,  the  Internet  and  other  digital  technologies  is  forcing  broadcasters  to 
fight even harder in the advertising marketplace.’’). 

20 See Sarah McBride, Four XM Music Stations Will Start Running Ads, WALL STREET JOUR-
NAL,  Mar. 8,  2006,  available  at  http://online.wsj.com/article/SB114178705518792190-email 
.html;  Clear  Channel’s  New  Plan  for  Satellite  Radio:  Make  it  Worse,  TECHDIRT,  Mar.  8,  2006, 
http://www.techdirt.com/articles/20060308/0836259.shtml. 

21 See the Local Emergency Radio Service Act of 2007, H.R. 983, 110th Cong. (2007). 
22 A  condition  limiting  local  programming  via  satellite  radio  should  not  be  imposed  even 
though  Mr.  Karmazin  has  testified  that  the  new  company  would  have  no  interest  in  providing 
such programming. Such a condition would limit the ability of any future satellite radio service 
or any entity that might in the future purchase the new company to provide local programming, 
giving broadcasters a ‘‘state-sanctioned monopoly control’’ over local programming. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

37 

Conclusion 

The proposed merger of XM Satellite Radio and Sirius Satellite Radio raises com-
plex antitrust questions. If these questions are resolved in favor of the merger, Pub-
lic  Knowledge  believes  that  with  conditions  that  protect  consumer  choice,  promote 
diverse programming and keep prices in check, the transaction is in the public inter-
est. I would like to thank the Committee again for inviting me to testify and I look 
forward to any questions you might have. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Ms. Sohn. Mr. Bank. 
STATEMENT OF DAVID BANK, MANAGING DIRECTOR, 

MEDIA AND BROADCASTING EQUITY RESEARCH ANALYST, 

RBC CAPITAL MARKETS 

Mr.  BANK.  Thank  you.  Good  morning,  Senator  Inouye,  Vice 
Chairman  Stevens,  members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  David 
Bank.  And  I  am  the  managing  director—equity  research  for  RBC 
Capital Markets, responsible for coverage of both the satellite radio 
and  traditional  radio  broadcasting  industries.  XM  Satellite  Radio 
and Sirius currently have combined enterprise value including debt 
and  equity  securities  of  approximately  $11  billion  traded  in  the 
public  markets.  I  hope  to  put  the  proposed  XM  and  Sirius  merger 
into  context  with  respect  to  the  issues  that  these  capital  markets 
are focused on. 

Of  these  issues,  the  first  and  foremost  would  be  the  potential 
synergies  and  subsequent  savings  that  we  believe  are  possible  in 
an XM and Sirius merger. We estimate the value of these synergies 
to  be  somewhere  between  $5  billion  and  $6  billion.  While  it  is  not 
etched  in  stone,  the  extent  to  which  the  combined  entity  might 
pass  savings  and  value  creation  on  to  consumers,  we  believe  that 
there  are  three  primary  constituencies  that  stand  to  benefit  finan-
cially from this $5 to $6 billion of savings. 

The  first  are  the  employees  of  each  company  as  the  viability  of 
the  combined  entity  becomes  stronger  with  greater  long-term  visi-
bility.  The  second  are  the  customers  and  consumers,  which  could 
probably benefit from greater innovation, more flexibility and pric-
ing,  and  a  more  diverse  selection  of  content.  And  third  are  the 
shareholders  who  will  see  value  creation  from  increased  long-term 
earnings potential. 

Synergies  would  likely  arise  in  two  fashions.  The  first  is  rather 
straightforward,  and  it  will  stem  from  simply  eliminating  redun-
dant  network  components,  marketing  costs  and  operating  support 
functions. 

The second is ultimately more difficult to quantify. It stems from 
a  potential  reduction  in  leverage  that  content  providers  such  as 
sports,  entertainment  and  news  services,  as  well  as  automotive 
manufacturers previously exercised, when XM and Sirius were bid-
ding separately for initial content and distribution contracts. These 
costs  extracted  from  XM  and  Sirius  in  the  form  of  fixed  payments, 
variable  revenue  share  payments  and  subsidies  have  been  signifi-
cant burdens, especially in light of slackening demand. 

At the time most of the original agreements were signed, satellite 
radio  technology  was  still  in  its  infancy  relative  to  consumer  ac-
ceptance.  Sirius  and  XM  were  very  aggressively  bidding  against 
each other for content and distribution deals that were key to long- 
term  survival  against  what  we  believe  is  a  broader  competitive 
backdrop  that  includes  standard  and  HD  terrestrial  radio,  iPods, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

38 

entertainment  over  cell  phone,  and  Internet  radio.  In  essence,  the 
industry  was  competing  against  itself  as  well  as  these  alternative 
distribution  platforms.  In  addition,  the  demand  for  satellite  radio 
subscriptions,  particularly  on  the  retail  or  non-automotive  side, 
was expected to be more robust than it ultimately turned out to be. 
As  an  illustration  of  this  change  in  demand,  look  at  the  picture 
against a backdrop of higher fixed costs. While our current expecta-
tion for year end 2010 subscribers for the combined industry is ap-
proximately  26  million  subscribers,  our  expectation  for  that  figure 
when we made the estimate two-and-a-half years ago was closer to 
33  million.  So  the  expectation  went  from  33  million  to  26  million 
by 2010. 

Now,  synergies  are  not  going  to  occur  overnight  but  rather  over 
a  period  of  years,  with  more  expected  to  be  realized  in  the  latter 
half  of  the  initial  5-year  period  after  merger,  because  most  agree-
ments that the auto manufacturers and content providers have en-
tered  into  are  relatively  long  term.  Most  will  not  expire  until  at 
least  2011.  In  addition,  in  our  view,  the  combined  company  will 
likely  need  to  maintain  two  separate  network  operating  architec-
tures for several years as it continues to service existing customers. 
The  itemized  details  of  these  synergies  by  line  item  can  be  seen 
in our report published January 12th, 2007, but the bottom line is 
according  to  our  estimates,  these  synergies  could  amount  to  value 
creation  for  XM  and  Sirius  stockholders  of  approximately  $8  and 
$1.73 per share respectively at the exchange ratios set forth in the 
XM  and  Sirius  merger  agreement.  These  amounts  would  cor-
respond to premiums on the current equity prices of XM and Sirius 
of  approximately  66  percent  and  60  percent  respectively,  at  Mon-
day’s closing prices, and this is probably the major focus of the cap-
ital  markets.  The  combined  company  will  almost  certainly  have 
greater  resources  to  invest  in  technological  innovation,  leading  to 
a  more  rapid  development  of  improved  products  than  either  com-
pany would on a stand-alone basis. 

As for implementation, that will be up to the management of the 
combined companies. We believe that the satellite industry is a via-
ble  one  with  or  without  this  merger.  However,  we  would  note  that 
as  competition  is  increasing  for  the  mobile  entertainment  con-
sumer,  as  illustrated  by  the  evolution  of  the  iPod  to  the  iPhone, 
broadcast  audio  and  video  over  cell  phones,  MP3  integration  into 
the  automobile,  broader  adoption  of  over-the-air  HD  radio,  we  be-
lieve the industry will be in a much healthier and stronger position 
should  the  merger  occur.  In  conclusion,  I  would  like  to  note  that 
RBC  Capital  Markets  has  at  no  time  served  as  a  financial  adviser 
to either XM or Sirius. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Bank follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID BANK, MANAGING DIRECTOR, MEDIA AND 

BROADCASTING EQUITY RESEARCH ANALYST, RBC CAPITAL MARKETS 

Good morning Members of the Committee and guests. 
My  name  is  David  Bank.  I  am  the  media  and  broadcasting  equity  research  ana-
lyst for RBC Capital Markets responsible for coverage of both the satellite and tra-
ditional radio broadcasting Industries. 

XM  Satellite  Radio  and  Sirius  Satellite  currently  have  a  combined  enterprise 
value  including  both  debt  and  equity  securities  of  approximately  $11  billion  and  I 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

39 

hope  to  put  the  proposed  XM  and  Sirius  Merger  into  context  with  respect  to  issues 
that the capital markets are focused on. 

Of  these  issues,  the  first  and  foremost  of  them  would  be  the  potential  synergies 
and  subsequent  savings  that  we  believe  are  possible  in  an  XM  and  Sirius  Merger. 
We  estimate  the  value  of  these  synergies  to  be  somewhere  between  $5  billion  and 
$6 billion dollars. 

While it is unclear to us how, if at all, the combined entity might pass on savings 
and  value  creation  to  consumers,  there  are  three  primary  constituencies  that  stand 
to  benefit  from  the  $5–$6  billion  of  savings  financially:  (1)  the  employees  of  each 
of  the  companies  as  the  viability  of  the  combined  entity  becomes  stronger,  (2)  the 
customers  which  could  potentially  benefit  from  greater  innovation,  more  flexibility 
in pricing and a more diverse selection of content and (3) shareholders, who will see 
value creation from increased long-term earnings potential. 

Synergies  would  likely  arise  in  two  fashions.  The  first  is  rather  straightforward 
and  will  stem  from  simply  eliminating  redundant  network  components,  marketing 
costs and operating support functions. 

The second is ultimately more difficult to quantify, but a clear driver, nonetheless. 
It  stems  from  a  potential  reduction  in  leverage  that  content  providers  (i.e.,  sports, 
entertainment  and  news  service)  as  well  as  automotive  manufacturers  previously 
exercised when XM and Sirius were bidding separately for content and distribution 
contracts. These costs, extracted from XM and Sirius in the form of fixed payments, 
variable revenue share payments and subsidies, have been significant. 

At  the  time  most  of  the  original  agreements  were  signed,  satellite  radio  tech-
nology was still in its infancy relative to consumer acceptance. Sirius and XM were 
very  aggressively  bidding  against  each  other  for  content  and  distribution  deals  that 
were thought to be key to long-term survival against a broader competitive backdrop 
that  included  standard  and  HD  terrestrial  radio,  iPods,  entertainment  over  cell 
phones and Internet radio. In essence the industry was competing against itself, as 
well as alternative distribution platforms. In addition, the demand for satellite radio 
subscriptions,  particularly  on  the  retail  side,  was  expected  to  be  more  robust  than 
it ultimately turned out to be. 

As an illustration of the change in the demand picture against a backdrop of high-
er  fixed-costs,  while  our  current  expectation  for  year  end  2010  subscribers  for  the 
combined  industry  is  approximately  26  million,  our  expectation  for  that  figure  in 
late 2004 and early 2005 when we first published estimates for year end 2010 sub-
scribers was closer to 33 million, a discount of approximately 20 percent. 

Synergies  will  not  occur  overnight,  but  rather  over  a  period  of  years—with  more 
expected  to  be  realized  in  the  later  half  of  the  initial  5  year  period  after  a  merger 
because  most  agreements  that  the  auto  manufacturers  and  content  providers  have 
entered into are relatively long-term—most will not expire till at least 2011. In addi-
tion,  in  our  view  the  proposed  combined  company  will  likely  need  to  maintain  two 
separate network operating architectures for several years as it continues to service 
existing  customers.  The  itemized  details  and  timing  of  these  synergies  by  line  item 
can  be  seen  our  report  dated  January  12,  2007,  entitled—XMSR  and  SIRI  Should 
Act On The Urge To Merge . . . Now. 

The bottom line is that, according to our estimates, these synergies could amount 
to  value  creation  for  XM  and  Sirius  stockholders  of  approximately  $8.00  and  $1.73 
per  share,  respectively,  at  the  exchange  ratio  set  forth  in  XM  and  Sirius  merger 
agreement.  For  further  details  on  this  analysis,  please  see  our  report  of 
February 20, 2007 entitled, Wedding Bells Are Ringing For XMSR and SIRI. 

These amounts would correspond to premiums on the current equity prices of XM 
and  Sirius  of  approximately  66  percent  and  60  percent  respectively  at  Monday’s 
closing price—and this probably is the major focus of the capital markets. 

We  believe  that  the  combined  company  will  almost  certainly  have  greater  re-
sources  to  invest  in  further  technological  innovation  leading  to  a  more  rapid  devel-
opment of improved products than either company would on a standalone basis. As 
for implementation, that will be up to management. 

We believe that the satellite Industry is a viable one with or without this merger. 
However,  we  would  note  that  as  competition  is  increasing  for  the  mobile  entertain-
ment consumer, (as illustrated by the evolution of the iPod to the iPhone, broadcast 
audio  and  video  over  cell  phones  and  MP3  integration  into  the  automobile,  broader 
adoption of over-the-air HD radio), we believe that the industry would be in a much 
healthier and stronger position should the proposed merger occur. 

In  conclusion,  I  would  like  to  note  that  RBC  Capital  Markets  has  at  no  time 

served as a financial advisor to either XM or Sirius. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

40 

man Stevens. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Bank,  Vice  Chair-

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Mr.  Karmazin, 

what happens if this is not approved? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  If  for  any  reason  this  merger  is  not  approved,  I 
believe  that  both  companies  continue  to  operate,  that  we  have  not 
made a failing argument case because we believe that both compa-
nies are viable. I think that competition would lessen, and I believe 
that  satellite  radio  would  be  weaker  than  it  should  be.  And  part 
of  the  reason  that  the  NAB  is  here  to  testify  is  obviously  because 
they  would  like  to  see  what  you  just  said  happen,  because  obvi-
ously  the  existing  broadcasters  that  have  HD  radio  and  terrestrial 
radio  do  not  want  to  see  the  merger  happen  because  they  don’t 
want  to  see  satellite  radio  be  a  better  choice  for  consumers.  Be-
cause if satellite radio is better for the consumers because we have 
lower  prices  and  because  we  give  the  consumer  more  choices,  that 
will impact terrestrial radio, so we will become a less good compet-
itor and the NAB would have gotten their way if in fact the merger 
doesn’t happen. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  may  be  misinformed  but  I’m  informed  that 
people  who  have  satellite  radio,  one  or  the  other,  also  have  over- 
the-air, and they are more high income people; is that right? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. I think that in the case of terrestrial radio, every-
body  has  an  AM/FM  radio  in  their  car.  So  if  you  think  of  where 
radio is listened to, if you listen to your radio in your car, you have 
an  AM/FM  radio  there.  As  far  as  the  satellite  radio  customer,  it 
cuts across all ethnic and all economic groups so that we have sub-
scribers who are not, you know, at the very extreme ends of either 
of those spectrums, or are at both ends of the spectrum. 

Senator STEVENS. But if an automobile has one satellite receiver 

it doesn’t receive the other provider, right? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  That’s  correct.  And  that’s  why  it’s  such  a  dis-
advantage  to  the  consumer.  Because  right  now  if  you  like  Major 
League Baseball, let’s use that as an example, and you buy a Ford 
vehicle, you have an exclusive service right now with Sirius so that 
you are unable to get that content that you would also like to have. 
So it’s obviously part of the argument that we make as to why it’s 
such  an  advantage  to  the  consumer  is  that  it’s  not  just  the  lower 
price  but  the  greater  choice,  so  when  you  buy  a  Ford  vehicle  you 
might  have  the  opportunity  of  having  the  NFL  and  having  Major 
League Baseball. 

Senator STEVENS. As satellite radio was developed, was it impos-

sible to make just one set that received both? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  One  of  the  things  that  both  companies  had 
worked on, because as part of our commitment to the FCC that we 
would  develop  what  they  are  calling  an  interoperable  radio,  would 
be a receiver that could have both services. And we have developed 
such  a  receiver  and  have  made  our  proprietary  intellectual  prop-
erty  available  to  any  manufacturer  who  would  like  to  make  it. 
There is no subsidy that is being given by XM or Sirius to subsidize 
that  interoperable  radio.  That  radio  would  cost  a  higher  price  in 
the market today than the consumer would be willing to pay. 

And the reason, Senator, that the companies are not subsidizing 
the  radio,  whereas  we  do  subsidize  our  other  radios,  is  that  when 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

41 

you  buy  just  a  Sirius  radio  we  would  subsidize  it  because  we  get 
a subscription. It doesn’t make very much sense for us to subsidize 
a radio that doesn’t result in a subscription for us because if a con-
sumer  bought  that  interoperable  radio  and  they  chose  to  subscribe 
to  our  competitors  or  one  or  the  other  services,  then  we  would  not 
be  getting  a  subscriber.  What  we  have  said  is  that  as  a  result  of 
this  merger,  that  we  would  make  those  interoperable  radios,  or 
make that interoperable radio commercially available to consumers 
as  a  benefit  to  consumers  as  a  result  of  this  merger,  so  they  could 
get the full content of both services. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Withers,  how  much  competition  does  the 

over-the-air broadcaster get from satellite radio now? 

Mr.  WITHERS.  Well,  the  competition  now,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  is 
the fact that they compete in all of our markets all the time. If we 
have  a  market  with  six  radio  stations  in  it,  XM  and  Sirius  have 
a total of approximately 303 channels, and yet the market that has 
six stations, that’s all they have. If those stations, and let’s say four 
of them are FM stations and four of them had full HD complement 
and  they  had  three  additional  channels,  that  would  be  12  more, 
and  that  certainly  doesn’t  compete.  That’s  a  disingenuous  argu-
ment that we would have competition face-to-face with 303 versus, 
you’re talking about 18 or so. 

They compete with us. We don’t compete with them on a national 
basis.  They  were  authorized  as  a  national  radio  service  and  they 
are.  I  also  can  point  out  that  the  1997  authorization  for  both  sat-
ellite services required them to have an interoperable receiver and 
they should have had one on the market in my opinion a long time 
ago.  Because  if  it  served  both,  it  was  subsidized  by  the  subscriber 
to Sirius, then Sirius would get that subscription rate, and if it was 
XM  they  would  get  it.  But  it  would  be  a  receiver  that  would  pick 
up both and it would have certainly eliminated the Beta-VHS situ-
ation now where they are not compatible with each other. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Kimmelman,  do  you  see  any  consumer 

benefit from this merger? 

Mr.  KIMMELMAN.  It’s  really  hard  to  see,  Senator  Stevens.  Even 
as  they  claim  their  major  competitor  is  broadcast,  local  broadcast 
radio, think about whether the consumer would benefit from of get-
ting a monopoly in satellite radio. Consumers pay nothing for local 
broadcast  radio.  It’s  free.  It’s  advertiser  supported.  Satellite  is  not 
a  competitor  that  is  going  to  drive  down  the  price  of  local  broad-
caster radio. It’s already free. So it’s really hard to see meaningful 
benefits  there.  And  for  the  14  million  who  already  have  satellite 
radio,  or  20  million  who  will  have  it,  to  have  one  choice  instead  of 
two is an enormous harm. I hear a lot of promises and maybe you’d 
want  to  create  a  regulatory  screen  around  those  promises  if  you 
really  wanted  to  move  to  monopoly,  but  if  you’re  going  to  go  that 
route  why  don’t  we  take  back  half  the  spectrum.  They  don’t  need 
double  the  spectrum  to  offer  a  monopoly  service.  They  were  li-
censed to compete against each other. So if you want to change the 
model, you could go that way, but straight out whether this merger 
benefits consumers, it’s very very hard to see any benefit. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

42 

Senator LAUTENBERG. This references the theory that they would 
like to have me here and I would have to pay for this. Oh my gosh. 
Well I used my good remarks already. 

Mr. Karmazin, talking about the lower cost receiver, because it’s 
said there is a breadth of these lower cost and higher cost receivers 
that presently could accept the two channels, and then if the merg-
er  went  through,  obviously  the  one.  What  about  the  quality  of  the 
reception on these? Are they—am I making myself clear here? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  I’m  not  sure.  Our  service  that  we  offer  is  a  serv-
ice  that  provides  for  excellent,  almost  CD  quality  kind  of  service. 
If  you  mean  the  sound  quality  from  a  point  of  view  of  the  content 
quality that’s available, you know, we have a full spectrum of con-
tent on both services, you know, ranging from NPR to Radio Disney 
to sports to entertainment kinds of programming. On our receivers, 
there are receivers that, you know what we have said, is for every 
single  receiver  that’s  out  there  today.  So  assume  you  went  into 
Best  Buy  and  you  bought  a  Sirius  or  an  XM  radio  a  year  ago  and 
this  merger  happens,  those  receivers  are  not  going  to  be  obsolete. 
So every one of those receivers will still be able to work in the new 
service and what we will do, and what we have committed to doing 
is that if you bought an XM receiver, then we are going to be able 
to  take  some  of  the  content  from  Sirius  that  you  can’t  get  today 
and make it available to you on that other receiver. 

I  know  that  this  Committee,  I  think,  had  a  hearing  a  couple 
weeks  ago  on  Major  League  Baseball  because  baseball  was  not 
available  on  one  platform.  And  what  we  are  saying  is  that  this 
merger is going to make more consumers have access to more con-
tent and get it at a lower price than they could without the merger. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  The  thing  that  I  see  that  Mr.  Withers,  I 
think  amplified,  is  whether  or  not  the  local  interests  are  served. 
We  in  New  Jersey  have  a  particular  situation  with  a  channel 
whose  license  includes  very  specific  obligations  to  provide  local 
news service. 

We have been attentive to that obligation and when the company 
announced  that  they  were  going  to  move  their  news  operation  to 
New York City, we said just remember, you have a license renewal 
coming  up  and  we  are  going  to  have  something  to  say  about  it. 
Well,  they  canceled  that  program.  And  the  question  is  why,  why 
couldn’t  these  things,  Mr.  Withers,  operate  successfully  together 
and just like any other selection you make about program content, 
and without impairing the local opportunity, the local broadcaster’s 
opportunity  group  that  you  represent  here,  why  wouldn’t  that  per-
mit you to operate side by side with this merged company and still 
protect your share of the marketplace? 

Mr. WITHERS. As I understand the question, and I thank you for 
it,  they  are  operating  side  by  side  as  they  are  today,  but  they  are 
not  doing  local  programming,  they  are  not  doing  local  sales.  And 
I  know  that  Mr.  Karmazin  has  indicated  that  he  would  be  willing 
not to do either, but we are the ones that if there is a missing child 
and we have to put the alert out, the AMBER alerts, we do it. We 
are  the  ones  that  do  the  weather  forecasts.  We  are  the  ones  that 
do  the  school  closings  if  the  buses  break  down.  And  in  some  mar-
kets if there is a lost dog, a Dog Gone report, they have no interest 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

43 

in doing that. But we compete against them every day for program-
ming. 

And  they  spend  a  lot  of  money  on  their  programming  and  do  a 
very  good  job,  the  way  that  they  do  it  as  a  national  programming 
service.  And  if  we  are  going  to  exist  as  a  local  service  and  local 
broadcast  service,  which  we  are  today  and  proud  to  be,  then  we 
have  to  have  the  economic  base  to  do  that.  And  if  that’s  undercut, 
then  you’re  left  with  a  national  service  that  really  doesn’t  care 
about  the  local  situations.  They  can’t  handle  a  tornado  alert  in 
southeast Missouri or in southern Illinois, western Kentucky, wher-
ever, in Anchorage, if Anchorage were to get a tornado. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Does  that  compare  to  network  services 
who  also  own  local,  or  franchise  local  broadcasters,  NBC,  ABC, 
what have you? 

Mr.  WITHERS.  Well,  that’s  a  good  analogy,  sir.  The  national  net-
work, their local affiliate then has the obligation to do that. But we 
are  not  local  affiliates  of  XM  or  Sirius.  We  are  totally,  you  know, 
it’s a totally different ball game. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Right. But if there was a side, if there was 
side by side opportunity then that would not, kind of, resemble the 
situation—— 

Mr.  WITHERS.  Well,  I  don’t  think,  and  I’m  not  authorized  to 
speak  on  this  matter  for  the  National  Association  of  Broadcasters, 
but I was at a hearing the other day when Mr. Karmazin testified 
that they had lost $6 billion with their business plan. I don’t think 
we have any intentions of making an offer for XM or Sirius. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  I  guess  there  are  people  who  think 

that some of the content is worth an awful lot of money. 

Mr.  WITHERS.  It—I  think  that—I’m  trying  to—I  see  where  your 

thought process is on that. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I’m trying to be fair here on both sides. 
Mr. WITHERS. Oh, I know you are. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I’m  very  interested  in  your  views,  and  I 
would just move to Ms. Sohn for a minute. Should the FCC require 
that  XM  and  Sirius  return  some  part  of  the  spectrum  if  they 
merge? 

Ms. SOHN. We have said that they should definitely look at that. 
You know, it’s possible that XM and Sirius might have an idea for 
that  extra  capacity  that  would  serve  the  public  interest,  particu-
larly  local  broadcasting.  I  mean,  I  guess  I  don’t  understand  why  it 
wouldn’t  be  better  for  New  Jersey  to  have  the  combined  entity  do 
local programming and broadcasters do local programming. I know 
you  have  that  problem  with  WOR  and  New  Jersey  is  often  under-
served.  So,  why  not  allow  more  local  broadcasting.  So  it  really 
would  depend  on  the  plans  that  XM  and  Sirius  have  for  the  extra 
capacity;  however,  I  do  think  it’s  something  the  FCC  should  look 
at, whether they really need to have all 12 megahertz of spectrum. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. That would certainly, I think, provide 
an outlet for competitive operation. And I think it’s fair to say, Mr. 
Karmazin, that the most obvious conclusion that one draws is that 
it would be awful good for the companies, for the two organizations. 
The question is, is it as good for the consumer as it is for the com-
panies.  We’ll  be  looking  at  that,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  ask  for  a  period 
of  time  to  try  to  make  some  decisions  on  our  side  as  well  as—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

44 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Did  you  want  me  to  answer  that  question?  I’m  a 

resident of New Jersey. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I just changed my mind, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  KARMAZIN.  And  I  know  exactly  what  you’re  talking  about, 
but  let’s  just  get  real  about  this.  So  you  get  into  your  car  in  New 
Jersey  and  you  have  an  AM/FM  radio.  And  if  in  fact  you  chose  to 
and you decided that you wanted to pay for radio in addition, that 
we  have  convinced  you  that  the  content  we  offer  is  worth  paying 
more  for  than  for  something  you  get  for  free,  then  you’ll  have  the 
satellite radio. And the merger makes it beneficial to the consumer. 
I’m not talking about the benefit, you know, for anybody but the 
consumer in what my comments are because I believe lower prices 
and  more  choice  for  the  consumer  is  a  good  thing.  And  we  are  not 
looking to replace local radio. Local radio is going to exist and local 
radio,  by  the  way,  is  financially  amazingly  healthy,  you  know.  I’ve 
been  in  it  for  a  long  time  and  made  an  awful  lot  of  money  in  it. 
And  if  you  question  it,  just  take  a  look  in  the  papers  and  see  how 
much money Clear Channel is selling itself for. So there is no ques-
tion that there is a very, very healthy terrestrial radio who, by the 
way, got HD radio for nothing. So the same people that control the 
AM/FM radio stations today are also being given free HD radio. So 
this  is  not  a  troubled  industry,  and  we  are  not  saying  that  Sirius 
is troubled, but we do believe that if you believe that choice for the 
consumer is a good thing, then this merger is a good thing. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. If I may, Mr. Chairman for a second here, 
maybe  a  couple  of  seconds.  I  had  in  the  car  I  own,  a  General  Mo-
tors car, XM radio. Now along the way—and I pay for it—along the 
way  suddenly  a  choice  part  of  that  was  taken  away.  So  effectively 
if I want to have the same kind of programming, my price has just 
gone  up  substantially.  And  I’m  talking  about  MSNBC,  that  was 
shifted away from XM radio. 

And so now I have to pay separately for what I used to pay only 

one time for. 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Not  exactly  accurate,  sir.  MSNBC  was  taken  off 
by  a  lack  of  popularity.  You  can’t  buy  it.  It  doesn’t  cost  you  more, 
it just was replaced at a higher channel. It’s not like they are sell-
ing  it  at  a  higher  price;  they  just  said  we  are  constrained  with  a 
certain amount of bandwidth and we are going to put channels to-
gether that are going to be covering a broad spectrum, so they have 
Fox News, they have CNN News, they have public broadcasting. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. What does Sirius have? 
Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Sirius  has  Fox  News,  CNN  News,  NPR  News, 

BBC News, we have ABC News, so we have an—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. So MSNBC is no longer—— 
Mr. KARMAZIN. Correct. We do not choose to have MSNBC as one 

of the channels we offer. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. We have to expand the spectrum. 
Mr. KARMAZIN. I welcome that. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Dorgan. 
Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, I have to leave. I’d be happy to 

defer to the gentlewoman from Minnesota if she wishes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

45 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  look  at  this 
deal as a consumer. Is it true that some of the customers will have 
to upgrade their equipment if these companies merge? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. No. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Is there any kind of a change to the equip-

ment or anything that they have to buy? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  No.  Senator,  if  you  subscribe  to  one  or  the  other 
services today, that radio will not be obsolete. You will still be able 
to  get  everything  that  you’re  currently  getting  from  that  service 
today.  And  additionally,  we  are  willing  to  add  to  that  with  the  ex-
isting  radio  the  ability  to  get  some  content  from  the  other  partner 
as  well,  but  the  receivers  will  not  be  made  obsolete.  As  a  matter 
of  fact,  if  you  went  into  a  retailer  today  you  will  see  both  compa-
nies  having  a  guarantee  that  we  are  offering  the  consumers  that 
says that it’s a guarantee that these radios will not be obsolete. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  To  follow  up  on  some  of  the  questions  that 
Senator  Lautenberg  was  asking  about  the  spectrum,  and  the 
amount of spectrum was given out with this idea that there would 
be competition. I just wonder, I know that Ms. Sohn answered the 
questions,  but  I  wonder  if  others  could  answer  that.  He  was  going 
into  the  area  of  whether  some  of  the  spectrum  should  be  returned 
when  we  don’t  have  two  companies  competing.  You  want  to  start, 
Mr. Kimmelman? 

Mr.  KIMMELMAN.  Yes,  I’d  love  it.  Retaining  twice  the  spectrum 
initially  allocated  violates  the  FCC’s  own  guidelines  for  how  this 
spectrum  was  auctioned  so  it’s  in  direct  violation  of  the  rules.  I 
would hope you would be promoting competition as opposed to mo-
nopoly,  but  if  you  went  down  the  path  that  there  should  only  be 
one satellite radio provider for whatever reason, our financial ana-
lysts  tell  us  they  are  going  to  consolidate  content  onto  fewer  chan-
nels.  And  we  have  already  heard  from  Mr.  Karmazin  in  previous 
hearings so they have got excess capacity. 

The  problem  here  is  that  you’ve  got  this  interoperable  equip-
ment—the  consumer  has  been  held  hostage  here,  Senator.  We  had 
a  promise  of  interoperable  equipment  that  wasn’t  fulfilled.  Mr. 
Karmazin says they couldn’t do it because, because they would lose 
customers. Well, if they worked together, or even if they had come 
to  the  Congress  if  they  really  felt  they  needed  an  antitrust  excep-
tion  to  be  able  to  come  up  with  one  standard  for  equipment  and 
then competed on that, we wouldn’t be in this situation. 

But  now  we  have  two  different  pieces  of  equipment,  which  they 
say  they  will  keep  functioning,  and  they  are  going  to  hold  us  hos-
tage for all the spectrum. So if you decide to go with the monopoly 
consider  what  Senator  Stevens  proposed  with  the  DTV  transition, 
which  is  make  the  first  dollars  from  an  auction  of  the  reclaimed 
spectrum  available  to  you  to  hold  consumers  harmless,  and  you 
probably  would  have  money  left  over  for  the  Treasury  for  other 
purposes.  So  if  we  went  down  that  path,  there  is  another  model 
here that gets them the consolidation they want, and the synergies 
which  will  let  them  squeeze  programmers,  squeeze  auto  manufac-
turers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

46 

trum? 

I  still  don’t  clearly  see  any  benefit  to  consumers,  so  you  would 
need some sort of regulated price, but by requiring that some spec-
trum be returned you would be able to have spectrum available for 
other purposes. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Others want to answer this about the spec-

Mr. BANK. Well, I think from a practical purpose what we would 
say  as  financial  analysts  is  a  stronger  company  would  probably 
lead  to  greater  technological  innovation.  And  you  know,  ultimately 
I  think  while  it’s  going  to  be  up  to  the  management  of  what  they 
do  with  the  spectrum  there  is  very  good  likelihood  that  you’ll  see 
improved  innovation  and  additional  products  that  will  program 
that  spectrum.  So  you  know,  from  a  practical  perspective  if  you 
took  away  some  of  the  unused  spectrum,  I  think  the  key  driver  in 
this  industry  is  its  entrenchment  in  the  automotive  industry  and 
the  original  equipment  manufacturers.  It  would  be  relatively  dif-
ficult  from  a  standing  start  for  a  new  competitor  in  satellite  radio 
to  probably  penetrate  that  entrenched  competitive  landscape  right 
now. But the reality is you may be trading off technological innova-
tion  that  could  bring  a  lot  of  really  interesting  and  important  new 
products. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Karmazin? 
Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Let  me  give  you  the  spectrum  answer.  Senator 
Lautenberg mentioned that he has a car that has an XM radio and 
if  in  fact  we  were  to  do  anything  with  this  spectrum,  what  we  are 
now telling Senator Lautenberg is that he needs to buy a new radio 
because his receiver is only able to receive the XM satellite and the 
terrestrial  repeater  networks.  So  the  idea  of  us  not  having  the 
spectrum  that  we  currently  have  would  be  a  disservice  to  the  con-
sumers,  because  they  would  be  the  ones  that  would  be  disrupted 
because  their  existing  receivers  are  only  tied  to  be  able  to  receive 
the existing system. 

I  think  the  whole  question,  Senator,  about  satellite  radio  right 
now, and we got our first subscriber in 2002 and we had 6 million 
subscribers  at  year  end  last  year,  and  XM  had  a  little  over  7  mil-
lion subscribers, that the idea of these words that Consumer Union 
is using, and especially the comments that the NAB is using about 
satellite  radio  being  a  monopoly  and  that,  you  know,  somebody 
must  have  their  satellite  radio  when  there  are  terrestrial  radio 
with local radio, with the stations able to put whatever content on 
it—and I’m sorry, but we compete with all of this radio. 

There is HD radio. If you take your cell phone and you put your 
cell  phone  in  a  Bluetooth  device  in  your  car,  you’re  able  to  get  all 
kinds  of  content,  sporting  events,  all  kinds  of  news,  all  kinds  of 
music  coming  through  your  radio  speakers  in  your  car.  So  the  fact 
that  10  years  ago,  you  know,  when  the  FCC  gave  us  our  license, 
there  was  a  policy  statement.  I  don’t  think  you  want  to  use  policy 
statements  that  were  made  10  years  ago  insofar  as  dealing  with 
the  reality  in  the  marketplace  10  years  later,  particularly  since 
that marketplace is so robust. So there is plenty of audio entertain-
ment content available to the consumers and I think the American 
consumer  would  be  better  off  if  they  had  a  stronger  competitor  to 
terrestrial radio and satellite radio being combined. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Withers? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

47 

Mr. WITHERS. My response to that is, it’s an interesting observa-
tion  that  we  have  to  make.  If  we  are  going  to  merge,  we  have  to 
maintain  both  systems;  otherwise,  we  have  short  sheeted  the  one 
that  doesn’t  have  it.  But  then  also  by  the  merged  monopoly  con-
tinuing  to  have  the  entire  25  megahertz,  there  will  be  no  way  and 
no  time  where  another  competitor  could  enter,  enter  the  satellite 
race. 

I did want to address the fact that we had a dangling gift a mo-
ment  ago  where  we  were  given  the  free  HD,  when  all  we’ve  done 
is,  as  they  multiplexed  their  signals  and  satellite,  the  Commission 
originally  thought  each  carrier  would  have  about  50  channels,  and 
the  technological  advances  of  multiplexing  has  allowed  133  in  one 
case  and  170  in  another,  and  that’s  fine.  But  HD  is  done  with  our 
existing  frequency,  so  we  weren’t  given  anything.  We  have  had  to 
spend  money  to  provide  another  service  for  free  to  the  American 
public and that’s where that came about. 

But  I  think  if  you’re  going  to  have,  as  Mr.  Kimmelman  said,  if 
they go down the road that way, it doesn’t make any sense to leave 
all the spectrum there with the merged monopoly. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Senator Dorgan. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much.  Mr. 
Karmazin, first of all, thanks for visiting yesterday. You are a very 
accomplished  chief  executive  officer  and  as  I  said,  I’m  a  customer. 
I  like  satellite  radio.  But  as  I  understand  your  message,  what  you 
are saying is both companies are in pretty good shape. You believe 
both  companies  are  in  a  position  to  reach  profitability  and  that  is 
not  what  provokes  a  merger.  You  talk  about  merging  for  purposes 
of  efficiency,  and  the  efficiency  therefore  would  result  in  savings 
which then would be good for the consumer. 

I’m  trying  to  understand  that.  I’ll  give  you  a  chance  to  comment 
on it, if I can ask a couple of questions in the middle of all of that. 
One, what kind of equity position does Clear Channel have in ei-

ther of the satellite radio companies? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Clear  Channel  has  no  position  in  Sirius  and  you 
know,  I  don’t  know  for  sure,  but  let  me  tell  you  what  I  believe,  is 
that  when  XM  first  started,  Clear  Channel  was  an  early  investor 
and  they  owned  a  certain  percentage,  I  want  to  say  about  10  per-
cent  of  the  company.  They  have  subsequently  monetized  that  in-
vestment  and  are  no  longer—they  were  a  board  member  at  some 
point. They are no longer a board member of XM nor do they have 
a financial interest in the company as a result of that monetization. 
Senator  DORGAN.  That’s  fine.  Mr.  Karmazin,  I  called  XM  some 
while  ago  about  a  programming  change  because  when  I  was  out 
running I would listen to XM, and they changed programming. And 
I  called  them  and  asked  them  why  they  changed  that  particular 
kind  of  programming  on  those  channels.  They  said  it  was  because 
of  Clear  Channel  and  Clear  Channel  had  a  certain  percentage 
stake  in  the  company,  had  certain  proprietary  capabilities  in  var-
ious  channels.  I’m  trying  to  understand  that  because  that’s  also  a 
part of this. 

Mr. KARMAZIN. Senator, I think the answer to that question, be-
cause  that  wasn’t  financial  investment,  but  Clear  Channel  has  a 
certain number of channels remaining on XM service so that today 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

48 

XM  has  some  Clear  Channel  program  stations.  So  therefore,  a 
change that was made on a channel was the result of Clear Chan-
nel making a decision on one of their channels. 

Senator  DORGAN.  It’s  interesting,  though,  that  this  discussion 
about what is the new competition, if one were to describe the new 
competition the way you described it, iPods and cell phones and the 
broadcasters,  that  the  broadcasters  are  actually  a  part  of  XM,  in 
this case one of the largest radio broadcasters is actually a part of 
XM.  And  second,  if  satellite  radio  and  broadcast  in  general  com-
petes  with  iPod  and  cell  phones,  I  suppose  the  logical  extension  of 
that  is  there  needs  to  be  no  ownership  limitations  anywhere  be-
cause everybody competes with everybody. 

Let  me  ask  about  pricing,  if  I  can  put  up  this  chart.  Some  have 
been  very  critical  that  there  has  been  a  substantial  amount  of 
money  spent  in  the  early  days.  I  read  that  in  the  papers.  I  don’t 
have the foggiest idea what you’re paying anybody else. If we were 
to  ask  both  XM  and  Sirius  what  you  are  paying  for  this  program-
ming, would we get answers to all of it? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  I  don’t  know  whether  or  not  we  can  answer  all 
of  it,  whether  we  would  give  you  everything  that  we  have  a  right 
to  talk  about.  So  on  anything  we  are  not  precluded  by  a  contract, 
there  is  nothing  that  we  would  hide.  In  other  words,  I  would  be 
happy  to  tell  you  what  we  pay  for  Nascar  because  we  announced 
it,  so  we  announced  that  we  pay  $20  million  a  year  for  the  rights 
to  have  all  of  the  Nascar  races.  That  was  public.  The  Oprah  an-
nouncement  was  public.  The  Howard  Stern  announcement  was 
public. I don’t know whether or not Senator Bill Bradley, who gets 
a  very  small  amount  of  money,  would  want  us  to  be  talking  about 
how  much  money  he  is  making.  I’d  have  to  leave  that  to  whether 
he would want us to do that. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well  let  me  send  you  a  letter  and  you  tell  me 
what  you  can  and  what  you  can’t  answer.  My  understanding  is 
most of it, you are not able to answer because of what you call con-
fidentiality agreements. 

Why did Sirius drop C–SPAN? 
Mr.  KARMAZIN.  We  like  C–SPAN,  we  wanted  to  keep  it.  One  of 
the  things  we  have  is  some  constraints  on  our  content,  so  we  are 
often  rotating  channels  and  making  changes.  C–SPAN  was  a  very, 
very  low  utilized  radio  channel  on  our  service  and  we  felt  that  we 
would  be  able  to  serve  our  customers  better  by  providing  another 
service to C–SPAN. C–SPAN is available on XM. It’s just not avail-
able on Sirius. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  say,  Mr.  Withers,  while  I  believe  that 
this  merger  is  not  a  good  thing  for  the  consumers,  you’re  not  ex-
actly a perfect messenger here. As you know, you come to this table 
in  most  cases  supporting  substantial  increased  concentration,  and 
my concern about the merger is the concentration in this case from 
two to one. But when I look at radio broadcasting and particularly 
radios,  there  has  been  a  very  substantial  concentration  there  and 
I  worry  very  much  that  the  very  argument  that  Mr.  Karmazin 
makes  here  is  an  argument  that  will  be  made  by  you  at  the  next 
hearing  when  you  come  to  the  table  to  say,  you  know,  when  you 
define this market and you talk, Senator Dorgan, about concentra-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

49 

tion, understand that Clear Channel and all these companies, they 
are competing with cell phones and iPods. 

When I say you’re not a perfect messenger, in North Dakota, you 
all know the story, but all six stations in Minot, North Dakota were 
purchased  by  Clear  Channel,  every  station  in  the  town  of  50,000, 
40,000 was purchased by Clear Channel. And at 2:30 in the morn-
ing  they  called  the  radio  station,  nobody  answers  the  phone,  you 
know, why would that be. And so I would just observe while we are 
on the same side on this issue, I don’t view the broadcasters as per-
fect messengers to this subject. 

And let me just ask Mr. Bank, and I’ll be glad to have Mr. With-

ers comment in a moment. 

Mr. WITHERS. I was going to make, if I might—— 
Senator DORGAN. Yes. Go ahead. 
Mr.  WITHERS.  One  that  we  are  talking  about  radio  companies, 
and  when  we  have,  XM  and  Sirius  are  national  radio  companies 
basically. But as far as us at the broadcasting industry and the Na-
tional Association of Broadcasting asking for more concentration of 
control, if there has been proposals they have been de minimis. It’s 
like we are limited, I understand they are limited to—I’m sure I’ve 
heard, so have you, that we want all ownership limits removed. I’m 
not  a  party  to  that  but  if  you  have,  if  you’re  allowed  to  own  eight 
stations  out  of  New  York  for  example,  the  proposals  I  have  heard 
kicked around, it might go to, 10 or 12 would be the proposals. But 
still, that’s a long way from the 330 some odd. 

And  Clear  Channel  must  have  heard  your  message  that  you  re-
peated because they have sold those stations; they are on the block 
and will be sold. 

Senator DORGAN. On the block. That’s more correct. 
Mr.  WITHERS.  They  are  disassembling  a  lot.  They  have  440  sta-

tions up for sale right now. 

Senator DORGAN. Well, we’ll see. I hope we can have some hear-
ings  on  the  issue  of  localism  one  of  these  days  as  well,  because 
that’s  another  part  of  what  broadcasting  used  to  be  and  too  often 
is not any longer. 

Mr. WITHERS. We may welcome those. Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Mr. Bank, you indicate, you talked about these 
synergies in support of, and I understand you come from New York 
and  you’re  looking  at  the  market  side  of  this.  Synergies,  first,  are 
straightforward  simply  eliminating  redundant  effort  components. 
We  had  a  hearing  in  this  room  not  very  long  ago  with  a  couple  of 
airlines  that  wanted  to  merge,  and  they  made  exactly  the  same 
case. My guess is any two companies that would come to the table, 
or  any  company  that  comes  to  the  table  saying  I’d  like  to  merge 
with  another  company  in  their  industry  with  any  circumstance 
where  there  is  some  dominating  position,  I  think  they  would  be 
able  to  make  the  case  that  there  are  synergies  and  efficiencies. 
Would  you  agree  that  there  is  no  unique  case  to  be  made  here  at 
all  with  respect  to  synergies  or  efficiencies,  just  as  there  are  not 
with two airlines that want to merge and become one because they 
combine  their  reservation  systems  and  so  on,  or  is  there  some 
unique thing that I’m not aware of here? 

Mr. BANK. Well, I think the unique issue is more on the content 
side  where  you,  the  second  example  of  where  the  synergies  can 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

50 

come  from.  But  the  reality  is  yes,  you  know,  network  architecture 
and back office savings are probably relatively common to any two 
companies in the same industry where you can derive savings. 

Senator DORGAN. And Mr. Kimmelman, finally, I suppose people 
perhaps say this of me but I probably should say it of you. We can 
probably guess your testimony before the hearing started. You gen-
erally  are  opposed  to  mergers  and  these  sort  of  things.  Tell  me 
what’s  unique  about  your  opposition  to  this,  if  there  is  anything 
that’s unique. 

Mr. KIMMELMAN. Senator Dorgan—— 
Senator DORGAN. I admire that position, I don’t say that to deni-
grate  it,  but  tell  me  what  is  unique  about  your  opposition  to  this. 
Then I’ll ask Mr. Karmazin to respond. 

Mr. KIMMELMAN. It’s when it gets to a point of concentration and 
reduced  consumer  choice,  and  here  we  are  talking  about  not  all 
consumers  but  the  14  million  who  have,  and  maybe  the  20  million 
who want real mobile national audio programming. They would be 
severely  harmed  here.  That’s  a  significant  segment  of  the  con-
suming  public.  And  going  from  two  to  one  is  one  of  the  most  ex-
treme  losses  of  competition  that  we  could  face.  So,  it  opens,  if  you 
follow the logic of this type of merger, even if it’s not the most im-
portant  service  in  the  world  to  consumers,  it  opens  the  floodgates 
to  more  broadcast  mergers,  more  cable  mergers,  more  newspaper- 
broadcast mergers just by following the exact same reasoning. 

So  as  a  matter  of  principle,  as  a  matter  of  logic,  using  the  same 
analysis we’ve used in all those other mergers, this one just doesn’t 
pass muster. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  let  me  ask  Mr.  Karmazin  in 
fairness  to  respond  to  the  issue  of  is  there  unique  synergy  and  so 
on,  and  then  if  I  could  ask  him  again,  could  you  give  me  the  con-
struct  of  how  this  merger  putting  two  into  one  would  benefit  the 
consumer, because I think that’s the case you’ve made. 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Sure.  I  think  we  have  not  yet  submitted  our  an-
swer to the Department of Justice as to what the efficiencies of this 
merger  will  be,  but  we  believe  there  are  some  compelling  effi-
ciencies that we will be able to make to the Department of Justice 
that  would  demonstrate  that  this  merger  has  unique  opportunities 
for efficiencies which would mean benefits to the consumer. 

And  I  can  tell  you  that  with  no  details  of  the  merger,  you  know 
Mr.  Kimmelman  was  against  the  merger  obviously  because  of  the 
fact that we are in the media world, and there is no such thing as 
a good media merger. And we happen to think that this is one that 
is. 

And in answering your last question, the benefit to the consumer 
is  the  fact  that  the  consumer  will  have  more  choice  if  the  merger 
is  allowed  to  proceed  than  they  will  if  the  merger  is  not  allowed 
to  proceed.  The  consumer  will  get  lower  prices  if  the  merger  is  al-
lowed  to  proceed  than  they  will  get  if  the  merger  is  not  allowed, 
so  lower  prices  and  more  choice  are  the  benefits  to  the  consumer. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Senator Thune. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

51 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  want  to  thank  you 
for  holding  this  hearing  today  and  thank  our  witnesses  for  taking 
the time to testify before the Committee, and for your input. 

Satellite radio is a particularly important resource for those of us 
in rural states. There are too many places in my state of South Da-
kota  where  you  can  turn  on  the  terrestrial  AM/FM  radio,  hit  the 
seek  button,  and  just  have  the  dial  spin  and  spin  and  spin.  So  for 
traveling businessmen and women, farmers, and many other music 
or  sports  enthusiasts  in  South  Dakota,  satellite  radio  can  be  one 
of  the  few  consistent  means  to  get  a  wide  variety  of  music  and 
other radio programming. The definition of the market is obviously 
the  key  question  in  this  debate.  And  it  would  be  my  hope  that 
these  hearings  and  deliberations  at  the  FCC  and  Department  of 
Justice will help us come to a clear understanding of how the mar-
ket  should  be  defined,  and  once  that  market  is  defined,  I  believe 
the  invigorating  fierce  competition  among  market  players  is  the 
best way to get consumers the best services at the best price. 

Mr. Karmazin, can you promise customers of both XM and Sirius 
that  they  will  not  have  to  buy  new  equipment  to  receive  the  same 
coverage in the foreseeable future? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. Yes, sir. 
Senator THUNE. As I mentioned at the outset, satellite radio may 
have  fewer  terrestrial  AM/FM  rural  competitors,  there  could  be 
fewer  alternatives  for  these  listeners  than  for  listeners  in  Chicago 
and  LA.  Does  the  competition  in  larger  more  populated  areas  be-
tween  terrestrial  and  satellite  make  up  for  the  lack  of  competition 
that exists in some rural areas? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. Senator, we think this merger is particularly ben-
eficial  for  people  in  rural  areas  because  of  the  importance  of  sat-
ellite  radio,  and  what  we  are  committed  to  is  to  offer  people  lower 
prices  and  more  choice.  So  we  will  obviously  not  be  raising  prices, 
and  any  price  increases  that  you  would  be  concerned  about  would 
be dealt with that we are a national service and not, we don’t know 
where  your  radio  is  at  any  given  moment  in  time.  So  you  could  be 
a  New  York  subscriber  but  you  could  be  somewhere  in  South  Da-
kota, so yes, no new receivers and no higher prices. 

As  a  matter  of  fact,  we  will  have  a  lower  price  point  than  we 
have  ever  had  before.  We  started  our  service  in  2002  with  a  price 
of $12.95, the exact same price that we have today, and as a result 
of  the  efficiencies  that  we  would  get  from  this  merger,  because  we 
have  said  the  benefit,  we  know  there  is  a  benefit  to  shareholders, 
but there has got to be a benefit to the consumers. So we are going 
to  take  some  of  the  benefits  that  our  shareholders  get  and  put  it 
back  in  the  form  of  benefits  to  the  consumer,  and  that  will  result 
in  lower  prices,  so  we  will  have  a  package  that  will  be  available 
of  service  below  the  current  $12.95,  so  it  will  be  cheaper,  not  nec-
essarily more expensive. 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you.  I  appreciate  the  answer.  Mr.  With-
ers,  if  you  believe  that  local  terrestrial  radio  stations  are  not  com-
peting  against  satellite  radio,  then  why  are  many  local  radio  sta-
tions and the NAB coming out so strongly against the merger? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

52 

Mr.  WITHERS.  We  don’t  compete  against  them  on  the  national 
level because we can’t. They are a national radio company. Both of 
them  are.  But  they  compete  against  us  every  day,  and  that’s  why. 
Because  if  we  have  a  market  like  your  markets  in  South  Dakota 
where there are not that many—in fact, I have a truck in Colorado 
that at night I can’t pick up anything up there at the ranch except 
satellite.  So  I  hate  to  tell  this  to  Mr.  Karmazin,  but  I  happen  to 
be an XM subscriber there and it works because I can listen to ball 
games,  et  cetera,  but  they  compete  against  us  every  day  by  the 
plethora  of  channels  that  they  have.  And  when  you’re  a  national 
radio  company,  you  program  nationally.  We  can  only  program  lo-
cally, so we are competing against that, that morass of signals that 
we  have,  we  can’t  have  any  more  than  what  we  have,  and  that’s 
where we are. 

Senator  THUNE.  Who  would  you  define  as  competitors  to  local 

Mr. WITHERS. Who would I? 
Senator  THUNE.  Yes.  I  mean,  what’s  your  competitive  environ-

AM/FM radio? 

ment? 

Mr.  WITHERS.  The  competitive  environment  is  the  satellite  com-
panies obviously and anybody that takes attention away, iPods, we 
have  talked  about  cell  phones.  iPods  are  individually  programmed 
stations  and  basically  it’s  what  you  have  a  personal  preference  for 
and what you want to hear and when you want to hear it, and we 
have  no  quarrel  with  that.  Because  we  have  found  that  when  it’s 
information  they  need,  and  other  entertainment  with  the  news, 
they  will  revert  back  to  the  local  over-the-air  stations,  the  terres-
trial stations. 

I  think  some  of  the  things  that  have  been  bandied  around  today 
about  competition,  and  broadcast  over  cell  phones  and  over  this 
and  over  that,  and  the  Bluetooth  and  the  Red  Dragons,  all  the 
things  that  we  do  in  cars,  out  of  cars,  that  would  be  fine  15  to  20 
years from now. But when this merger was proposed and filed back 
in  March,  we  looked  at  the  existence  in  the  marketplace  as  of  the 
date  that  it  was  filed.  And  then  they  are  not  the  competitors  that 
they  will  be  15  or  20  years  from  now.  In  20  years  we  can  look  at 
it again and see where we are. The direct answer to your question, 
which  I’m  sure  you’ll  be  pleased  to  hear,  is  anything  that  diverts 
the attention away from listening to AM and FM radio. 

Senator  THUNE.  Ms.  Sohn,  in  your  testimony  you  describe  XM 
and Sirius as basically weak in their current state, and if the merg-
er  passes  antitrust  scrutiny,  then  you  would  support  the  merger 
with a few conditions. Why do you believe that conditions are need-
ed  for  the  merger,  and  won’t  the  competitive  marketplace  not  pro-
vide  enough  checks  and  balances  on  the  new  combined  satellite 
radio providers? 

Ms. SOHN. Well, I guess I’m not sure. And you know, even if the 
authorities  pass  muster  on  this,  I  still  think  it  would  be  better  for 
the consumer to have some protections. So I mean, I tend to think 
that  the  market  is  a  little  bit  broader.  I  think  some  of  the  oppo-
nents  of  the  merger  are  sort  of  prejudging  what  the  antitrust  au-
thorities  would  say.  I  think  that  the  antitrust  authorities  have  to 
look  at  consumer  data  and  decide,  you  know,  do  iPods—there  are 
tons,  tens  of  thousands,  hundreds  of  thousands  of  podcasts  out 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

53 

there.  It’s  not  just  that  you  go  to  iTunes  and  put  songs  on  your 
iPod.  In  fact,  there  was  a  recent  study  that  showed  that  for  every 
iPod there is an average of 22 purchased songs. So most people ei-
ther use the songs that they already have on their CDs or they go 
to the tens of thousands, hundreds of thousands of iPods out there, 
OK? 

So I think that, that kind of data needs to be out there, the anti-
trust  authorities  have  to  look  at  it  and  say  OK,  is  this  something 
that will keep satellite radio prices low? I mean, we could differen-
tiate  every  single,  you  know,  the  iPod  or  Internet  radio,  we  could 
spend  all  day  saying  it’s  not  exactly  like  satellite  radio.  We  know 
this  but  that’s  not  the  relevant  question.  The  relevant  question  is, 
is  it  substitutable  in  a  way  that  would  keep  satellite  radio  prices 
low. 

But  let  me  get  back  to  your  main  question.  The  main  question 
was  why  the  conditions.  Again,  I  still  think  even  if  the  antitrust 
authorities  pass  on  this  and  say  it’s  OK,  I  still  think  there  needs 
to be some temporary conditions to ensure that prices don’t get up, 
that  there  is  still  diversity  of  programming,  and  that  consumers 
have  programming  choices,  which  it  sounds  like  some  of  these 
things  the  combined  entities  are  willing  to  promise.  They  don’t 
seem to be particularly burdened by it. 

Mr.  KIMMELMAN.  Senator  Thune,  I’d  just  like  to  say  that  maybe 
some  things  aren’t  known,  but  their  10(k)’s  indicate  quite  clearly 
that their revenue is up 50 percent, subscribership is up 50 percent 
just  last  year,  the  year  before.  These  are  not  failing  companies. 
These  are  not  companies  that  can’t  compete  against  each  other. 
They are companies that are holding consumers hostage by signing 
exclusive  deals  so  that  you  can  only  get  the  NFL  on  one  and  NBA 
on  one,  usually  baseball  on  the  other.  Holding  consumers  hostage 
by not working together by having interoperable equipment so you 
can  have  the  same  equipment  and  pick  whichever  you  want.  And 
now  coming  in  and  saying  the  only  solution  is  to  allow  them  to 
merge and dominate this market, where in many parts of the coun-
try  there  is  no  local  broadcast  radio  to  listen  to.  So  I  think  there 
are a lot of facts known here that should lead us to believe, as Sen-
ator  Inouye  said  at  the  beginning,  there’s  great  skepticism  about 
allowing  them  to  merger  two  to  one.  More  facts  would  be  wonder-
ful, but a lot are already known. 

Senator THUNE. I appreciate that. Mr. Chairman, I thank you for 
holding this hearing and all of you for your testimony. I think any 
time  you  start  talking  about  going  from  two  to  one,  that’s  pretty 
unusual  in  a  competitive  market  environment,  and  so  I  think  you 
can  understand  why  there  is  going  to  be  a  good  deal  of  scrutiny 
and analysis given to this proposal. But I appreciate your answers 
to the questions. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Senator McCaskill. 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It’s  been  a  long 
time since I’ve sat in a college economics class but I have to confess 
to you, Mr. Karmazin, that as I sit here, I don’t ever recall the lec-
ture  where  less  competition  delivers  more  choice  and  lower  prices. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

54 

On  its  face  less  competition  does  not  mean  more  choice  and  lower 
prices.  And  if,  if  we  are  to  assume  that  you  are  testifying  in  good 
faith that your company is going to sacrifice stockholder profits in-
definitely in the future to keep prices low, then I think we need to 
look  back  at  commitments  that  have  been  made  previously  that 
have  not  been  kept.  And  I  want  to  specifically  ask  you  about  the 
repeaters. 

In  St.  Louis,  nine  of  the  11  repeaters  exhibit  some  kind  of  vari-
ance  with  FCC  rules.  You  have  clearly  ignored  FCC  requirements 
on  repeaters  in  the  way  that  you  have  rolled  them  out  across  the 
Nation.  With  that  and  the  promises  that  were  made  about  inter-
operability  in  terms  of  receiver  boxes,  which  I  know  has  been  cov-
ered  prior  to  my  arriving  at  the  hearing,  I  apologize,  I  was  at 
Armed Services, it’s been 10 years since promises were made about 
interoperability,  and  as  one  of  your  subscribers  I’ve  never  heard 
about such a thing. 

I’m  a  consumer.  I’ve  never  heard  about  interoperable  receivers. 
I  have  never  heard  about  where  I  could  buy  one.  I  have  never 
heard  about  how  much  it  would  cost.  And  that  makes  me  more 
than  cynical  and  suspicious  about  the  testimony  you  give  about 
more  choices  and  lower  prices  by  eliminating  competition.  Could 
you  speak  to  your  failure  with  respect  to  FCC  compliance  as  it  re-
lates to the repeaters? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  If  you  don’t  mind,  I’d  like  to  respond  to  all  three 
of  the  points  that  you  raise.  So  first  of  all,  on  the  economics  class, 
we  compete  with  free  radio.  And  the  reason  that,  if  you  were  to 
take  a  look  at  our  SEC  filings  going  back  10  years,  what  we  have 
said  is  that  we  compete  with  AM/FM  radio.  You  have  to  acknowl-
edge that if you are in a car, Senator that you have in that car an 
AM  radio  and  an  FM  radio,  and  let’s  assume  that  you  are  a  sub-
scriber, you also have a satellite radio. And to say that those things 
are  not  competing  with  each  other  is  just  not  fair.  So  the  fact  is 
that what keeps the prices low and why we are willing to deal with 
it is because of the fact and the reason that the NAB is here today, 
is  that  they  don’t  want  us  to  lower  our  price  because  if  in  fact  we 
lower  our  price  we  will  get  more  subscribers,  because  it  is  easier 
to compete with free to charge a lower price than to charge a high-
er price. So what is the reason for it and why are we willing to do 
it?  The  reason  we  are  willing  to  do  it  is  that  these  efficiencies  can 
only come about by the two companies combining, and that we are 
prepared  because  there  are  so  many  synergies,  to  give  to  the  con-
sumer some of this choice. 

Regarding the terrestrial repeater network, I’m not familiar spe-
cifically with St. Louis but I can tell you the fact that we found out 
that we had 11 in total terrestrial repeaters at Sirius that were op-
erating  not  consistent  with  the  FCC  rules,  and  the  day,  the  day  I 
found  out  about  it,  I  turned  them  off,  because  we  believe  in  fol-
lowing the rules. 

If  you  wanted  to  look  at  the  rulings,  Senator  and  look  at  broad-
casters  who  we  compete  with,  there  hasn’t  been  almost  a  single 
broadcaster  that  has  not  either  been  found  violating  some  FCC 
rule,  whether  it  was  children’s  programming  in  the  case  of  a  $24 
million  fine,  whether  it  be  in  the  form  of  payola  from  a  bunch  of 
radio stations, whether it be AM on later hours. So I don’t condone 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

55 

violating the rules. I don’t believe in violation of the rules. I’ve been 
a  licensee  for  too  long  to  do  that.  That,  we’ll  deal  with  the  con-
sequences,  whatever  those  consequences  are  of  the  FCC,  and  if  in 
fact the FCC fines us or does something, we would prepare to deal 
with violating rules. 

As  it  applies  to  the  interoperable  radio,  if  you  take  a  look  at 
what  we  were  asked  to  do,  what  we  were  asked  to  do  was  to  de-
velop  an  interoperable  radio,  and  we  spent  millions  of  dollars,  XM 
and  Sirius,  on  developing  the  interoperable  radio.  It’s  not  a  loop-
hole. It’s not a hedge. There was no obligation on our part to com-
mercially  market  an  interoperable  radio.  That’s  for  receiver  manu-
facturers to do. We certainly have made our IP available to any re-
ceiver  manufacturer  that  would  like  to  develop  an  interoperable 
radio. 

So  we  have  in  fact  lived  up  to  everything  that  we  have  com-

mitted to the FCC as it applies to that. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  I  understand  that  you  know  that  you 
compete  against  free  radio  but  you  also  compete  against  the  other 
satellite  company,  and  it  is  apples  to  apples  here.  It  is  a  different 
type  of  listening  experience.  If  I’m  listening  to  music,  I  know  that 
if I listen on my satellite I’m not going to listen to commercials ex-
cept  frankly,  I  will  tell  you  just  as  a  consumer,  the  irritating 
promos  for  other  XM  stations.  It’s  much  different  listening  to 
music,  listening  to  classical  music  on  a  satellite  station  versus  lis-
tening to classical on a commercial station. 

I  think  you  compete  only  in  the  significance  of  local  program-
ming, which I think is an issue for Mr. Withers and his colleagues, 
because  if  broadcasters  don’t  maintain  local  programming,  you’re 
going  to  lose  a  competitive  niche  that  you  have  against  satellite. 
But  you  as  a  company  subject  to  satellite  to  satellite  competition, 
when it was time for me to decide, I had two competing companies 
that  knew  that  they  had  to  compete  with  one  another  to  give  the 
best  and  to  be  service  oriented  and  to,  in  fact,  compete  on  price. 
Now  if  there  is  only  one  satellite  option,  I  think  it  is  really  unfair 
to  try  to  claim  that  that  is  not  eliminating  competition.  Clearly  it 
is  eliminating  competition  within  an  apples  to  apples  comparison. 
I  know  that  people  violate  the  rules,  but  what  you’re  asking  us 
today  to  say  is  we  are  going  to  live  up  to  what  we  are  telling  you 
today in this hearing. And the bottom line is, there were represen-
tations  made  that  interoperability  would  be  commonplace  and  it’s 
not.  You  have  subsidized  receivers  for  years,  but  the  two  of  you 
have not made any effort, which I understand as a business model, 
but I’m just talking about overall from the consumer’s perspective, 
I’m  not  here  to  protect  your  shareholders,  I’m  only  here  to  protect 
the  consumers,  I  also  want  to  ask  with  resqect  as  to  the  repeaters 
that  are  in  St.  Louis,  will  they  be  brought  into  compliance  if  this 
merger occurs? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Senator,  there  was  not  anything  that  said  that 
interoperable  radios  would  be  commonplace.  If  you’d  like,  if  you 
want  to  send  me  what  you’ve  read  that  says  that,  we  have  said 
that it would be commonplace, I’d be very happy to admit that I’m 
wrong.  But  I  believe  you’re  wrong,  Senator,  that  there  is  nothing 
that said that, and that we did live up to—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

56 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  guess  the  FCC  rule  gave  that  impression. 
I  mean,  if  you  read  the  actual  language  of  the  FCC  rule,  it’s  very 
clear that one would get the impression in plain language it’s going 
to be required. 

Mr. KARMAZIN. I’ve read the rule and I don’t believe that’s accu-
rate.  And  in  answer  to  your  question  on  the  repeaters,  that  yes, 
that  we  do  not  believe  on  operating  anything  that’s  not  consistent 
with the FCC rules, and that’s true in the case of Sirius, all of the 
noncompliant repeaters are off. They are not on, in answer to your 
question. 

In  the  case  of  XM,  there  are  discussions  underway  in  dem-
onstrating to the benefit of the consumer, to your constituency who 
feel  that  there  is  no  interference  in  those  repeaters  and  that  the 
service  is  better,  and  there  is  discussion  as  to  whether  it’s  in  the 
public  interest  to  keep  those  repeaters  on  or  to  shut  them  off,  and 
whatever the FCC does, XM will conform to. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Just  for  the  record,  let  me  quote  from  the 
rule,  ‘‘a  receiver  that  will  permit  end  users  to  access  all  licensed 
satellites’ DAR systems that are operational or under construction.’’ 
Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Doesn’t  it  say  will  develop?  That’s  what  we  did. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  Their  systems  must  include  a  receiver  that 

will permit. 

Mr. KARMAZIN. That’s what I said. Senator we have developed it. 
It doesn’t say it will be commonplace. It doesn’t mean that we will 
advertise to you. It says that we will develop it, and we have, Sen-
ator. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  I  appreciate  your  testimony.  And  just 
so  that  I’m  an  equal  opportunity  questioner  this  morning,  just 
briefly  let  me  say  to  Mr.  Withers,  first,  let  me  acknowledge  that  I 
recognize  that  you  have  a  number  of  stations  in  my  state.  Let  me 
also say that in the boot heel, between you and Gary Rust, it’s hard 
to get any light. You dominate that area of the state and Gary Rust 
dominates  the  papers  in  that  area  of  the  state,  so  we  have  two 
large media conglomerates that for someone who has tried to navi-
gate news and so forth in that area, sometimes it’s a little difficult. 
So I encourage you to keep in mind that competition is very impor-
tant  regardless  of  whether  or  not  we  are  talking  about  the  free 
broadcast radio airwaves or whether we are talking about satellite. 
Mr.  WITHERS.  Thank  you  for  acknowledging  the  fact  that  we  do 
have  stations  in  your  state,  yes.  But  I  don’t  dominate  the  owner-
ship of the stations in the boot heel. For example, in Cape Gerardo, 
there are 13 stations and I, my daughter and I have six combined, 
and there is one newspaper, so that’s different. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  You’re  right.  Mr.  Rust  has  a  leg  up  on  you, 

there is no question about it. 

Mr. WITHERS. He has stations in Bluff and Sikeston and—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. He has them all. 
Mr. WITHERS. I introduced Gary and his wife 30-some years ago, 
so  obviously  he  is  a  great  salesman,  or  she  is.  And  I  agree  with 
your  comments  about  localism,  that’s  very  important,  and  the  sta-
tions that don’t do local broadcasting don’t deserve to be successful, 
and I feel very strongly about that and I also concur with your idea 
on  ownership.  We  have  to  earn  our  listeners.  They  don’t  come  to 
us. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

57 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Most of the questions I have have been asked, but Mr. Karmazin, 
you indicated that a consumer or subscriber may opt out from pay-
ing, and you’ll get credit if you cancel certain adult channels. 

Mr. KARMAZIN. Yes, Senator. 
The CHAIRMAN. Let’s say that I wanted to cut out Howard Stern. 

What sort of credit would I receive? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. We have not made an announcement of what the 
exact  amount  would  be  but  if  you  choose  not  to  listen  to  Howard 
Stern,  the  way  it  works  today  is  we’ll  block  it  or  you  can  block  it 
on your own receiver. After the merger is approved, and one of the 
issues  in  listening  to  people  talking  about  their  concern  is  that  we 
heard  them  say  that  it’s  not  just  about  not  wanting  to  listen.  We 
don’t  want  our  money  subsidizing  that  content  that’s  on  the  air. 
And  what  we  have  said  is  that  we  will  have  a  credit,  and  at  the 
appropriate  time  announce  exactly  what  that  is,  what  the  credit 
would  be  for  you  not  to  listen,  something  I  understand  that  hasn’t 
been done in other forms of entertainment to date. 

The CHAIRMAN. Will it be more than 50 cents or a dollar? 
Mr. KARMAZIN. You know, Senator, we have not discussed exactly 
how  it  will  work,  you  know.  We  have  gotten  some  people  who  are 
talking to us about a package of those adult entertainment content, 
you know, and whether or not it would be on an individual station 
basis  or  on  a  group  basis.  And  once  we  have  announced  what  this 
would be, we would absolutely make you aware of that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  so  we  have  no  idea  what  the  benefit  will 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Well,  no.  We  know  that  there  is  a  benefit,  sir. 
Right  now  what  we  are  saying  to  you,  what  we  don’t  know  is  how 
good a benefit it’s going to be, but we know that there is a benefit 
because you will not have to pay for it, and you know we recognize 
that, and we understand that it should be an important credit. 

The CHAIRMAN. I’ve been told that if you do have the merger, you 
will  be  eliminating  about  90  channels  because  they  are  substan-
tially similar or duplicative. What do you mean by that? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  I  think  what  some  have  speculated,  because  we 
have  not  been  able  to  spend  the  time  in  discussing  what  will  hap-
pen after the merger, we have been working through the regulatory 
process,  and  what  we  have  said  is  that  we  are  going  to  continue 
to  provide  a  service  that  is  essentially  similar  to  the  exact  service 
we have. So if you subscribe to Sirius right now you will get essen-
tially the same 130 channels that you’re getting right now, and the 
same  thing  is  true  about  the  XM.  There  may  be  some  efficiencies. 
So  as  an  example,  if  we  have  a  1960s  music  channel  and  XM  has 
a 1960s music channel, maybe we will have one 1960s music chan-
nel  that  would  be  available  on  both  services.  But  you  as  a  sub-
scriber to the existing service will not be losing any channels. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Where  does  that  enforce  the  model  about  90 

be? 

channels being eliminated? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Senator,  I  have  not  seen  it.  I  have  not  seen  that 

specific report, so I don’t know where it came out of. 

The CHAIRMAN. I’ve been told that it’s in your filing for the pub-

lic interest. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

58 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  In  our  filing?  Senator,  if  it’s  in  one  of  our  filings 
then I will look at it again, but I don’t recall that specific language 
in any of our filings. 

The CHAIRMAN. Right now you have—— 
Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Senator,  I  have  a  whole  bunch  of  lawyers  sitting 
behind  me  and  all  of  them  are  shaking  their  head  no,  that  they 
don’t remember seeing it in any of our filings. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  But  you  do  plan,  if  you’ve  got  a  1960s  music 
channel  and  XM  has  the  same  thing,  you  will  cancel  out  one  of 
them. 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  That  is  a  definite  possibility,  but  we  have  made 
no final determination on what the specific program lineups will be 
going forward. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  You  won’t  be  able  to  tell  us  what  the  benefit  of 

opting out would be? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Well,  no.  I’ve  said  that  there  will  be  a  financial 
benefit of opting out, much in the same way, Senator, that we have 
not yet discussed what the lower price point was going to be insofar 
as the $12.95. What we said is that it would be lower, so therefore, 
that’s  a  benefit  to  the  consumer  because  anything  lower  is  better 
than  the  consumer  has  now.  What  we  have  also  said  is  that  if 
somebody  wanted  both  services,  they  would  currently  pay  $25.90, 
and  we  said  it  would  be  a  significant  reduction  to  the  $25.90  that 
it  costs  today.  The  specifics  were  at  the  early  stages,  Senator,  of 
going  through  what  we  believe  is  going  to  be  a  long  process  and 
that we have not focused and we have not provided the specific in-
formation, but along the way we will, sir. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, this application here speaks of 75 channels 
overlapped  by  generally  providing  substantially  similar  program-
ming. 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Now  I  know  what  you—that’s  helpful.  So  I  be-
lieve  in  what  we  have  said,  we  have  described  our  service  and  we 
described that our service has content that is unique to Sirius and 
unique  to  XM,  and  then  it  has  other  channels  that  are  substan-
tially  similar.  So  as  an  example,  today  we  have  the  NFL  and  XM 
has Major League Baseball. That’s different. Both of us have CNN 
News  and  Fox  News.  That’s  included  in  those  75  channels.  What 
we have said, and I think what your aide did not give you, was we 
said  eventually  longer  term  what  we  might  have  is  when  there  is 
a radio that would enable the service to be able to pick up both so 
that  you  don’t  need  to  have  Fox  News  on  both  services,  that  we 
would  have  the  ability  to  replace  that  duplicative  programming 
with  additional  niche  new  programming,  and  that’s  the  context 
that that was discussed. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  At  the  present  time,  your  coverage  is  on  48 
states  but  not  Alaska  and  Hawaii.  When  you  do  merge,  will  the 
coverage be by terrestrial means or by satellite? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  Senator,  currently  our  configuration  of  XM  and 
Sirius  satellite  provides  for  coverage  of  the  48  states  and  not  full 
coverage of Hawaii and Alaska. Part of our service, so if we looked 
at  our  license,  our  service  provides  that  as  a  national  service  that 
we  also  have  terrestrial  repeater  networks,  and  that  we  are  pre-
pared  to  commit  to  adding  more  coverage  into  Alaska  and  Hawaii 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

59 

through our repeater networks, because the configuration of our ex-
isting satellite is doing whatever it can do. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  was  told  that  when  you  got  your  license  that 
the exemption was on the first generation system but now we have 
new systems. Can’t you do it right now without the merger? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. Senator, we have a satellite that we are going to 
launch in 2 years that is going into the same kind of orbit that our 
current  one  does,  and  I  am  not  aware  of  any  exemption  that  was 
done—I  believe  that  we  are  fully  operating  in  accordance  with  our 
license as it applies to how our satellites are flying. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, I know that it’s not travel—may we submit 
questions  to  all  of  you?  And  we’d  appreciate  if  we  can  get  your  re-
sponses. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  have  one  question.  Pardon  me,  Mr.  Inouye. 
I’ve  got  to  confess,  I’m  at  a  loss  in  terms  of  this  technology.  I  was 
under the impression, and I think the Chairman is too, that we are 
going toward a development of a technology, that all satellite radio 
will  be  using  that  technology  and  there  will  not  be  the  difference 
that  would  require  a  merger,  you  would  have  available  that  tech-
nology to anyone that wants to come in and compete in the future. 
Am I correct? Are we correct? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. No. I think what we are saying is the same thing. 
I  don’t  think  we  are  in  disagreement.  We  are  saying  that  individ-
ually both companies are flying satellites and putting in terrestrial 
repeater  networks.  Putting  in  terrestrial  repeater  networks  into 
low  density  population  markets  is  a  very  very  costly  thing  for  a 
company  to  do.  What  we  have  said  is  that  again,  part  of  the  syn-
ergy  that  we  would  get  as  a  result  of  this  merger  is  that  we  are 
prepared to take the cost and spend the money to put these terres-
trial repeaters in so that people in more rural and less urban areas 
will  be  able  to  pick  up  the  service.  And  by  the  way,  it  should  be 
indifferent as to whether or not the consumer is getting it from the 
satellite  or  from  the  terrestrial  repeater  networks.  They  are  all 
part of our national service and license. And I can also assure you 
that  any  additional  satellite,  any  additional  receivers  and  terres-
trial  repeaters  that  are  put  into  your  respective  states  would  obvi-
ously be fully licensed in accordance with any local laws as well as 
the FCC rules. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  wasn’t  clear  then  in  my  question.  My  ques-
tion is, you currently have one technology base for one satellite pro-
vider and another for the other. You have to have separate sets to 
get them now. I’m led to believe that those are going to merge and 
that  future  satellite  radio  providers  will  have  the  identical  tech-
nology.  You’re  going  to  bring  that  about  by  reforming  what  you 
have  now.  Am  I  correct  that  if  you  merge,  a  future  competitor 
would be able to utilize this same technology? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. I don’t know who that future competitor is. 
Senator STEVENS. I don’t either. But I want to know, is the tech-

nology available to the public once you merge? 

Mr. KARMAZIN. Senator, I apologize, but I’m not quite clear I un-
derstand  what  your  point  is  or  what  your  question  is.  Is  it  that  if 
our  two  companies  merge,  if  our  companies  are  the  way  they  are 
today  and  after  our  companies  merge  we  are  going  to  operate  the 
same  kind  of  satellite  and  terrestrial  repeater  network  as  we  did 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

60 

before  the  merger.  Nothing  is  changing,  and  we  talked  about  that, 
and  the  reason  is  that  we  don’t  want  to  make  these  receivers  not 
able to pick it up. What we have committed to is that and the rea-
son  that  we  have  not  expanded  our  coverage,  you  know—I  mean, 
am I not making it clear? 

Senator  STEVENS.  I’m  not  making  it  clear,  I  guess.  When  we  de-
veloped radio, we developed a basic concept and all radios use that 
same  technology.  Now  with  satellites  we  have  one  set  of  receivers 
per  provider,  and  another  station  has  another.  Which  means  that 
if you put them into an automobile, you’re going to take one or the 
other,  right?  After  you  merge,  you’ll  have  one.  You’ll  be  using  one 
system once you merge, is what I understand. Is that system going 
to be patented so that it would not be available to another compet-
itor  or  is  it  going  to  be  in  the  public  domain,  as  the  radio  tech-
nology was once it was developed? 

Mr.  KARMAZIN.  The  systems  that  satellite  radio  has,  because  it’s 
a  subscription  service,  are  proprietary.  So  it’s  not  like  somebody 
else can just put in a radio without paying us the $12.95 to be able 
to pay for the subscription service. So you’re dealing with a propri-
etary  network  that  exists  in  the  case  in  each  of  the  satellite  radio 
companies,  and  that’s  not  something  that  some  manufacturer  can 
say,  OK,  I  know  what  I’m  going  to  do,  I’m  going  to  just  put  in  a 
radio  that’s  going  to  be  able  to  get  satellite  radio  and  bypass  our 
subscription service. 

Senator  STEVENS.  My  friend  sitting  next  to  you  30  years  ago 
dealt  me  a  straight  royal  flush  in  a  five  card  stud  game.  Let  me 
ask him, do you understand what I’m trying to say, Russ? 

Mr.  WITHERS.  Yes,  I  do,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman  That  hand  was 
meant  for  me  and  you  just  happened  to  be  sitting  in  my  old  seat 
at that time. That’s what happened. 

As  I  understand  the  question,  you’re  asking  after  the  merger, 
will  the  two  noncompatible,  like  VHS  and  Beta,  be  thrown  to  one. 
And  the  answer  is,  and  if  you  had  heard  the  analyst  talk  about  it 
earlier,  at  a  later  date  that  is  their  ultimate  goal.  But  right  now, 
and  I  don’t  know  how  far  their  ultimate  goal  is,  but  I  would  say 
10,  15  years,  you  will  have  the  two  existing  systems.  And  I  hate 
to  be  speaking  for  Karmazin  and  Parsons,  but  I’ll  do  it.  The  two 
existing  systems  that  are  there  will  have  to  be  maintained;  other-
wise,  it  will  not  have  the  subscriber  bases  because  all  the  sets  out 
there are compatible each only to its own self. 

The  fallacy,  or  the  part  that  I  don’t  think  that  you  have  under-
stood  completely  yet,  and  that’s  not  a  put-down,  I  just  understood 
it  today  for  the  first  time,  is  that  25  megahertz  of  spectrum  is  all 
that’s available for the national satellite radio service. They do not 
intend  to  give  back  half  of  that  when  they  merge.  The  monopoly 
national  radio  company  will  use  all  25  megahertz,  not  half,  and 
therefore there can be no room for another competitor. So it doesn’t 
make any difference about the interoperability of a radio or the fact 
that they are going to pay them a fee to use their radio. There will 
be no space for a competitor. 

Senator  STEVENS.  That  I  didn’t  understand.  Thank  you.  Thank 

you, Mr. Chairman. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  with  that,  we’ll  be  submitting  questions 
and I hope we can get responses. I’d like to thank the panel. It was 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

61 

a very interesting morning. I hope we can make some decision, but 
thank you very much. And with that, the hearing is adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 12:01 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:47 Feb 27, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\78881.TXT JACKIE

